
ADP 6-22

ARMY LEADERSHIP AND THE PROFESSION























JULY 2019

DISTRIBUTION RESTRICTION:

Approved for public release; distribution is unlimited.

This publication supersedes ADP 6-22 and ADRP 6-22, dated 1 August 2012 and ADRP 1, dated 14 June 2015.

HEADQUARTERS, DEPARTMENT OF THE ARMY













































This publication is available at the Army Publishing Directorate site (https://armypubs.army.mil/) and the Central Army Registry site (https://atiam.train.army.mil/catalog/dashboard).



Change No. 1	Headquarters

Department of the Army Washington, DC, 25 November 2019









ARMY LEADERSHIP AND THE PROFESSION

This publication is changed to incorporate traits of the Army profession.

A plus sign (+) denotes changed material.

ADP 6-22, 31 July 2019, is changed as follows:





Remove Old Pages	Insert New Pages



pages i through vii	pages i through ix

pages 1-1 through 1-14	pages 1-1 through 1-23

pages Source Notes-1 through Source Notes-2	pages Source Notes-1 through Source Notes-2 pages Glossary-1 through Glossary-2	pages Glossary-1 through Glossary-2

pages References-1 through References-3	pages References-1 through References-3 pages Index-1 through Index-2	pages Index-1 through Index-2



File this transmittal sheet in front of the publication for reference purposes.



DISTRIBUTION RESTRICTION: Approved for public release; distribution is unlimited.



ADP 6-22, C1

25 November 2019





























By Order of the Secretary of the Army:







JAMES C. MCCONVILLE

General, United States Army Chief of Staff









Official:





Administrative Assistant

to the Secretary of the Army

1932909





DISTRIBUTION:

Active Army, Army National Guard, and United States Army Reserve: To be distributed in

accordance with the initial distrubution number (IDN) 110180, requirements for ADP 6-22.



*ADP 6-22







Army Doctrine Publication No. 6-22

Headquarters Department of the Army Washington, DC, 31 July 2019





ARMY LEADERSHIP AND THE PROFESSION



Contents

Page





DISTRIBUTION RESTRICTION: Approved for public release; distribution is unlimited.

*This publication supersedes ADP 6-22 and ADRP 6-22, both dated 1 August 2012, and ADRP 1, dated 14 June 2015.



ADP 6-22, C1	i



Contents





PART TWO	COMPETENCY-BASED LEADERSHIP FOR DIRECT THROUGH STRATEGIC LEADERS

Chapter 5	LEADS	5-1

Leads Others	5-1

Builds Trust	5-8

Extends Influence Beyond the Chain of Command	5-9

Leads by Example	5-12

Communicates	5-14

Chapter 6	DEVELOPS	6-1

Develops Leaders	6-1

Prepares Self	6-2

Creates a Positive Environment/Fosters Esprit de Corps	6-4

Develops Others	6-8

Stewards the Profession	6-14

Chapter 7	ACHIEVES	7-1

Gets Results	7-1

Purpose	7-1

Chapter 8	LEADERSHIP IN PRACTICE	8-1

Leaders and Challenges	8-1

Leaders and Courage	8-1

Leadership and Management	8-2

Adaptability and Versatility	8-2

Challenges of an Operational Environment	8-4

Stress of Change	8-6

Operational Stress	8-6

Counterproductive Leadership	8-7

PART THREE LEADING AT ORGANIZATIONAL AND STRATEGIC LEVELS

Chapter 9	ORGANIZATIONAL LEADERSHIP	9-1

Leading	9-1

Developing	9-3

Achieving	9-6

Chapter 10	STRATEGIC LEADERSHIP	10-1

Leading	10-2

Developing	10-5

Achieving	10-7

SOURCE NOTES ............................................................................... Source Notes-1

GLOSSARY ................................................................................................  Glossary-1

REFERENCES........................................................................................  References-1

INDEX ............................................................................................................... Index-1









Figures

+Introductory figure 1. Logic map	ix

+Figure 1-1. The Army profession	1-2

+Figure 1-2. The Army ethic, including Army Values	1-9

Figure 1-3. The Army leadership requirements model	1-15

Figure 1-4. Navigating leader competencies	1-16

Figure 1-5. Army leadership levels	1-22

Figure 5-1. General Eisenhower’s D-Day statement	5-6

Tables

Introductory table 1. New Army terms	viii

+Introductory table 2. Modified Army terms and acronyms	viii

+Table 1-1. The framework for the Army ethic	1-7

Table 2-1. Attributes associated with Character	2-12

Table 3-1. Attributes associated with Presence	3-3

Table 4-1. Attributes associated with Intellect	4-5

Table 5-1. The competency Leads others	5-8

Table 5-2. The competency Builds trust	5-9

Table 5-3. The competency Extends influence beyond the chain of command	5-11

Table 5-4. The competency Leads by example	5-14

Table 5-5. The competency Communicates	5-16

Table 6-1. The competency Prepares self	6-4

Table 6-2. The competency Creates a positive environment	6-8

Table 6-3. Counseling—Coaching—Mentoring Comparison	6-11

Table 6-4. The competency Develops others	6-14

Table 6-5. The competency Stewards the profession	6-15

Table 7-1. The competency Gets results	7-3































This page intentionally left blank.





Preface



ADP 6-22, Army Leadership and the Profession, establishes and describes the Army Profession and the foundations of Army leadership, (outlines the echelons of leadership (direct, organizational, and strategic), and describes the attributes and core leader competencies expected of all leaders across all levels and cohorts.

The principal audience for ADP 6-22 consists of all members of the Army profession, military and civilian. Trainers and educators throughout the Army will also use this publication. The use of the term Army leaders refers to officers, noncommissioned officers, and select Department of the Army Civilians unless otherwise specified.

Commanders, staffs, and subordinates ensure that their decisions and actions comply with applicable United States’, international, and host-nation laws and regulations. Commanders at all levels ensure their Soldiers operate in accordance with the Army ethic, the law of war and the rules of engagement (see FM 6-27).

This publication contains copyrighted material.

ADP 6-22 uses joint terms where applicable. Selected joint and Army terms and definitions appear in both the text and glossary. When first defined in the text, terms for which ADP 6-22 is the proponent publication are boldfaced and italicized, and definitions are boldfaced. When first defining other proponent definitions in the text, the term is italicized and the proponent publication follows the definition. Following uses of the term are not italicized. Terms for which ADP 6-22 is the proponent publication (the authority) are marked with an asterisk (*) in the glossary. Underlined words are for emphasis; these are not formally defined terms.

ADP 6-22 applies to the Regular Army, Army National Guard/Army National Guard of the United States, United States Army Reserve, and Department of the Army Civilians unless otherwise stated.

The United States Army Combined Arms Center is the proponent of ADP 6-22. The preparing agency is the Center for the Army Profession and Leadership, Mission Command Center of Excellence, United States Army Combined Arms Center. Send written comments and recommendations on a DA Form 2028 (Recommended Changes to Publications and Blank Forms) to Center for Army Profession and Leadership, ATTN: ATZL-MCV (ADP 6-22), 804 Harrison Drive, Bldg 472, Fort Leavenworth, KS 66027-2308 or by email to usarmy.leavenworth.tradoc.mbx.6-22@mail.mil.



Acknowledgements



These copyright owners have granted permission to reproduce material from their works.

Leadership in Organizations, 8th ed by Gary Yukl. Reproduced with permission of the author. Copyright © 2012.

Making Partnerships Work: A Relationship Management Handbook, by Jonathan Hughes and Jeff Weiss. Reproduced with permission of Vantage Partners, LLC. Copyright © 2001. All rights reserved.

“How to Manage Alliances Strategically,” by Ha Hoang and Frank T. Rothaermel. © 2016 from MIT Sloan Management Review/Massachusetts Institute of Technology. All rights reserved. Distributed by Tribune Content Agency, LLC.

Republished with permission of the Academy of Management, from “Successful Organizational Change: Integrating the Management Practice and Scholarly Literatures,” Jeroen Stouten, Denise M. Rousseau, and David De Cremer, 12(2), © 2018.





Introduction



ADP 6-22 establishes and describes the Army profession and the associated ethic that serve as the basis for a shared professional identity. It establishes and describes what leaders should be and do. Having a standard set of leader attributes and core leader competencies facilitates focused feedback, education, training, and development across all leadership levels. ADP 6-22 describes enduring concepts of leadership through the core competencies and attributes required of leaders of all cohorts and all organizations, regardless of mission or setting. These principles reflect decades of experience and validated scientific knowledge.

An ideal Army leader serves as a role model through strong intellect, physical presence, professional competence, and moral character. An Army leader is able and willing to act decisively, within superior leaders’ intent and purpose, and in the organization’s best interests. Army leaders recognize that organizations, built on mutual trust and confidence, accomplish missions.

Every member of the Army profession, military or civilian, is part of a team and functions in the role of leader and subordinate. Being a good subordinate is part of being an effective leader. Leaders do not just lead subordinates—they also lead other leaders. Leaders are not limited to just those designated by position, rank, or authority.

Being and doing are ineffectual without knowledge. Knowing the what and how of soldiering, tactics, operational art, staff operations, functional and technical expertise, and many other areas are essential to leading well. ADP 6-22 cannot convey all of the specific knowledge areas to become an expert leader. All leaders accrue the knowledge and develop the expertise required to contribute to the support and execution of the Army’s four strategic roles: shaping operational environments, preventing conflict, prevailing in large-scale ground combat operations, and consolidating gains.

ADP 6-22 describes the attributes and core competencies required of contemporary leaders. ADP 6-22 addresses the following topics necessary for Army members to become a skilled, agile, and highly proficient Army leader—

Army definitions of leader, leadership, and counterproductive leadership.

The Army leadership requirements model as a common basis for recruiting, selecting, developing, evaluating leaders and, most importantly, for leading Soldiers and Department of the Army (DA) Civilians.

Roles and relationships of leaders, including the roles of subordinates or team members.

What makes an effective leader: a person of integrity who builds trust and applies sound judgment to influence others.

How to lead, develop, and achieve through competency-based leadership.

The basics of leading at the direct, organizational, and strategic levels.

The influences and stresses of changing conditions that affect leadership.

Key updates and changes to this version of ADP 6-22 include—

Information from ADP 6-22 and ADRP 6-22 combined into a single document.

Incorporation of key concepts (Army profession and Army ethic) from ADRP 1.

New leadership requirements model diagram.

New discussions on the dynamics of leadership, followers, humility, and counterproductive leadership.







ADP 6-22 contains 10 chapters comprising three parts describing the Army’s approach to leadership:

l  +Chapter 1 describes the Army profession, and the ways the Army ethic underpins the decisions and actions of all Army leaders. It discusses the characteristics of the Army profession and expectations of all Army professionals. Chapter 1 also defines leadership, describes the foundations of Army leadership, introduces the Army leadership requirements model, and addresses the various roles of Army leaders and the echelons of leadership.

Part One describes the leader attribute categories of character, presence, and intellect. Chapter 2 discusses the attribute category of character: Army Values and Army ethic, empathy, Warrior Ethos/Service Ethos, discipline, and humility. Chapter 3 discusses the attribute category of presence: military and professional bearing, fitness, confidence, and resilience. Chapter 4 discusses the attribute category of intellect: mental agility, sound judgment, innovation, interpersonal tact, and expertise.

Part Two describes the core leader competencies and their application. Chapter 5 addresses the competency category of leads: leads others, builds trust, extends influence beyond the chain of command, leads by example, and communicates. Chapter 6 describes the competency category of develops: prepares self, creates a positive environment, develops others, and stewards the profession. Chapter 7 describes the competency category of achieves and the supporting actions of providing guidance, and managing and monitoring duties and missions. Chapter 8 discusses the challenges of the operational environment, stress, and change.

Part Three addresses the roles and responsibilities of organizational leaders in chapter 9 and of strategic leaders in chapter 10.

Changes to terms used in ADP 6-22 are addressed in introductory tables 1 and 2. The logic map for ADP 6-22 is shown in introductory figure 1.

Introductory table 1. New Army terms



+Introductory table 2. Modified Army terms and acronyms





Introduction







+Introductory figure 1. Logic map



















































This page intentionally left blank.







Chapter 1

The Army Profession, Ethic, and Leadership



For more than 240 years, the United States Army has protected the people and interests of the Nation. The Army is not alone. The Marines Corps, Navy, Air Force, Coast Guard, government agencies, and local law enforcement and firefighters all perform similar services to the Nation and its communities. All volunteered. In many cases, they choose to place themselves in harm’s way based on a conviction that personal service makes a difference. Leading Soldiers requires an understanding of the Army profession and ethic that are the basis for a shared professional identity and underpin all leader decisions and actions. To inspire Soldiers to risk their lives requires professional leaders capable of providing purpose, direction, and motivation. This chapter describes the Army profession, describes the Army ethic, and introduces Army leadership.

…the Soldier, above all other people, prays for peace, for he must suffer and bear the deepest wounds and scars of war.

General of the Army Douglas MacArthur Thayer Award acceptance speech, 1962



+THE ARMY PROFESSION AND ETHIC

1-1. War is a lethal clash of wills and an inherently human endeavor that requires perseverance, sacrifice, and tenacity. The United States Army’s primary reason for existence is to deploy, fight, and win the Nation’s wars by providing ready, prompt, and sustained land dominance by Army forces across the range of military operations as part of the joint force. Enduring the physical hardship, danger, and uncertainty of combat requires an Army that is professionally committed and guided by an ethic that motivates and guides its forces in the conduct of missions, performance of duty, and all aspects of life.

1-2. Providing the purpose, direction, and motivation required to inspire others to risk their lives to accomplish missions requires leaders committed to their profession and ethic. To prepare Army leaders to fulfill their responsibilities, the Army profession develops Soldiers and Army civilians who demonstrate character, competence, and commitment through career-long training, education, and experience.



+THE ARMY PROFESSION

1-3. The Army has a dual nature as both a military department of government and a trusted military profession. The character of the Army as an institution and a profession are both essential to accomplishing the Army’s mission. However, it is the American people’s trust and confidence in the Army as an ethical profession that grants it the autonomy to exercise the disciplined initiative critical to accomplishing missions under diverse conditions around the world.

1-4. Traditional professions share essential characteristics. They provide a vital service to society, requiring expertise and skill developed through years of training, education, and experience. Professions establish standards of practice and certify that their members are qualified to serve the needs of society.

1-5. Professionals accept the responsibility to be stewards of the people and resources entrusted to them by society and to advance the state of their profession in anticipation of changes to the world around them. Professions motivate their members to answer a “calling to honorable service,” to pursue lifelong learning,







and to cooperate as members with a common purpose higher than individual gratification. A calling or vocation means that the mission is more important than the individual is, which is the basis of sacrifice.

1-6. Professions self-police and must live by an ethic with both legal and moral foundations. A professional ethic provides the set of moral principles that guide decisions and actions in professional practice. Traditional professions include medicine and law, science and engineering, architecture, higher education, ordained religious practice, and the military.

1-7. Ultimately, society trusts professions and grants them autonomy and discretion with prudent, balanced oversight or external controls. If a profession violates its ethic and loses the trust of society, it becomes subject to increased societal regulation and governance.

1-8. The Army profession is a trusted vocation of Soldiers and Army civilians whose collective expertise is the ethical design, generation, support, and application of landpower; serving under civilian authority; and entrusted to defend the Constitution and the rights and interests of the American people. The Army profession includes two complementary communities of practice—the Profession of Arms and the Army Civilian Corps.

The Profession of Arms comprises the Soldiers of the Regular Army, Army National Guard, and the Army Reserve.

The Army Civilian Corps is composed of Army civilians serving in the Department of the Army.





+Figure 1-1. The Army profession



1-9. These communities of practice are trusted Army professionals—honorable servants in defense of the Nation, experts in the performance of their duties, and responsible stewards of the Army profession. The Army ethic underpins the decision and actions of all Army professionals. (See paragraph 1-44 for more on the Army ethic.)



CHARACTERISTICS OF THE ARMY PROFESSION

1-10. Five characteristics identify and establish the Army as a profession. These characteristics reflect American values, the Army ethic, and the Army’s approach to conducting operations. Demonstrated consistently, these characteristics reinforce trust between the Army profession and the American people. The five characteristics of the Army profession are—

Trust.

Honorable service.

Military expertise.

Stewardship.

Esprit de corps.



Trust

1-11. Trust is the foundation of the Army’s relationship with the American people, who rely on the Army to ethically, effectively, and efficiently serve the Nation. Within the Army profession, trust is shared confidence







among commanders, subordinates, and partners in that all can be relied on and all are competent in performing their assigned tasks.

1-12. Trust has a direct relationship on the time and resources required to accomplish the mission. Subordinates are more willing to exercise initiative when they believe their commander trusts them. They will also be more willing to exercise initiative if they believe their commander will accept and support the outcome of their decisions. Likewise, commanders delegate greater authority to subordinates who have demonstrated tactical and technical competency and whose judgment they trust.

1-13. Trust within the Army profession allows us to rapidly task organize units and build teams where interpersonal relations are not yet established. In some situations, trust may be based solely on a common understanding of an approach to operations. This understanding creates a basic level of trust that, until proven otherwise, adjacent units or new team members will conduct operations to a common standard.

1-14. The Army’s trust with the American people reflects their confidence and faith that the Army will serve the Nation and accomplish missions ethically. This trust is earned and reinforced as the Army contributes honorable service, demonstrates military expertise, and exercises responsible stewardship. External trust with the joint force, interagency partners, allies, and coalition forces is essential for success in operations across multiple domains.

1-15. The Army profession is successful when it sustains the respect and trust of the American people. This requires that professionals perform their duty every day in a manner that the American people judge to be ethical according to the beliefs and values enshrined in the Nation’s founding documents. Trust is lost when we fail to meet these expectations. Accordingly, Army leaders establish conditions that serve to prevent misconduct or unethical practices and take corrective action when it occurs.

1-16. Army professionals protect the constitutional rights of every American and the basic human rights of all people. Any failure to respect these rights diminishes trust with the American people and with the international community. Such failure can cause great harm to the legitimacy of the Army profession and the Nation. Important insights for all Army professionals informing why and how they serve include—

The collective rights of the American people to independence and political sovereignty constitute the moral basis for the Army mission.

Protecting the Nation’s collective rights is the honorable service the Army profession provides for society.

Army professionals must not violate the rights of others, or they violate their own ethic and erode the trust and legitimacy built with the American people, allies, and partners.

The Army mission justifies the ethical application of landpower.

The moral justification for the Army mission is the basis for taking the lives of others and placing the lives of Soldiers at risk.



Honorable Service

1-17. Honorable service is support and defense of the Constitution, the American people, and the national interest in a manner consistent with the Army ethic. Army professionals serve honorably by obeying the laws of the Nation and all legal orders. Army forces reject and report illegal, unethical, or immoral orders or actions.

1-18. Army professionals contribute honorable service as they accomplish the mission, perform their duty, and live their lives making ethical decisions and taking ethical actions. Living by and upholding the Army ethic means that its moral principles are woven through all facets Army life. Love of country and family, preservation of peace, and defense of the American people are values inherent to the ethos—this is why we serve.

1-19. Army professionals are committed to lifelong learning and set the example for what it means to live by and uphold the Army ethic. Conversely, misconduct undermines trust and can bring discredit to the Army profession. Moral failure compromises the Army profession’s bond of trust among its members, with the American people, and with the international community. It is an Army professional’s duty to prevent misconduct, enforce the standards of the profession, and take action to stop unethical practices.







1-20. Soldiers in combat operations are responsible for the ethical application of lethal force in honorable service to the Nation. The law is explicit. Soldiers are bound to obey the legal and moral orders of their superiors; but they must disobey an unlawful or immoral order. Soldiers are also legally bound to report violations of the law of war to their chain of command

1-21. Under normal circumstances, Soldiers and Army civilians trust their superior’s orders and execute them to the best of their ability. However, making an ethical choice and acting on it when faced with an ethical or moral issue can be difficult. Sometimes it means standing firm and disagreeing with a leader. These occasions test character. If Army professionals perceive that an order is unlawful or immoral, they seek situational understanding regarding the order and its original intent. This may include asking for clarification from the person who issued the order.

1-22. If the question is complex, Soldiers and Army civilians should seek legal counsel. If circumstances do not permit that, Soldiers make the best judgment possible based on their understanding of the Army ethic and their conscience, as applied to the immediate situation. There is a risk when disobeying what is perceived to be an unlawful or immoral order—and it may be the most courageous decision an Army professional ever makes.

1-23. While none of us can be completely prepared for complex, ambiguous situations, we should reflect on the Army ethic, study lessons learned, anticipate ethical challenges, and mitigate the risks. It is expected that Soldiers and Army Civilians, as trusted Army professionals, will do what they believe is right.



Military Expertise

1-24. Military expertise is the ethical design, generation, support, and application of landpower, and the associated capabilities essential to accomplishing missions in defense of the American people. The Army profession demonstrates military expertise while conducting operations assigned by civilian authority. The Army is trusted to accomplish missions ethically, effectively, and efficiently. The Army profession develops and demonstrates military expertise in four broad fields of knowledge:

Leader and human development.

Moral-ethical.

Geo-cultural and political.

Military-technical.



Leader and Human Development

1-25. The leader and human development field informs how the Army profession inspires young people to volunteer to accept a calling to honorable service and then simultaneously develops and certifies their character, competence, and commitment. The Army personnel development system’s lifecycle management functions, including leader and professional development as well as talent management, are career-long processes centered on sequential and progressive training, education, and experience. Lifelong learning is a professional obligation for all Army professionals that includes actively offering and accepting coaching, counseling, and mentoring.



Moral-Ethical

1-26. The moral-ethical field addresses the application of landpower as informed by the Army ethic and in compliance with legal and regulatory requirements. This field encompasses ethical reasoning in decisions and actions at all levels of leadership. Army professionals anticipate and address the implications of present and future ethical challenges resulting from cultural and social change, advancing technology, and changes in the cyberspace domain.



Geo-Cultural and Political

1-27. The geo-cultural and political field includes cross-cultural and civil-military relations. Geographic and cultural factors at all levels of warfare require consideration during the conduct of operations. This includes understanding the philosophical, ethnic, religious, and political similarities and differences between friendly and threat forces.







1-28. Senior Army leaders have a direct stewardship responsibility to strengthen trust with the American people through their professional engagement in civil-military relations. Civilian authority over the military is established and codified in our Constitution and is the mechanism by which the American people, through their elected and appointed officials, exercise oversight of the military. Army professionals understand this and appreciate the traditional role that such oversight has played throughout our history.

1-29. Final decisions and responsibility for national strategy and policy, and for the organization and resourcing of the Army rest with civilian authority. With this understanding, Army professionals have a duty to provide their unique and vital expertise to the decision making process. It is our responsibility to ensure that professional military advice is candidly and respectfully presented to civilian leaders.

1-30. The key condition for effective American civil-military relations is mutual respect and trust. With this understanding, Army professionals strictly adhere to a set of norms established by law and accepted practice:

The Army profession’s principal obligation is to support the democratic institutions and policymaking processes of our government. Military leaders offer their expertise and advice candidly to appropriate civilian leadership.

Civilian decision makers seek and consider professional military advice in the context of policy deliberations. Army professionals properly confine their advisory role to the policy-making process and do not engage publically in policy advocacy or dissent. Army professionals adhere to a strict ethic of political nonpartisanship in the execution of their duty.

The legitimacy of the Army profession depends on healthy interaction with the news media. Within the limits of operations security, Army professionals support and facilitate the media’s legitimate function to inform the citizenry we honorably serve.



Military-Technical

1-31. The military-technical field includes operations at all levels of the military art and science, from the tactical to the strategic. Identification, development, and application of advanced technologies and technical capabilities to conduct operations effectively is the goal. Developing military-technical expertise is the foundation of competence, which is in turn a significant basis of professional trust within cohesive teams. Army professionals trust each other to perform their jobs absent evidence to the contrary.



Stewardship

1-32. Stewardship is the responsibility of Soldiers and Army civilians to strengthen the Army as a profession. It includes caring for the people and resources entrusted to them by the American people, ensuring Army forces are ready, now and in the future, to accomplish the Army’s missions.

1-33. Stewardship requires that Army professionals understand their duty represents a trust—it is an office. This responsibility is explicit in the oaths taken by Army officers and Army civilians (and implied in the Oath of Enlistment). These oaths conclude with the language: “I will well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office upon which I am about to enter.”

1-34. The office that Army professionals enter upon taking their oath is a moral responsibility. Army professionals are stewards of a special bond of trust and confidence with the American people. The Army must always be trusted to fight and win ethically, effectively and efficiently. Members of the Army profession provide stewardship at strategic, organizational, and individual levels.

1-35. Stewardship starts at the top of a profession. Strategic stewardship includes establishing the directives, policies, programs, and systems that provide for the purposeful development of people, resource management, and preparation for the future—while preserving the customs, courtesies, and traditions of the Army.

1-36. Organizational stewardship includes establishing a professional climate that fosters living by the Army ethic, strengthens mutual trust, and fosters cohesive teamwork. Organizations must be equipped, trained, and certified for current and future missions.

1-37. Individual stewardship is the responsibility to strive continuously for excellence in the performance of duty, to pursue lifelong learning, and to accomplish every mission.







Esprit de Corps

1-38. Esprit de corps denotes the Army’s winning spirit—a collective ethos of camaraderie, mutual trust, and cohesive teamwork. Successfully accomplishing missions requires spirited and dedicated Soldiers and Army civilians who strive for standards of excellence. Army forces embrace shared intent and situational understanding, accept prudent risk, and exercise disciplined initiative. These guiding principles, in harmony with the Army ethic, strengthen the Army’s identity, resilience, and courage—a never-quit resolve—enabling Army forces to persevere and accomplish the mission in the presence of risk, uncertainty, and fear.

1-39. Soldiers and Army civilians are led, trained, and equipped to accomplish a variety of missions. However, these preparations alone are not enough. The challenges of warfare wear on the morale of even the most experienced leaders. To persevere and prevail in these conditions require both commitment and resilience. Esprit de corps reflects the Army’s collective perseverance to accomplish the toughest missions, ethically, as a team of teams.

1-40. Esprit de corps is embedded in the Army culture, professional organizational climates, and shared identity. Esprit de corps is reflected in the customs, courtesies, and traditions of the Army. Discipline and standards are intrinsic to the Army profession. Armed forces conduct operations with the discipline required by military art and science. Discipline allows Army professionals to choose the harder right over the easier wrong in the face of temptation, obstacles, and adversity. Standards establish acceptable levels of performance and achievement; Army professionals strive for excellence in performance of duty.

1-41. For Soldiers and Army civilians, esprit de corps is reflected in—

Shared understanding of their professional identity, reasons why they serve, and ways they serve the American people.

Motivation, discipline, striving for excellence, and good morale.

A sense of accomplishment: “Duty Well-Performed!”

Pride in honorable service defending the American people.

Belonging to a cause greater than oneself: love of country, the Army Family, and preserving the peace.

Living by the Army ethic.

1-42. Within a unit, command, or organization, esprit de corps is evident in—

A shared sense of purpose and mission.

Pride in the teamwork that makes its members willing to sacrifice for one another.

Perseverance through adversity and challenge.

A professional organizational climate—upholding the Army ethic.

Honoring organizational customs, courtesies, and traditions and legacies.

Pride in the organization and its accomplishment.

The sense of teamwork that makes its members willing to sacrifice for one another.

1-43. The Army profession strengthens esprit de corps through—

Shared understanding that “America’s Army” is one indivisible team.

Willing obedience to civilian authority as a trusted member of the joint force.

Professional and leader development that prepares and certifies Soldiers and Army civilians.

Demanding training that ensures readiness to accomplish the mission.

Programs and systems that are trusted to be ethical, effective, and efficient.



+THE ARMY ETHIC

1-44. True professions are guided by an ethic that establishes the personal and institutional standards expected of its members. A professional ethic creates a shared professional identity, and provides an enduring set of moral principles, values and beliefs that guide that profession as it provides its specialized service to society. The Army ethic is the set of enduring moral principles, values, beliefs, and laws that guide the Army profession and create the culture of trust essential to Army professionals in the conduct of missions, performance of duty, and all aspects of life.







1-45. The Army ethic is the basis of the Army’s shared professional identity of trusted Army professionals. This identity expresses how Army professionals view their profession and why they serve. Love of country and family, preservation of the peace, and defense of the American people and the Army Values are inherent to the Army ethic. The ethical, effective, and efficient accomplishment of the mission is the core of this ethic. Soldiers and Army civilians are bound in common moral purpose to support and defend the Constitution and the American people.

1-46. The Army ethic guides institutional policy and practice in the ethical design, generation, support and application of landpower, under civilian authority, on behalf of the American people. The relationship between the Army profession and the American people depends on mutual trust, continuously reinforced through the performance of honorable service, military expertise, and stewardship.

1-47. The Army ethic has its origins in the philosophical heritage, theological and cultural traditions, and the historical legacy that frame our Nation. Army professionals swear to uphold the principles codified in the Constitution, which include establishing justice, ensuring domestic tranquility, providing for the common defense, promoting the general welfare, and securing the blessings of liberty to ourselves and our posterity. These principles are affirmed in oaths of service, and reflected in the Army motto—This We’ll Defend.

1-48. Soldiers and Army civilians join the Army profession with personal values developed in childhood and nurtured through years of experience. Diverse backgrounds and perspectives reflect American society and are a great strength of the Army. The oath to support and defend the Constitution unites all Army professionals. In so doing, they agree to live by and uphold the Army ethic. The framework for the Army ethic (see table 1-1) illustrates the historic sources that inform its content.

+Table 1-1. The framework for the Army ethic



1-49. The legal foundations of the Army ethic are the Constitution of the United States, United States Code, the Uniformed Code of Military Justice, and other orders and directives. Army professionals adhere to these mandates as the minimum standards for ethical conduct.

1-50. In addition to the legal foundations, the Army ethic encompasses moral foundations to include the Army Values and Just War Tradition. While the moral foundations of the Army ethic are not legally binding, they provide the inspiration to strive for excellence in contribution of honorable service to the Nation.

1-51. In situations of uncertainty, where the rules do not provide clear, courses of action, Army professionals base their decisions and actions on the moral principles of the Army ethic. In this way, Army professionals







live by and uphold the moral foundation of the Army ethic, sustaining trust within the profession and with the American people.

1-52. Rapid changes in the nature of armed conflict present ethical challenges in accomplishing the mission. These include uncertainty and complexity, particularly within the human dimension and cyberspace domain. We must anticipate the ethical challenges associated with these conditions and be guided by the Army ethic, including Army Values (see figure 1-2).



+EXPECTATIONS FOR THE ARMY PROFESSION, BASED ON OUR ETHIC

1-53. The Army’s primary roles as an element of the joint force are in the land domain. The Army’s enduring responsibility is to equip, train, and be ready to conduct operations across the range of military operations as directed by the civilian and military chains of command.

1-54. The relationship between the Army profession and the American people depends on trust, continuously reinforced through contributions of honorable service, military expertise, and stewardship. The Army profession demonstrates its commitment to fulfill this duty through esprit de corps.

1-55. The Army ethic guides the Army profession and the Army as an institution in formulating directives and policy as well as in designing and implementing programs and systems supporting—

Honorable service in defense of the Constitution and the interests of the American people.

Military expertise to accomplish the mission ethically, effectively, and efficiently.

Stewardship of the Army profession, Soldiers, Army civilians, the Army family, and the resources entrusted by the American people.

Esprit de corps to prevail through adversity to accomplish the mission.

Bonds of trust with the American people.



A SHARED IDENTITY—TRUSTED ARMY PROFESSIONALS

1-56. By taking their solemn oaths of service, Army professionals voluntarily incur an extraordinary moral obligation to live by and uphold the Army ethic, including Army Values, in their decisions and actions, in all aspects of life. It is their responsibility to embrace a shared identity as trusted Army professionals. As such, they assume complementary roles. As honorable servants in defense of the Constitution, they are professionals of character. As Army experts, they are competent professionals. As responsible stewards of the Army profession, they are committed and accountable to each other, the profession, and the American people. When Army professionals return to society, they embrace the concept of Soldiers for Life, and continue to be moral-ethical exemplars for their families and communities, and contribute to the well-being of the United States of America.



EXPECTATIONS FOR ARMY PROFESSIONALS, BASED ON THE ARMY ETHIC

1-57. Preservation of the peace and winning the Nation’s wars are inherent to the Army ethic and the purpose of the Army profession. The ethical, effective, and efficient accomplishment of the mission is the core of the Army ethic. Army professionals accomplish the mission as a team of Soldiers and Army civilians contributing their best effort, doing what is ethical, effective, and efficient to the best of their ability, and always striving for excellence. Leaders set the example, live by and uphold the Army ethic, establish a professional organizational climate, and inspire their team. Without leadership, there is no profession, only bureaucracy. While the senior leader is responsible for what the team does or fails to do, success demands that all perform duty with discipline and to standard. In this way, leaders and followers are trusted teammates in the exercise of mission command. The consistent demonstration of character, competence, and commitment, with shared understanding and intent, reinforces mutual trust.







The Army Ethic

The Heart of the Army

The Army ethic includes the moral principles that guide our decisions and actions as we fulfill our purpose: to support and defend the Constitution and our way of life. Living the Army ethic is the basis for our mutual trust with each other and the American people. Today our ethic is expressed in laws, values, and shared beliefs within American and Army cultures. The Army ethic motivates our commitment as Soldiers and Army civilians who are bound together to accomplish the Army mission as expressed in our historic and prophetic motto:

This We’ll Defend.

Living the Army ethic inspires our shared identity as trusted Army professionals with distinctive roles as honorable servants, Army experts, and stewards of the profession. To honor these obligations we adopt, live by, and uphold the moral principles of the Army ethic. Beginning with our solemn oath of service as defenders of the Nation, we voluntarily incur the extraordinary moral obligation to be:

Trusted Army Professionals

Honorable Servants of the Nation—Professionals of Character:

We serve honorably—according to the Army ethic—under civilian authority while obeying the laws of the Nation and all legal orders; further, we reject and report illegal, unethical, or immoral orders or actions.

We take pride in honorably serving the Nation with integrity, demonstrating character in all aspects of our lives.

In war and peace, we recognize the intrinsic dignity and worth of all people, treating them with respect.

We lead by example and demonstrate courage by doing what is right despite risk, uncertainty, and fear; we candidly express our professional judgment to subordinates, peers, and superiors.

Army Experts—Competent Professionals:

We do our duty leading and following with discipline, striving for excellence, putting the needs of others above our own, and accomplishing the mission as a team.

We accomplish the mission and understand it may demand risking our lives and justly taking the lives of others.

We continuously advance the expertise of our chosen profession through lifelong learning, professional development, and certifications.

Stewards of the Army Profession—Committed Professionals:

We embrace and uphold the Army Values and standards of the profession, always accountable to each other and the American people for our decisions and actions.

We wisely use the resources entrusted to us, ensuring our Army is well-led and well-prepared, while caring for Soldiers, Army civilians, and families.

We continuously strengthen the essential characteristics of the Army profession, reinforcing our bond of trust with each other and the American people.



LOYALTY–DUTY–RESPECT–SERVICE–HONOR–INTEGRITY–COURAGE

+Figure 1-2. The Army ethic, including Army Values







1-58. Living by and upholding the Army ethic is a lifelong commitment. Reinforcing trust requires continuous professional development. This quest is a duty consistent with the Army’s shared identity. The Army ethic informs, motivates, and inspires Army professionals to—

Contribute honorable service in accomplishing the mission, performing their duty, and in all aspects of life.

Be expert in the disciplined performance of duty.

Serve as responsible stewards of the Army profession by preventing misconduct and taking action to stop unethical practices.



Honorable Servants of the Nation—Professionals of Character



Army professionals serve honorably—according to the Army ethic—under civilian authority while obeying the laws of the Nation and all legal orders; they reject and report illegal, unethical, or immoral orders or actions.





1-59. Army professionals volunteer and take a solemn oath to bear true faith and allegiance to the Constitution and to protect the freedoms it defines. The Army Value of loyalty clearly reflects this fact. Allegiance means willing obedience to the lawful orders of elected and appointed leaders. Army professionals demonstrate true faith in leading by example, doing their duty in taking action to uphold the moral principles of the Army ethic, and rejecting orders in violation of law. This is the meaning of honorable service.



Army professionals take pride in honorably serving the Nation with integrity, demonstrating character in all aspects of their lives.





1-60. The Army profession contributes honorable service to the American people, defending the freedoms and rights as expressed in the Constitution. It accomplishes missions ethically, in accordance with the Nation’s values. American values affect every aspect of how U.S. forces fight and win. This is nonnegotiable. Army professionals demonstrate the Army Value of integrity as they make decisions and take actions that are consistent with the moral principles of the Army ethic. To violate the Army ethic is to break the sacred bond of trust internally between the members of the profession, as well as externally between Army professionals and the American people. Failure to live by and uphold the Army ethic brings discredit on the Army and may have strategic implications for the mission.



Army professionals recognize the intrinsic dignity and worth of all people and treat them with respect.





1-61. Army professionals treat all people with respect—an Army Value—and demonstrate proper consideration for all. Even those who threaten the rights of others are entitled to just treatment according to law, regulations, and rules of engagement. They lead by example and do what is ethical to prevent abusive treatment of others. They protect those who are threatened or suffer disregard for their human dignity and worth. They do not tolerate mistreatment of people or their property.



Army professionals lead by example and demonstrate courage by doing what is ethical despite risk, uncertainty, and fear; they candidly express their professional judgment to subordinates, peers, and superiors.





1-62. Leadership demands courage, a character attribute and an Army Value. The mission, duty, and life itself require Army professionals to reject cowardice—they accept risk and overcome adversity and their fears. They realize that they risk personal harm in performing their duty and accomplishing missions. The harm may be physical, emotional, or spiritual. Nonetheless, Army professionals communicate with candor and tact, seek shared understanding, and demonstrate courage by doing what is ethical, effective, and efficient despite risk, uncertainty, and fear.







1-63. Some situations exist where leaders may have multiple options that are ethical, but they create tension with one another in terms of efficiency and effectiveness. It is professional judgment gained by experience that helps inform the best decision among choices that are all ethical.



Army Experts—Competent Professionals



Army professionals perform their duty, leading and following with discipline, striving for excellence, putting the needs of others above their own, and accomplishing the mission as a team.





1-64. The Army Values of duty and service require Army professionals to contribute their best efforts to accomplish the mission as members of a team. They consider the welfare and needs of others above their own and in performing their duty. They make ethical, effective, and efficient decisions and take appropriate actions to the best of their ability in all aspects of life. This does not mean that they will always succeed or avoid all mistakes. Setbacks and errors will occur in any human endeavor. Army professionals learn from experience—both good and bad—develop good judgment and leadership, and strive for continuous improvement.



Army professionals accomplish the mission and understand it may demand courageously risking their lives and justly taking the lives of others.





1-65. The Army mission to “fight and win our Nation’s wars” requires Army forces equipped, trained, and ready to engage in operations across multiple domains and the range of military operations. They defend the basic human rights of Americans. The right to life includes the National responsibility of self-defense. Army forces protect the legitimate interests of the American people when threatened or attacked. Army operations may require the use of armed force against legitimate threats, consistent with the Army ethic and the law of armed conflict. Employing force puts one’s self and others at risk. In the fog of war, uncertainty compromises situational understanding. Regardless, to the best of their ability, they must make decisions and take actions that are ethical, effective, and efficient. They understand there may be unanticipated, unintended consequences affecting the lives of noncombatants. They do all they can to avoid these effects. They accept prudent risk and with courage—an Army Value—accomplish the mission ethically.



Army professionals continuously advance the expertise of their chosen profession through lifelong learning, professional development and our certifications.





1-66. Progressive development and certification in character, competence, and commitment for Soldiers and Army civilians is a continuous, lifelong duty. Knowledge, discipline, and leadership require training, education, experience, coaching, counseling, and mentoring. Situational understanding requires individual and collective wisdom and judgment, often under demanding, chaotic circumstances, to discern what is actually so—the truth. With shared understanding and intent, Army professionals evaluate their options, decide the best course of action, and demonstrate the Army Value of service at all times.



Stewards of the Army Profession—Committed Professionals



Army professionals embrace and uphold the Army Values and standards of the profession, always accountable to each other and the American people for their decisions and actions.





1-67. Every Soldier and Army civilian has the duty to be a leader, follower, and steward of the Army profession. They are accountable to the American people to make decisions and accomplish the mission in accordance with the Army ethic. They hold themselves and others accountable to achieve standards and strive for excellence. They exemplify a life-long commitment to defend the American people and secure the national interest. In demonstrating the Army Values of honor and integrity, Army professionals uphold the Army ethic and conduct themselves in a manner worthy of their professional status.









Army professionals wisely use the resources entrusted to them, ensuring the Army is well-led and well-prepared, while caring for Soldiers, Army civilians, and families.





1-68. Soldiers and civilians are diligent and faithful guardians of the people, the resources, and the profession entrusted to their care. The privilege to lead includes the duty to professionally develop their subordinates. They teach, coach, counsel, and mentor, and willingly accept such guidance from others. They develop people and organizations—ensuring they are properly equipped, trained, and led. They are ready for the mission today and anticipate the challenges that lie ahead. They make disciplined use of materiel, facilities, and funds. In demonstrating the Army Value of service, they safeguard the health and welfare of their Soldiers, Army civilians, and families.



Army professionals continuously strengthen the essential characteristics of the Army profession, reinforcing the bond of trust with each other and the American people.





1-69. While the senior leader is responsible for what the team does or fails to do, success as a profession demands that all its members perform duty with discipline and to standard. They accomplish the mission with mutual trust as a cohesive team of Soldiers and Army civilians, collectively demonstrating the characteristics of their profession and earning the trust of their fellow citizens. Within the Army, leaders set the example, reinforce the culture of trust, establish professional organizational climates, and inspire their identity as trusted Army professionals. With character, competence, and commitment they demonstrate the Army Values of honor and integrity. As responsible stewards of the Army profession, they ensure the readiness of the Army, now and for the future.



THE ARMY VALUES

1-70. The Army Values embody the practical application of the Army Ethic. They encompass the enduring moral principles, beliefs, and laws that guide Army professionals in accomplishing the mission as well as their conduct in all aspects of life.

1-71. The Army Values are—

Loyalty: bear true faith and allegiance to the Constitution of the United States, the Army, your unit and other Soldiers.

Duty: fulfill your obligations.

Respect: treat people as they should be treated.

Selfless service: put the welfare of the nation, the Army, and your subordinates before your own.

Honor: live up to the Army Values.

Integrity: do what is right, legally and morally.

Personal courage: face fear, danger, or adversity.

1-72. All members aspire to achieve the Army Values professionally and personally. The Army Values are a compass needle, always pointing toward what the Nation demands of its Army. Often, the Army is the face of the Nation abroad. During conflict, the Army employs lethal violence in accordance with the law of armed conflict and rules of engagement under the most demanding conditions. This is an enormous responsibility and the people of the United States require the Army to adhere to its values and represent its interests across the range of military operations and the competition continuum. See chapter 2 for a detailed discussion of the Army Values.







Army OathsOath of EnlistmentI do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States against all enemies, foreign and domestic; that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same; and that I will obey the orders of the President of the United States and the orders of the officers appointed over me, according to regulations and the Uniform Code of Military Justice. So help me God.Oath of Office for commissioned officers and DA CiviliansI do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States against all enemies, foreign and domestic; that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same; that I take this obligation freely, without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion; and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office on which I am about to enter. So help me God.



Army Oaths

Oath of Enlistment

I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States against all enemies, foreign and domestic; that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same; and that I will obey the orders of the President of the United States and the orders of the officers appointed over me, according to regulations and the Uniform Code of Military Justice. So help me God.



Oath of Office for commissioned officers and DA Civilians

I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States against all enemies, foreign and domestic; that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same; that I take this obligation freely, without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion; and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office on which I am about to enter. So help me God.



ARMY LEADERSHIP

1-73. The Army experience over more than two centuries is that most people have leadership potential and can learn to be effective leaders. The ability to influence others is a central component of leadership. As a result, leader development has long been an Army priority (see FM 6-22 for more information regarding leader development). This development begins with education, training, and experience, and requires understanding about what Army leaders do and why

1-74. Leadership is the activity of influencing people by providing purpose, direction, and motivation to accomplish the mission and improve the organization. Leadership as an element of combat power, coupled with information, unifies the warfighting functions (movement and maneuver, intelligence, fires, sustainment, protection and command and control). Leadership focuses and synchronizes organizations. Leaders inspire people to become energized and motivated to achieve desired outcomes. An Army leader is anyone who by virtue of assumed role or assigned responsibility inspires and influences people by providing purpose, direction, and motivation to accomplish the mission and improve the organization.



INFLUENCING

1-75. Influencing is persuading people do what is necessary. Influencing entails more than simply passing along orders. Through words and personal example, leaders inspire purpose, provide direction, and when required motivation.



PURPOSE

1-76. Leaders provide clear purpose for their subordinates. Purpose gives subordinates a reason to achieve a desired outcome. Leaders convey purpose through direct means such as requests, directives, or orders. Leaders inspire subordinates to do their best by instilling a higher purpose that rises above self-interest. They explain why something should or must be done and provide context whenever possible. Subordinates who understand why they are doing something difficult and discern the higher purpose are more likely to do the right thing when leaders are not present to direct their every action.



DIRECTION

1-77. Direction is telling others what to do. Providing effective direction requires that leaders communicate the desired end state for the direction they provide. To accomplish a mission, leaders prioritize tasks, assign responsibility, supervise, and ensure subordinates perform to standard. They ensure subordinates clearly understand their guidance, while allowing subordinates the opportunity to demonstrate initiative within the overall commander's intent. Providing clear direction allows subordinate initiative to adapt their tasks within the commander’s intent when circumstances change.







1-78. The Army requires leaders who provide direction and subordinates who can execute without the need for continuous guidance. The Army needs leaders who understand, train, and employ mission command during the course of their duties. Mission command is the Army’s approach to command and control that empowers subordinate decision making and decentralized execution appropriate to the situation (ADP 6-0). Mission command recognizes that no single person in an organization or unit can make every important decision at every critical moment, nor can a single person keep up with the number of simultaneous decisions organizations require during combat or other time-constrained environments. See ADP 6-0 for further discussion about mission command.



MOTIVATION

1-79. Motivation is the will and initiative to do what is necessary to accomplish a mission. While motivation comes from within, others’ actions and words affect it. A leader’s role in motivation is at times to understand others’ needs and desires, to align and elevate individual desires into team goals, and to inspire others to accomplish those larger goals, even if it means risking their lives. At other times, such as time constrained or dangerous situations, the leader gets subordinates to do things quickly and explain the reasons why later.

1-80. Indirect approaches to motivation can be as successful as direct approaches. Setting a personal example can sustain the drive in others. This becomes apparent when leaders share hardship and risk with subordinates. Leaders who personally share hardship and risk demonstrate to subordinates that they are invested in the outcome and willing and able to do what they ask subordinates to do. Indirect approaches such as these build confidence about the judgment, commitment, and attitude of the leader.

1-81. How leaders motivate others matters. There are practices that are always positive, while others are good or bad depending on the context of the situation. There are those who can inspire others to act because they respect the leader’s judgment, respect that the leader earned. Earning this type of personal respect takes time, so leaders may need to motivate others initially based upon the authorities and respect inherent in their duty position. In either case, leaders should be judicious about using pressure or threat of punishment when motivating others, because doing so too often or when unnecessary breeds resentment and low morale. Aspiring leaders observe many different methods others use to motivate subordinates, and should remember and practice those that were most effective while avoiding those that negatively affected an organization.

Colonel Robert B. NettNear Cognon, Leyte, Philippine Islands—14 December 1944 Then-Lieutenant Nett commanded Company E, 305th Infantry during an attack against a reinforced enemy battalion, which had held up the American advance for two days from entrenched positions. With another infantry company and armored vehicles, Company E advanced against heavy machinegun and small arms fire with LT Nett spearheading the assault. During fierce hand-to-hand encounters, he killed seven Japanese and, although seriously wounded, led his men forward, refusing to relinquish command. He was severely wounded again, but, unwilling to retire, pressed ahead with his troops to assure capture of the objective. Wounded again in the final assault, he arranged for the resumption of the advance before turning over his command, then walked unaided to the rear for medical treatment. LT Nett’s remarkable courage in continuing to lead through sheer determination despite successive wounds, LT Nett provided an inspiring example for his company and was instrumental in the capture of a vital strongpoint. For this action, he received the Medal of Honor.



Colonel Robert B. Nett

Near Cognon, Leyte, Philippine Islands—14 December 1944 Then-Lieutenant Nett commanded Company E, 305th Infantry during an attack against a reinforced enemy battalion, which had held up the American advance for two days from entrenched positions. With another infantry company and armored vehicles, Company E advanced against heavy machinegun and small arms fire with LT Nett spearheading the assault. During fierce hand-to-hand encounters, he killed seven Japanese and, although seriously wounded, led his men forward, refusing to relinquish command. He was severely wounded again, but, unwilling to retire, pressed ahead with his troops to assure capture of the objective. Wounded again in the final assault, he arranged for the resumption of the advance before turning over his command, then walked unaided to the rear for medical treatment. LT Nett’s remarkable courage in continuing to lead through sheer determination despite successive wounds, LT Nett provided an inspiring example for his company and was instrumental in the capture of a vital strongpoint. For this action, he received the Medal of Honor.





ARMY LEADERSHIP REQUIREMENTS MODEL

1-82. The leadership requirements model is grounded in historical experience and determinations of what works best for the Army. Army research supports the model’s completeness and validity. The model identifies core competencies and attributes applicable to all types and echelons of Army organizations. The model conveys expectations and establishes the capabilities needed of all Army leaders regardless of rank, grade, uniform, or attire. Collectively, the leadership requirements model is a significant contributor to individual and unit readiness and effectiveness.

1-83. As a common leadership model for the Army, the leadership requirements model aligns expectations with leader development activities and personnel management practices and systems. Understanding the expectations and applying the attributes and competencies prepares leaders for the situations they are most likely to encounter. The model informs leaders of the enduring capabilities needed regardless of echelon, mission, or assignment. All model components are interrelated and relate to the Department of Defense (DOD) civilian leader development framework found in DODI 1430.16.

1-84. The model’s components center on what a leader is (attributes—BE and KNOW) and what a leader does (competencies—DO). A leader’s character, presence, and intellect enable them to apply the core leader competencies and enhance their proficiency. Leaders who gain expertise through operational assignments, institutional learning, and self-development will be versatile enough to adapt to most situations and grow into greater responsibilities. Figure 1-3 illustrates the framework.

1-85. A major distinction between the attributes and competencies of the leadership requirements model is that competencies are skills that can be trained and developed while attributes encompass enduring personal characteristics, which are molded through experience over time. A Soldier can be trained to be an effective machine gunner, but may not necessarily be a brave machine gunner without additional experience. Every educational, operational, and self-development event is an opportunity for observation, feedback, and reflection.



Figure 1-3. The Army leadership requirements model







CORE LEADER ATTRIBUTES

1-86. Attributes are characteristics internal to a leader. These affect how an individual behaves, thinks, and learns within certain conditions. Strong character, solid presence, and keen intellect enable individuals to perform the core leader competencies with greater effect. The three categories of core attributes are—

Character: the moral and ethical qualities of the leader.

Presence: characteristics open to display by the leader and open to viewing by others.

Intellect: the mental and social abilities the leader applies while leading.



CORE LEADER COMPETENCIES

1-87. The core leader competencies are actions that the Army expects leaders to do: lead, develop, and achieve. Competencies provide an enduring, clear, and consistent way of conveying expectations for Army leaders. The core competencies are universal for all Army leaders. The core competency categories are—

Leads: provides purpose, direction, and motivation; builds trust; provides an example; communicates.

Develops: develops themselves, creates a positive climate, develops subordinates, and stewards the profession.

Achieves: executes, adjusts, and gets results to accomplish tasks and missions on time and to standard.

1-88. The core leader competencies make up a core set. Figure 1-4 depicts similarities and distinctions among core leader competencies, demonstrates how competencies fall into three categories and that each represents different leader actions. For instance, Army leaders are expected to develop themselves (prepares self), develop others, ensure unit readiness (create a positive environment) and sustain the Army as a whole (stewards the profession).



Figure 1-4. Navigating leader competencies





DYNAMICS OF LEADERSHIP

1-89. The most effective leaders adapt their approach to the mission, the organization, and the situation. A division commander addressing brigade commanders before conducting large-scale combat operations leads and communicates differently than a drill sergeant training new recruits in basic training. Constant change affects peacetime and combat operations. Personnel change out. Timelines move. Anticipated resources do not materialize. Adversaries do what was least expected. Weather keeps CAS assets grounded. Commanders, leaders, and staffs plan for possible changes and continually monitor progress to engage as needed. Leaders account for the important factors affecting the dynamics of leadership. Three consistent factors are—

The leader.

The led.

The situation.



THE LEADER

1-90. An Army leader influences others to accomplish missions. A leader has the opportunity to lead when assigned responsibility, assuming a role, or being an informal leader within a team. Leaders motivate people both inside and outside the chain of command toward action or to change their thinking when appropriate. Formally or informally, regardless of position or rank, all Army members can find themselves in situations to lead and influence others. Leaders who adapt their actions based on the dynamics of a situation achieve the best possible outcomes. Leaders take into account the level of their experience or skill, and their authority.

1-91. Everyone has an identity or a way they see themselves. Leaders internalize the roles, responsibilities, and actions that they understand of a leader to be, know, and do. Leaders who are unsure of themselves filling the role of a leader will be limited until they have confidence. Without a clear leader identity, others will question the type of leader they are, what they stand for, and the way they conduct themselves. What a leader believes about their role as a leader serves as a constant guide to behave as a leader of good character. Practice identifying as a leader—doing the right things in the right way—becomes habitual and helps junior personnel along the path to becoming seasoned, effective leaders.

1-92. Self-awareness is fundamental to understanding one’s abilities. Leaders should know their strengths and weaknesses: what they do or do not know, what they are or are not skilled at, and what is in their span of control. Even though they should be self-aware, not all leaders are. Leaders vary in their proficiency levels in attributes and competencies and their preparation for each situation. Leaders require self-awareness if they are to accurately assess their own experience and competence as well as earn the trust of those they influence. Being self-aware means seeing one’s self as viewed by others and understanding the levels of influence one is likely to have with followers. For instance, a newly assigned company commander understands that participating with Soldiers on a 12-mile ruck-march builds subordinates’ respect for the leader and builds the leader’s credibility with them. Awareness allows one to adjust one's leadership actions in the moment and know what areas to improve for the future.

1-93. Leaders have different responsibilities and authorities that can vary with duty positions and missions. Authority to lead is either formally derived from rank or position or is informal, such as when influencing peers or coalition partners. Formal authority allows use of commitment and compliance through the methods of influence (see chapter 5). Informal authority primarily relies on obtaining commitment from others.



Formal Leadership

1-94. Formal leadership authority is granted to individuals by virtue of assignment to positions of responsibility, according to their rank and experience. The Uniform Code of Military Justice supports military leaders in positions of legitimate authority. Formal leaders exercise their authority over subordinates through lawful orders and directives. An Army leader operates with clear expectations regarding conduct so that indiscipline does not jeopardize mission success. Leaders, through formally assigned authorities and clearly communicated standards, are responsible for ensuring adherence to standards, policies, and codes. Team leaders, squad leaders, platoon leaders, staff officers, commanders, and civilian supervisors are all examples of leaders in positions with formal designations of authority.







1-95. Command is the authority that a commander in the armed forces lawfully exercises over subordinates by virtue of rank or assignment (JP 1). Command includes the authority and responsibility for effectively using available resources and for planning the employment of, organizing, directing, coordinating, and controlling military forces for the accomplishment of assigned missions. Command also includes responsibility for health, welfare, morale, and discipline of assigned personnel.

1-96. In Army organizations, commanders establish standards and policies for achieving and rewarding exemplary performance, as well as for punishing misconduct. Military commanders enforce lawful orders under the Uniform Code of Military Justice. Consequently, commanders' personalities profoundly affect organizations. The Army expects leaders selected for command to lead beyond mere exercise of formal authority. They lead by example and serve as role models. Their personal example and actions carry tremendous weight.

1-97. Command is personal. In Army regulations and doctrine, an individual, not an institution or group, is given the authority to command. The legal and ethical responsibilities of a commander exceed those of any other leader of similar rank serving in a staff position or as a civilian manager. The relationships among commanders and subordinate officers, noncommissioned officers, enlisted Soldiers, and DA Civilians is distinct. Those not in command must understand that the commander alone is responsible for what their command does or fails to do. Subordinates have the responsibility to support the commander’s intent for their command, unit, or organization.



Informal Leadership

1-98. Informal leadership exists throughout organizations and plays an important role in mission accomplishment. Informal leadership is not exercised based on rank or position in the organization. It stems from personal initiative, special knowledge, unique experiences, or technical expertise specific to an individual or team. Informal leadership occurs when someone takes the initiative to assume responsibility for action in a situation, takes charge when no formal leader is present, or to make formal leaders aware of something they need to know. Informal leaders contribute to team success.

1-99. Informal networks arise both inside and outside organizations. These informal networks include the noncommissioned officer (NCO) support channel. To build cohesive teams, leaders interact with both formal and informal teams, including the traditional chain of command and technical channels combining commanders and staff officers. The collaboration of first sergeants within a battalion is also an example of an informal network. Informal networks that operate in support of organizational goals are a force multiplier. Conversely, informal networks that operate at cross-purposes to the chain of command are destructive to an organization and intolerable.



THE LED

1-100. The led are an important factor in leadership. Leaders, who consider their strengths along with subordinates’ capabilities and the situational demands of missions, create the best chance at accomplishing tasks and missions. Inexperienced subordinates and those with limited competence require greater oversight and control. Seasoned, competent subordinates require less oversight and control.

1-101. Experience, competence, and commitment of those led vary with the mission and situation. For example, people with significant combat experience may be overly capable to perform a mission, but their commitment may lag if they do not consider the mission worth risking life or limb. Commitment varies with trust in the leader directing the mission. Trust between the leader and the led can vary across situations. A leader applies greater control over some subordinates than others. Generally, when subordinates have greater levels of expertise and commitment, leaders trust and empower them.

1-102. Every Army leader is a subordinate to someone, so all leaders are also followers. Each Soldier and DA Civilian begins service by swearing an oath of service that subordinates him or her to the Nation’s civilian leadership (see page 1-3). This obligation remains throughout a career regardless of position or rank attained. Effective Army organizations depend on the willingness of their leaders and their subordinates to serve faithfully and competently in both leadership and followership roles.







1-103. Followers respond to the authority of a leader and specific direction. Following is more than just doing what one is told to do. Motivation is an aspect of following. Effective followership requires an ability to take the initiative to get things done when necessary. Effective leaders learn to be trusted followers. Teaching weapons maintenance provides an example. New Soldiers clean their rifles how and when instructed to do so. Experienced Soldiers routinely clean their weapon without being told so that it will function when needed. This simple discipline of doing the right thing when no one is looking is fundamental to following.

1-104. There is a tendency to think of people as either a leader or subordinate, but leading and following are simultaneous responsibilities. This is particularly true in a hierarchical organization like the Army. Everyone charged with leading others has a responsibility to follow their superior in the chain of command. Being an effective follower requires the same attributes and competencies required to be an effective leader, although application is different. When following, Army leaders respond to their superiors’ authority and guidance. The principles of mission command capture this: leaders empower followers, by fostering mutual trust and creating shared understanding, to take initiative based on the commander’s intent. The subordinate leader transitions from follower to leader as they take action and direct their followers.



THE SITUATION

1-105. The situation affects which actions leaders take. Leaders consider the unique characteristics of the task or mission at hand, the abilities of their subordinates, their familiarity with similar situations, and amount of time available. High-risk or urgent situations often require immediate and decisive actions, particularly in combat. Low-risk or slowly developing situations allow leaders to spend more time with deliberate and collaborative approaches, coaching, and teaching subordinates as they go along. This fosters a higher level of commitment, develops subordinates, and creates the organizational cohesion essential for leading successfully in challenging situations.

1-106. Leaders learn to adapt to the situation by disciplining themselves to practice different approaches. This prepares leaders to adapt to new, urgent, stressful, or high-risk situations. In general, leaders should strive to improve all of the leader attributes and core leadership competencies, adapt their leadership techniques to each situation, and become lifelong learners. This requires leaders to—

Know how to assess tasks and conditions.

Know how to assess their own capabilities and those of their followers.

Know how to adjust their leadership techniques.

Know those they lead.

Understand how to employ the mission command approach to the situation.

Develop themselves and the competence of subordinates.

Establish and maintain positive leadership climates.

The Reluctant Machine GunnerIraq in 2003 was the first combat experience for many. SSG Jones was new to combat, as were all members of the squad. They had not seen any action until they arrived in Ramadi. While clearing a section of buildings, they came under fire. SSG Jones directed his M249 machine gunners to suppress an enemy position in an adjacent building. One gunner did not engage. SSG Jones again directed his machine gunner to engage; he did not. SSG Jones calmly moved to the gunner’s position, took the machine gun, and fired a burst. SSG Jones handed the weapon to the machine gunner and said, “Suppress that position.” The gunner did and did not hesitate again.Here the squad leader instinctively knew what it would take to get the subordinate to act. Because the squad leader understood the gunner the squad leader did not have to threaten, belittle, or remove him from combat. The squad leader just had to show that what needed to be done, could be done.



The Reluctant Machine Gunner

Iraq in 2003 was the first combat experience for many. SSG Jones was new to combat, as were all members of the squad. They had not seen any action until they arrived in Ramadi. While clearing a section of buildings, they came under fire. SSG Jones directed his M249 machine gunners to suppress an enemy position in an adjacent building. One gunner did not engage. SSG Jones again directed his machine gunner to engage; he did not. SSG Jones calmly moved to the gunner’s position, took the machine gun, and fired a burst. SSG Jones handed the weapon to the machine gunner and said, “Suppress that position.” The gunner did and did not hesitate again.

Here the squad leader instinctively knew what it would take to get the subordinate to act. Because the squad leader understood the gunner the squad leader did not have to threaten, belittle, or remove him from combat. The squad leader just had to show that what needed to be done, could be done.





ROLES OF LEADERSHIP

1-107. Every individual in the Army is a member of a team, as a leader or a follower. Each leadership role and responsibility is unique, yet leaders interact in common ways. The Army is comprised of Soldiers and DA Civilians. Soldiers are officers, NCOs, and enlisted. The Department of the Army employs DA Civilians and, like Soldiers, are members of the executive branch of the federal government. The Army charges all members to support and defend the Constitution against all enemies, foreign and domestic. They all take oaths to the Constitution that commit them to follow the laws of the Nation and orders of those appointed over them. Army professionals who embrace and live the Army Values are role models and standard-bearers for the organization. Army leaders come from three different categories—

Officers.

Noncommissioned officers.

DA Civilians.



OFFICERS

1-108. Officers command units, establish policy, and manage resources while balancing risks and caring for their people and families. They integrate collective, leader, and Soldier training to accomplish the Army's missions. They serve at all levels, from leading tactical unit operations to leading change at strategic levels. Command makes officers responsible and accountable for everything their command does or fails to do.

1-109. The technical characteristic that distinguishes officers (including warrant officers) the most is that they hold their grade and office under a commission or appointment issued by the authority of the President of the United States or the Secretary of the Army. They receive commissions based upon the basis of special trust and confidence placed in the officer's patriotism, valor, fidelity, and abilities. An officer's commission grants authority to direct subordinates and subsequently, an obligation to obey superiors.

1-110. Serving as an officer differs from other forms of Army leadership by the measure of responsibility attached, and in the magnitude of the consequences of inaction or ineffectiveness. An enlisted leader swears an oath of obedience to lawful orders, while an officer promises to, "well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office” (see page 1-2). Officers maintain the momentum of operations. While officers depend on the counsel, technical skill, maturity, and experience of subordinates to translate their orders into action, they are ultimately responsible for mission success.

1-111. Warrant officers possess a high degree of specialization in a particular field in contrast to the more general assignment pattern of other officers. Warrant officers may command aircraft, maritime vessels, and special units. Warrant officers provide expert tactical and technical advice, knowledge, counsel, and solutions to support their unit or organization. They maintain, administer, and manage the Army's equipment, support activities, and technical systems. Their extensive professional experience and technical knowledge qualifies warrant officers as invaluable role models and mentors for officers and NCOs.

1-112. While warrant officer positions are usually functionally oriented, warrant officers may lead and direct Soldiers. Senior warrant officers provide the commander with the benefit of years of tactical and technical experience. Warrant officers functioning at senior levels become systems experts rather than equipment experts. They must understand the conditions and know how to integrate the systems they manage into complex operational environments.



NONCOMMISSIONED OFFICERS

1-113. Noncommissioned officers are the backbone of the Army and are responsible for maintaining Army standards and discipline. NCOs are critical to training, educating, and developing individuals, crews, and small teams. NCOs are accountable for the care of their Soldiers and setting examples for them.

1-114. The Army relies on NCOs capable of conducting daily operations, executing small unit tactical operations, and making commander’s intent-driven decisions. Subordinates look to NCOs for solutions, guidance, and inspiration. Soldiers count on NCOs they trust and admire. They expect them to convey information and provide day-to-day guidance to accomplish tactical and technical tasks. All Soldiers look to NCOs to train them to cope, prepare, and perform courageously regardless of the situation.







1-115. While preparing Soldiers for missions, NCOs stress fieldcraft and physical and mental rigor. NCOs understand that improved warfighting technology will not reduce the need for mentally and physically fit Soldiers. Soldiers will continue to carry heavy loads, and engage enemy forces in close combat. Tactical success relates directly to the Soldiers' level of tactical and technical training, as well as their fitness and resiliency. Soldier care includes preparing them for future challenges and adversity. ATP 6-22.5 contains material related to Soldier care.

1-116. NCOs are trainers, mentors, communicators, and advisors. NCOs advise and assist in the development of officers by sharing their experience and professional judgment. They form professional and personal bonds with officers based on mutual trust and common goals. Commanders at all levels have senior enlisted advisors who provide advice and serve as an important source of knowledge about enlisted matters, as well as experts about tactical and technical questions. At the highest level, the Sergeant Major of the Army is the Army Chief of Staff's personal advisor who recommends policy to support Soldiers throughout the Army.

First Sergeant Conrad Schmidt Winchester, Virginia—19 September 1864The 2d Cavalry Regiment was reeling from tremendous losses during the Battle of Winchester, Virginia when the regimental commander, Captain Theodore Rhodenbough, had his horse shot from under him within a few yards of the Confederate entrenchments. Then-Orderly Sergeant Conrad Schmidt recognized the danger the regimental commander was in, disregarded his own safety, and rode to the commander’s assistance. Schmidt dragged Rhodenbough up on the rear of his horse, brought him to safety under an extreme volley of gunfire, and returned Rhodenbough to command of the regiment. Schmidt’s actions earned him the Medal of Honor.



First Sergeant Conrad Schmidt Winchester, Virginia—19 September 1864

The 2d Cavalry Regiment was reeling from tremendous losses during the Battle of Winchester, Virginia when the regimental commander, Captain Theodore Rhodenbough, had his horse shot from under him within a few yards of the Confederate entrenchments. Then-Orderly Sergeant Conrad Schmidt recognized the danger the regimental commander was in, disregarded his own safety, and rode to the commander’s assistance. Schmidt dragged Rhodenbough up on the rear of his horse, brought him to safety under an extreme volley of gunfire, and returned Rhodenbough to command of the regiment. Schmidt’s actions earned him the Medal of Honor.



DEPARTMENT OF THE ARMY CIVILIANS

1-117. Department of the Army Civilians are professionals committed to serving the Nation as an integral part of the Army team. They provide mission-essential capability, stability, and continuity to support Soldiers. DA Civilians are committed to honorable service in the performance of their duties. The Army Civilian Corps Creed affirms their role as members of the Army team and their special contribution to organizational stability and continuity. Major roles and responsibilities of DA Civilians include—

Establishing and executing policy.

Leading Army organizations and managing programs, projects, and systems.

Operating activities and facilities for Army equipment, support, research, and technical work supporting the Army around the world.

1-118. Selection of DA Civilians to a government position depends on their eligibility based on their credentials and expertise. Proficiency derives from previous education and training, prior experiences, and ties to career programs. DA Civilians hold the grade of the position in which they serve and primarily exercise authority based on the position held, not their grade. DA Civilians do not exercise military command, however when designated they may exercise general supervision over an Army installation or activity under the command of a military superior.

1-119. Civilian personnel have functional proponents for career fields that ensure provisions exist for career growth and are free to pursue positions and promotions as desired. Personnel policies generally state that DA Civilians should be in positions that do not require military personnel for reasons of law, training, security, discipline, rotation, or combat readiness. DA Civilians, many with uniformed military experience, bring a wealth of knowledge and experience to the Army team.

1-120. While most DA Civilians historically support military forces at home stations, they also deploy with military forces to provide expertise and support. DA Civilians often remain for long periods within the same organization, providing continuity and stability that the dynamic personnel management system used for the military rarely allows.





LEVELS OF LEADERSHIP

1-121.  The Army acknowledges three levels of leadership—

Direct.

Organizational.

Strategic.

1-122. The leader attributes and competencies apply across all leadership levels. The concept of subordination helps members understand the expectations the Army has for them across a career. Foundations include understanding oaths, dignity and respect for all people, the Army Values, leadership, command, authority, Army operations, military discipline, and similar basics (see figure 1-5). Leaders gain a firmer understanding of the enduring requirements and add specialized knowledge as they move through the levels.



Figure 1-5. Army leadership levels.



1-123. Factors determining a leadership level include the leader’s relationship to a subordinate, number of subordinates, scope of responsibility, and time horizons of missions. Regardless of which level they serve in, a leader is always a direct leader. Direct leaders are task oriented. Organizational leaders are both task and mission oriented and lead through subordinate leaders. Army organizations execute missions and tasks. Strategic leaders apply a global, regional, national, and societal perspective to the organizations they lead. Organizational and strategic leaders lead through others. Rank does not generally determine the difference between organizational and strategic leaders, positions do. The Sergeant Major of the Army is a sergeant major. A battalion sergeant major is also a sergeant major. While there are significant differences in seniority and responsibilities, they are both sergeant majors. Junior leaders and some DA Civilians serve at the direct leadership level. NCOs and officers that direct other leaders to accomplish tasks are organizational leaders. Generally, senior grade and general officers and equivalent senior executive service DA Civilians and their sergeants major serve at the organizational or strategic leadership levels.



DIRECT LEADERSHIP

1-124. Direct leadership is face-to-face or first-line leadership that generally occurs in organizations where subordinates see their leaders all the time such as teams, squads, sections, platoons, departments, companies, batteries, and troops. The direct leader's span of influence may range from a few to dozens of people. The leader's day-to-day involvement is important for successful unit performance. Direct level leadership covers the same type of functions, such as those performed by an infantry squad or a graves registration unit.







1-125. Direct leaders develop others through coaching, counseling, mentoring, and setting the example. For instance, company grade officers and NCOs are close enough to Soldiers to exert direct influence when observing training or interacting with subordinates during other functions.

1-126. Direct leaders generally experience more certainty and less complexity than organizational and strategic leaders because of their close physical proximity to their subordinates. They direct actions, assign tasks, teach, coach, encourage, give guidance, and ensure successful completion of tasks or missions. They must be close enough to the action to determine or address problems. Examples of direct leadership tasks are vehicle maintenance, supervision of creating of fighting positions, and performance counseling.

1-127. Direct leaders understand the mission of their higher headquarters two levels up and when applicable the tasks assigned one level down. This provides them with the context in which they perform their duties.



ORGANIZATIONAL LEADERSHIP

1-128. Organizational leaders exercise leadership through subordinate leaders responsible for leading the various organizations that make up the larger organization. Organizational leaders establish a climate that supports their subordinate leaders. Subordinate units and organizations do not depend on daily guidance from their higher-level leaders to be successful. Organizational leaders, particularly commanders, are responsible for communicating intent two echelons down and understanding intent two echelons up. Organizational leaders operate within commanders’ intent and communicate that intent to subordinates as a means of providing room for subordinate initiative and decreasing the number of decisions they must personally make to keep the organization operating effectively. Organizational leadership includes responsibility over multiple functions, such as leading and synchronizing combined arms operations.

1-129. Organizational leaders regularly and personally interact with their subordinates. They make time to verify that reports and briefings match their own perceptions of the organization's progress toward mission accomplishment. Organizational leaders use personal observation and visits by designated personnel to assess how well subordinates understand the commander's intent and to determine if they need to reinforce or reassess the organization's priorities.



STRATEGIC LEADERSHIP

1-130. Strategic leaders include military and civilian leaders at the major command through DOD levels. Strategic leadership guides and integrates multiple organizational level units that perform a wide range of functions. It influences several thousand to hundreds of thousands of people. These leaders allocate resources, communicate strategic vision, and prepare their commands and the Army itself for future missions. Strategic leaders shape Army culture by ensuring their directives, policies, programs, and systems are ethical, effective, and efficient.

1-131. Strategic leaders apply all core leader competencies they acquired as direct and organizational leaders, while further adapting them to the complex realities of their strategic conditions. Strategic leader decisions must consider congressional hearings, Army budgetary constraints, new systems acquisition, civilian programs, research, development, and inter-service cooperation. Every strategic leader decision has the potential of affecting the entire Army.

1-132. Strategic leaders are important catalysts for change and transformation. Because they follow a longterm approach to planning, preparing, executing, and assessing, they often do not see their ideas come to fruition during their tenure. Army modernization is an example where long-range strategic planning is necessary. Relying on many subordinate leader teams, the Army depends on organizational leaders to endorse the long-term strategic vision and ensure it reaches all of the Army. Because they exert influence primarily through their senior staffs and subordinates, strategic leaders must have excellent judgment when selecting and developing subordinates for critical duty positions.



















































This page intentionally left blank.







PART ONE

The Army Leader: Person of Character, Presence, and Intellect

Part One highlights the critical attribute categories of character, presence, and intellect. All Army leaders use them to reach their full potential from direct leader to strategic leader. The attributes support leadership actions valuable for continued development and effective performance.









Chapter 2

Character



FOUNDATIONS OF ARMY LEADER CHARACTER

A person’s character affects how they lead. A leader’s character consists of their true nature guided by their conscience, which affects their moral attitudes and actions. A leader’s personal reputation is what others view as character. Leaders who firmly adhere to applicable laws, regulations, and unit standards build credibility with their subordinates and enhance trust of the Nation they serve.

Influences such as background, beliefs, education, and experiences affect all Soldiers and DA Civilians. An Army leader’s role in developing others’ character would be simple if it merely required checking and aligning personal values with the Army Values. Reality is much different. Becoming and remaining a leader of character is a process involving day-to-day experiences and internal fortitude. While education, self-development, counseling, coaching, and mentoring can refine the outward signs of character, modifying deeply held values is the only way to change character. Leaders are responsible for their own character and for encouraging, supporting, and assessing their subordinates’ efforts to embody character.

Character consists of the moral and ethical qualities of an individual revealed through their decisions and actions. Leaders must consistently demonstrate good character and inspire others to do the same. The close teamwork demanded to execute military missions at all levels requires that everyone in the Army share certain desirable character attributes. A summary of the character attributes are shown in table 2-1 (see page 2-12). Character attributes that are of special interest to the Army and its leaders are—

Army Values.

Empathy.

Warrior Ethos and Service Ethos.

Discipline.

Humility.



ARMY VALUES

Personal values develop over the years from childhood to adulthood. People are free to choose and hold their own values, but upon taking the oath of service, Soldiers and DA Civilians agree to live and act by the Army Values. Army Values consist of the principles, standards, and qualities considered essential for







service. The Army Values set expectations for conduct and are fundamental to making the right decision in any situation. Living, teaching, and reinforcing Army Values is an important leader responsibility.

The Army recognizes seven values that all Soldiers and DA Civilians must internalize. Embracing the Army Values is the hallmark of being an Army professional. Doing so represents a pact with teammates and the American people to be trustworthy and accountable. When read in sequence, the first letters of the Army Values form the acronym LDRSHIP:

Loyalty.

Duty.

Respect.

Selfless service.

Honor.

Integrity.

Personal courage.



LOYALTY: BEAR TRUE FAITH AND ALLEGIANCE TO THE U.S. CONSTITUTION, THE ARMY,

your unit and other Soldiers.

The first order of loyalty is to the Constitution and the ideals upon which it is based. One cannot remain loyal to the Constitution by being loyal to those who violate it. To create strong organizations, superiors, subordinates, and peers must embrace loyalty. One way that individuals demonstrate loyalty is by upholding all of the Army values. With those values as a foundation, loyalty is a two-way exchange: leaders earn loyalty and subordinates expect loyalty in return. Leaders earn subordinates’ loyalty by training them well, treating them fairly, and living the Army Values. Subordinates demonstrate loyalty by working hard for their leaders and being as good as they can be at their jobs. Loyalty and trust enable the successful day-to-day operations of all organizations.



DUTY: FULFILL YOUR OBLIGATIONS—ALWAYS DO YOUR BEST.

All Soldiers and DA Civilians strive to do their best. Duty extends beyond law, regulation, and orders. Army professionals exercise initiative when they fulfill the purpose, not merely the letter, of received orders. Leaders take responsibility for their actions and those of their subordinates; it is inherent in their duty to the larger organization, the Army, and the Nation. Conscientious leaders and subordinates possess a sense of responsibility to apply their best efforts to accomplish the mission. This guides Soldiers and DA Civilians to do what is right to the best of their ability.









General Jonathan M. Wainwright Corregidor Captivity

The Japanese invaded the Philippines in December 1941. In March 1942, as General Douglas MacArthur evacuated to Australia, General Jonathan Wainwright assumed full command from the Malinta Tunnel on Corregidor Island.

Soon, the Japanese grip on the islands tightened and the Philippine defenders at Bataan were surrounded without any support other than artillery fire from Corregidor. Disease, exhaustion, and malnutrition ultimately accomplished what thousands of Japanese soldiers had not done for 90 days—Bataan was lost; more than 12,000 Filipino Scouts and 17,000 Americans became prisoners. Corregidor was in bad shape.

General Wainwright directed the defenses with the limited resources available, making frequent visits outside the tunnels to check on his men and to inspire them personally. He was never fearful of enemy fire. A tenacious warrior, he saw men next to him die and personally returned fire on the enemy. He was a unique frontline commander—a fighting general who earned the loyalty of his troops by sharing their hardships.

General Wainwright and his steadfast troops on Corregidor were the last organized resistance in the Philippines. After holding unsupported against the Japanese for a full six months, Wainwright had exhausted all possible means of resistance—no outside help could be expected.

On 6 May 1942, General Wainwright notified his command of his intent to surrender and sent a message to the President of the United States explaining the painful decision. He was proud of his country and his men and he had been forthright and loyal to both. His Soldiers had come to love, admire, and willingly obey the fighting general. President Roosevelt reassured General Wainwright in one of his last messages to him saying, “You and your devoted followers have become the living symbol of our war aims and the guarantee of victory.”

When the Japanese attempted to humiliate him personally by forcing him to march through the ranks of his defeated force, Wainwright’s Soldiers once again demonstrated loyalty and respect for their leader by struggling to their feet and saluting as he passed by.

During more than three years of captivity as the highest-ranking and oldest American prisoner of war in World War II, General Wainwright kept faith and loyalty with his fellow prisoners suffering deprivation, humiliation, abuse, and torture.

Despite his steadfast posture in captivity, he feared return to America, expecting to be considered a coward and a traitor for his Corregidor surrender. Americans at home remained loyal to the fighting general and his courageous troops. To honor him and his men, General Wainwright stood behind General MacArthur during the signing of Japan’s official surrender on the USS Missouri on 2 September 1945.

General Wainwright returned home to a hero’s welcome. During a ceremony on 10 September 1945, President Truman awarded him the Medal of Honor.





RESPECT: TREAT PEOPLE AS THEY SHOULD BE TREATED.

The Army Values reinforce that all people have dignity and worth and must be treated with respect. The Nation was founded on the ideal that all are created equal. In the Army, each is judged by the content of their character. Army leaders should consistently foster a climate that treats everyone with dignity and respect, regardless of ethnicity, gender identity, sexual orientation, creed, or religious belief. Fostering a positive climate begins with a leader’s personal example. Leaders treat others, including adversaries, with respect.







The discipline which makes the soldiers of a free country reliable in battle is not to be gained by harsh or tyrannical treatment. On the contrary, such treatment is far more likely to destroy than to make an army. It is possible to impart instruction and to give commands in such manner and such a tone of voice to inspire in the soldier no feeling but an intense desire to obey, while the opposite manner and tone of voice cannot fail to excite strong resentment and a desire to disobey. The one mode or the other of dealing with subordinates springs from a corresponding spirit in the breast of the commander. He who feels the respect which is due to others cannot fail to inspire in them regard for himself, while he who feels, and hence manifests, disrespect toward others, especially his inferiors, cannot fail to inspire hatred against himself.

Major General John M. Schofield Address to the United States Corps of Cadets, 11 August 1879



SELFLESS SERVICE: PUT THE WELFARE OF THE NATION, THE ARMY, AND YOUR SUBORDINATES BEFORE YOUR OWN.

Selfless service means doing what is right for the Nation, the Army, the organization, and subordinates. While the needs of the Army and the Nation should come first, selfless service does not imply leaders should neglect their families or themselves. Unselfish, humble leaders set themselves apart as teammates who are approachable, trustworthy, and open to follower input and advice. Selfless leaders aspire to attain goals for the greater good, beyond their own interests and benefits.



HONOR: LIVE UP TO ARMY VALUES.

Living honorably, in line with the Army Values, sets an example for every member of the organization and contributes to an organization’s positive climate and morale. How leaders conduct themselves and meet their obligations to the mission, other people, and the organization defines them as people and leaders.

Sergeant David B. Bleak Minari-gol, Korea—14 June 1952SGT David B. Bleak, a medical aidman, volunteered to accompany a combat patrol tasked to capture enemy forces for interrogation. While moving up the rugged slope of Hill 499, the patrol came under intense automatic weapons and small arms fire multiple times, suffering several casualties. Enemy fired at SGT Bleak from a nearby trench while he tended the wounded.Determined to protect the wounded, the brave aidman faced the enemy, entered the trench, and killed three enemy soldiers with his bare hands. While exiting, a concussion grenade fell in front of a fellow Soldier. Bleak shifted to shield him from the blast.Disregarding his own injury, he carried the most severely wounded Soldier down the hillside. Attacked by two enemy soldiers, Bleak lowered the wounded man, put both adversaries out of action by slamming their heads together, and then carried the wounded American Soldier to safety.SGT Bleak’s courageous actions saved fellow Soldiers’ lives and preserved the patrol’s combat effectiveness. For his actions, President Dwight D. Eisenhower awarded him the Medal of Honor on 27 October 1953.



Sergeant David B. Bleak Minari-gol, Korea—14 June 1952

SGT David B. Bleak, a medical aidman, volunteered to accompany a combat patrol tasked to capture enemy forces for interrogation. While moving up the rugged slope of Hill 499, the patrol came under intense automatic weapons and small arms fire multiple times, suffering several casualties. Enemy fired at SGT Bleak from a nearby trench while he tended the wounded.

Determined to protect the wounded, the brave aidman faced the enemy, entered the trench, and killed three enemy soldiers with his bare hands. While exiting, a concussion grenade fell in front of a fellow Soldier. Bleak shifted to shield him from the blast.

Disregarding his own injury, he carried the most severely wounded Soldier down the hillside. Attacked by two enemy soldiers, Bleak lowered the wounded man, put both adversaries out of action by slamming their heads together, and then carried the wounded American Soldier to safety.

SGT Bleak’s courageous actions saved fellow Soldiers’ lives and preserved the patrol’s combat effectiveness. For his actions, President Dwight D. Eisenhower awarded him the Medal of Honor on 27 October 1953.



INTEGRITY: DO WHAT IS RIGHT, LEGALLY AND MORALLY.

Leaders of integrity consistently follow honorable principles. The Army relies on leaders who are honest in word and deed. Leaders of integrity do the right thing because their character permits nothing less. To instill the Army Values in others, leaders must demonstrate them. As an Army leader and a person of integrity, personal values should reinforce the Army Values.







Lieutenant Vernon Baker Viareggio, Italy—5-6 April 1945Lieutenant Vernon Baker of the 370th Infantry Regiment demonstrated leadership by example near Viareggio, Italy, during his company’s attack against strongly entrenched German positions in mountainous terrain.Fire from several machine gun emplacements stopped his company. LT Baker crawled to one position and destroyed it, killing three German soldiers. He then attacked an enemy observation post and killed two occupants. With the aid of one of his men, LT Baker continued the advance and destroyed two more machine gun nests, killing or wounding the soldiers occupying these positions. After consolidating his position, LT Baker finally covered the evacuation of the wounded personnel of his unit by occupying an exposed position and drawing the enemy’s fire.On the night following these events, LT Baker volunteered to lead a battalion advance through enemy minefields and heavy fire. Two-thirds of his company was wounded or dead and no reinforcements were in sight. His commander ordered a withdrawal. Baker protested that they could not withdraw; they had to stay and fight.LT Baker stands as an inspiration to not only those who served with him. He stood courageously against the enemy and stood proudly to represent his fallen comrades when he received his Medal of Honor.



Lieutenant Vernon Baker Viareggio, Italy—5-6 April 1945

Lieutenant Vernon Baker of the 370th Infantry Regiment demonstrated leadership by example near Viareggio, Italy, during his company’s attack against strongly entrenched German positions in mountainous terrain.

Fire from several machine gun emplacements stopped his company. LT Baker crawled to one position and destroyed it, killing three German soldiers. He then attacked an enemy observation post and killed two occupants. With the aid of one of his men, LT Baker continued the advance and destroyed two more machine gun nests, killing or wounding the soldiers occupying these positions. After consolidating his position, LT Baker finally covered the evacuation of the wounded personnel of his unit by occupying an exposed position and drawing the enemy’s fire.

On the night following these events, LT Baker volunteered to lead a battalion advance through enemy minefields and heavy fire. Two-thirds of his company was wounded or dead and no reinforcements were in sight. His commander ordered a withdrawal. Baker protested that they could not withdraw; they had to stay and fight.

LT Baker stands as an inspiration to not only those who served with him. He stood courageously against the enemy and stood proudly to represent his fallen comrades when he received his Medal of Honor.



PERSONAL COURAGE: FACE FEAR, DANGER, OR ADVERSITY (PHYSICAL AND MORAL).

Personal courage is not the absence of fear; it is the ability to put fear aside and do what is necessary or right. Personal courage takes two forms: physical and moral. Effective leaders demonstrate both. Physical courage requires overcoming fears of bodily harm and doing one’s duty. It triggers bravery that allows a Soldier to take risks in combat in spite of the fear of injury or death. For leaders, mission accomplishment may demand risking their own lives or those of Soldiers and justly taking the lives of enemies.

Moral courage is the willingness to stand firm on values, principles, and convictions. It enables all leaders to stand up for what they believe is right, regardless of the consequences. Leaders, who take full responsibility for their decisions and actions, even when things go wrong, display moral courage. Moral courage also expresses itself as candor—being frank, honest, and sincere with others. Carefully considered professional judgment offered to subordinates, peers, and superiors is an expression of personal courage.







Warrant Officer Hugh C. Thompson, Jr.My Lai, Vietnam—16 March 1968WO1 Hugh C. Thompson, Jr. and his two-man helicopter crew were on a reconnaissance mission over the village of My Lai, Republic of Vietnam. WO1 Thompson watched in horror as he saw an American Soldier shoot an injured Vietnamese child. Minutes later, he observed more Soldiers advancing on a number of civilians in a ditch. Suspecting possible reprisal shootings, WO1 Thompson landed his helicopter and questioned a young officer about what was happening. Told that the ground combat action was none of his business, he took off and circled the area.When it became apparent to Thompson that the American troops were firing on more unarmed civilians, he landed his helicopter between the Soldiers and a group of villagers headed towards a homemade bomb shelter. Thompson ordered his gunner to train his weapon on the approaching Soldiers and to fire if necessary. Then he personally coaxed the civilians out of the shelter and airlifted them to safety.WO1 Thompson’s immediate radio reports about triggered a cease-fire order that ultimately saved the lives of many more villagers. Thompson’s willingness to place himself in physical danger to do the ethically and morally right thing was a sterling example of personal and moral courage.



Warrant Officer Hugh C. Thompson, Jr.

My Lai, Vietnam—16 March 1968

WO1 Hugh C. Thompson, Jr. and his two-man helicopter crew were on a reconnaissance mission over the village of My Lai, Republic of Vietnam. WO1 Thompson watched in horror as he saw an American Soldier shoot an injured Vietnamese child. Minutes later, he observed more Soldiers advancing on a number of civilians in a ditch. Suspecting possible reprisal shootings, WO1 Thompson landed his helicopter and questioned a young officer about what was happening. Told that the ground combat action was none of his business, he took off and circled the area.

When it became apparent to Thompson that the American troops were firing on more unarmed civilians, he landed his helicopter between the Soldiers and a group of villagers headed towards a homemade bomb shelter. Thompson ordered his gunner to train his weapon on the approaching Soldiers and to fire if necessary. Then he personally coaxed the civilians out of the shelter and airlifted them to safety.

WO1 Thompson’s immediate radio reports about triggered a cease-fire order that ultimately saved the lives of many more villagers. Thompson’s willingness to place himself in physical danger to do the ethically and morally right thing was a sterling example of personal and moral courage.



VALUES AND BELIEFS

Values and beliefs affect how people think and act. People join the Army from a society with diverse personal values and beliefs respected within the standards of legal and ethical behavior. Variation in upbringing, culture, religious belief, and tradition is reflected among those who choose to serve in the Army. Such diversity provides many benefits for a force globally engaged around the world. Good leaders value this diversity of outlook and experience and must treat all individuals with the inherent dignity and respect due every person. All leaders have the critical responsibility to ensure that subordinates adhere to the Army Values as well as standards consistent with the United States Constitution, the Uniform Code of Military Justice, and Army rules and regulations.

The United States Constitution, which all Soldiers and DA Civilians swear to uphold and defend, reflects the Nation's values and is the legal foundation for both our government and the rights of individuals. At times, tensions can arise between individual beliefs protected by the Bill of Rights and the provisions of the Uniform Code of Military Justice or other Army rules and regulations. If this tension arises, it often centers on issues of religious belief, which while protected by the Constitution in general, could conflict with a specific military rule or regulation. If such tension arises, commanders will lead their organizations consistent with the Army Values while making decisions pursuant to DOD and Army policies.

Values and beliefs create a foundation for ethical conduct. Adhering to the Army Values is essential to upholding high ethical standards of behavior. Unethical behavior quickly destroys organizational morale and cohesion—it undermines the trust and confidence essential to teamwork and mission accomplishment. Consistently doing the right thing for the right reasons forges strong character in individuals and expands to create a culture of trust throughout the organization.







Captain Humbert R. Versace Vietnam CaptivityCaptain Humbert “Rocky” Versace was a West Point graduate assigned to the military assistance advisory group as an intelligence advisor during October 1963.While accompanying a Civilian Irregular Defense Group engaged in combat operations, Versace and two fellow special forces Soldiers were taken prisoner.They were forced to walk barefoot deep into the jungle. Once there, Versace assumed the position of senior prisoner and demanded the captors treat them as prisoners, not war criminals. He tried to escape four times, once crawling through the surrounding swamp until he was recaptured. He garnered most of the attention of the Viet Cong so that life was tolerable for his fellow prisoners. He was their role model.He refused to violate the Code of Conduct, giving the enemy only information required by the Geneva Convention, which he would recite repeatedly.When other Soldiers operated in those remote areas, they heard stories of Versace’s ordeal from local farmers. Speaking fluent Vietnamese and French, he would resist his captors loudly enough that local villagers could hear him. They reported seeing him led through the area barefoot with a rope around his neck, hands tied, and head swollen and yellow from jaundice. His hair had turned white from the physical stress. The farmers spoke of his strength, character, and commitment to God and country.On 26 September 1965, after two years in captivity, he was executed in retaliation for three Viet Cong killed in Da Nang. Versace’s remains were never found, but a tombstone bearing his name stands above an empty grave in Arlington cemetery. Ironically, he was just weeks from leaving the Army to become a missionary before being captured. He wanted to return to Vietnam to help orphaned children. Most of all, he is remembered as someone with strong character and beliefs who never gave in. For his bravery, Versace received the Medal of Honor and induction into the Ranger Hall of Fame at Fort Benning.



Captain Humbert R. Versace Vietnam Captivity

Captain Humbert “Rocky” Versace was a West Point graduate assigned to the military assistance advisory group as an intelligence advisor during October 1963.

While accompanying a Civilian Irregular Defense Group engaged in combat operations, Versace and two fellow special forces Soldiers were taken prisoner.

They were forced to walk barefoot deep into the jungle. Once there, Versace assumed the position of senior prisoner and demanded the captors treat them as prisoners, not war criminals. He tried to escape four times, once crawling through the surrounding swamp until he was recaptured. He garnered most of the attention of the Viet Cong so that life was tolerable for his fellow prisoners. He was their role model.

He refused to violate the Code of Conduct, giving the enemy only information required by the Geneva Convention, which he would recite repeatedly.

When other Soldiers operated in those remote areas, they heard stories of Versace’s ordeal from local farmers. Speaking fluent Vietnamese and French, he would resist his captors loudly enough that local villagers could hear him. They reported seeing him led through the area barefoot with a rope around his neck, hands tied, and head swollen and yellow from jaundice. His hair had turned white from the physical stress. The farmers spoke of his strength, character, and commitment to God and country.

On 26 September 1965, after two years in captivity, he was executed in retaliation for three Viet Cong killed in Da Nang. Versace’s remains were never found, but a tombstone bearing his name stands above an empty grave in Arlington cemetery. Ironically, he was just weeks from leaving the Army to become a missionary before being captured. He wanted to return to Vietnam to help orphaned children. Most of all, he is remembered as someone with strong character and beliefs who never gave in. For his bravery, Versace received the Medal of Honor and induction into the Ranger Hall of Fame at Fort Benning.



ETHICAL REASONING

To be an ethical leader requires more than merely knowing the Army Values. Leaders must be able to live by them to find moral solutions to diverse problems. Ethical reasoning must occur in everything leaders do—in planning, preparing, executing, and assessing operations.

Ethical choices may not always be obvious decisions between right and wrong. Leaders use multiple perspectives to think about ethical concerns, applying them to determine the most ethical choice. One perspective comes from a view that desirable virtues such as courage, justice, and benevolence define ethical outcomes. A second perspective comes from a set of agreed-upon values or rules, such as the Army Values or Constitutional rights. A third perspective bases the consequences of the decision on whatever produces the greatest good for the greatest number as most favorable. Leaders able to consider all perspectives applicable to a particular situation are more likely to be ethically astute. When time is available, consulting peers and seniors is often helpful. Chaplains can provide confidential advice to leaders about difficult personal and professional ethical issues to encourage moral decisions in accord with personal conscience and the Army Values.

Leaders should not intentionally issue vague or ambiguous orders or instructions to avoid responsibility or accountability. Leaders have a responsibility to research relevant orders, rules, and regulations and to demand clarification of orders that could lead to criminal misinterpretation or abuse. Ultimately, Army leaders must accept responsibility for the consequences of their actions and the subordinates who execute the leader’s orders.







ETHICAL ORDERS

Making the right choice and acting when faced with an ethical question can be difficult. Sometimes the situation requires a leader to stand firm and disagree with a supervisor on ethical grounds. These occasions test one’s character and moral courage. Situations in which any Army member thinks an order is unlawful can be the most difficult.

Under typical circumstances, a leader executes a superior leader’s decision with enthusiasm. Unlawful orders are the exception: a leader has a duty to question such orders and refuse to obey them if clarification of the order’s intent fails to resolve objections. If a Soldier perceives an order is unlawful, the Soldier should fully understand the order’s details and original intent. The Soldier should seek immediate clarification from the person who issued the order before proceeding.

If the question is more complex, seek legal counsel. If an issue requires an immediate decision, as may happen in the heat of combat, make the best judgment possible based on the Army Values, personal experience, critical thinking, previous study, and prior reflection. Chances are, when a Soldier disobeys what may be an unlawful order, it may be the most courageous decision they make. The Soldier’s Rules codify the law of war and outline ethical and lawful conduct in operations (see AR 350-1). They distill the essence of the law of war, the Army Values, and inform ethical conduct.



EMPATHY

Army leaders show empathy when they genuinely relate to another person’s situation, motives, or feelings. Empathy does not mean sympathy for another, but a realization that leads to a deeper understanding. Empathy allows the leader to anticipate what others are experiencing and feeling and gives insight to how decisions or actions affect them. Leaders extend empathy to others in both their leader and follower roles. Leaders with a strong tendency for empathy can apply it to understand people at a deeper level. This applies to DA Civilians, Soldiers and their Families, local populations, victims of natural disasters, and enemy combatants. Empathy enhances cultural understanding and enables an Army leader to better interact with others.

Empathetic leaders are better communicators, help others to understand what is occurring, and inspire others to meet mission objectives. During operations, Army leaders gain empathy when they share hardships to gauge Soldier morale and combat readiness. They recognize the need to provide reasonable comforts and rest periods to maintain morale and accomplish the mission.

Army leaders recognize that empathy includes nurturing a close relationship between the Army and Army families. Army leaders at all levels should promote healthy families and relate to the challenges they face. Empathy for families includes providing recovery time from difficult missions, protecting leave periods, and supporting events that allow information exchange and family team building.



WARRIOR ETHOS AND SERVICE ETHOS

The Warrior Ethos, contained within the Soldier’s Creed and italicized in the text below, represents the professional attitudes and beliefs that characterize the American Soldier. It reflects a Soldier’s selfless commitment to the Nation, mission, unit, and fellow Soldiers. DA Civilians, while not Soldiers, embody the principles of the Warrior Ethos through a service ethos embedded within the Army Civilian Corps Creed that shapes their conduct with the same commitment. Leaders develop and sustain the Warrior Ethos through discipline, commitment to the Army Values, and pride in the Army’s heritage. Embodied by Soldiers and supported by DA Civilians, the Warrior Ethos is the foundation for the esprit de corps that permeates the Army.







The Soldier’s CreedI am an American Soldier.I am a warrior and a member of a team.I serve the people of the United States, and live the Army Values.I will always place the mission first. I will never accept defeat.I will never quit.I will never leave a fallen comrade.I am disciplined, physically and mentally tough, trained and proficient in my warrior tasks and drills.I always maintain my arms, my equipment and myself.I am an expert and a professional. I stand ready to deploy, engage, and destroy the enemies of the United States of America in close combat.I am a guardian of freedom and the American way of life. I am an American Soldier.



The Soldier’s Creed

I am an American Soldier.

I am a warrior and a member of a team.

I serve the people of the United States, and live the Army Values.

I will always place the mission first. I will never accept defeat.

I will never quit.

I will never leave a fallen comrade.

I am disciplined, physically and mentally tough, trained and proficient in my warrior tasks and drills.

I always maintain my arms, my equipment and myself.

I am an expert and a professional. I stand ready to deploy, engage, and destroy the enemies of the United States of America in close combat.

I am a guardian of freedom and the American way of life. I am an American Soldier.

The Army Civilian Corps CreedI am an Army Civilian—a member of the Army team. I am dedicated to our Army, Soldiers, and Civilians. I will always support the mission.I provide leadership, stability, and continuity during war and peace.I support and defend the Constitution of the United States and consider it an honor to serve our Nation and our Army.I live the Army values of loyalty, duty, respect, selfless service, honor, integrity, and personal courage.I am an Army Civilian.



The Army Civilian Corps Creed

I am an Army Civilian—a member of the Army team. I am dedicated to our Army, Soldiers, and Civilians. I will always support the mission.

I provide leadership, stability, and continuity during war and peace.

I support and defend the Constitution of the United States and consider it an honor to serve our Nation and our Army.

I live the Army values of loyalty, duty, respect, selfless service, honor, integrity, and personal courage.

I am an Army Civilian.

The Warrior Ethos requires unrelenting resolve to do what is right regardless of the mission. Understanding what is right requires respect for everyone involved in complex missions, such as stability or defense support of civil authorities operations. Ambiguous situations, such as when to use lethal or nonlethal force, are a test of the leader’s judgment and discipline. The Warrior Ethos creates a collective commitment to succeed with honor.

The Warrior Ethos connects Soldiers of today with those whose sacrifices have sustained America’s existence. The Warrior Ethos is crucial but Soldier commitment may be perishable. Consequently, the Army must continually affirm, develop, and sustain its Warrior Ethos. The key to the Warrior Ethos is a mindset developed through purposeful mental preparation. Growth in character, confidence, composure, mental agility, and resilience are outcomes of internalizing the Warrior Ethos, as well as the service ethos of DA Civilians.







Task Force Kingston Yongsong-ni, Korea—November 1950Second Lieutenant Robert C. ‘Joe‘ Kingston, a platoon leader in K Company, 3d Battalion, 32d Infantry, was the lead element for his battalion’s move northward. The terrain was mountainous in that part of Korea, the weather bitterly cold—the temperature often below zero—and the cornered enemy still dangerous.LT Kingston inched his way forward, the battalion gradually adding elements to his force. Soon, he had anti-aircraft jeeps mounted with quad .50 caliber machine guns, a tank, a squad (later a platoon) of engineers, and an artillery forward observer under his control. Lieutenants who outranked him commanded some of the new attachments, as did the tactical air controller—a captain. LT Kingston remained in command; the battalion headquarters began referring to the growing force as “Task Force Kingston.” Bogged down with casualties mounting, Task Force Kingston received reinforcements that brought its strength to nearly 300. LT Kingston’s battalion commander wanted him to remain in command. One of the attached units was a rifle company, commanded by a captain. Nonetheless, the cooperative command arrangement worked because LT Kingston was a very competent leader.Despite tough fighting, the force advanced. Hit while leading an assault on one enemy stronghold, Kingston managed to toss a grenade, just as a North Korean soldier fired a shot that glanced off his helmet. The lieutenant’s resilience and personal courage inspired every Soldier from the wide array of units under his control.



Task Force Kingston Yongsong-ni, Korea—November 1950

Second Lieutenant Robert C. ‘Joe‘ Kingston, a platoon leader in K Company, 3d Battalion, 32d Infantry, was the lead element for his battalion’s move northward. The terrain was mountainous in that part of Korea, the weather bitterly cold—the temperature often below zero—and the cornered enemy still dangerous.

LT Kingston inched his way forward, the battalion gradually adding elements to his force. Soon, he had anti-aircraft jeeps mounted with quad .50 caliber machine guns, a tank, a squad (later a platoon) of engineers, and an artillery forward observer under his control. Lieutenants who outranked him commanded some of the new attachments, as did the tactical air controller—a captain. LT Kingston remained in command; the battalion headquarters began referring to the growing force as “Task Force Kingston.” Bogged down with casualties mounting, Task Force Kingston received reinforcements that brought its strength to nearly 300. LT Kingston’s battalion commander wanted him to remain in command. One of the attached units was a rifle company, commanded by a captain. Nonetheless, the cooperative command arrangement worked because LT Kingston was a very competent leader.

Despite tough fighting, the force advanced. Hit while leading an assault on one enemy stronghold, Kingston managed to toss a grenade, just as a North Korean soldier fired a shot that glanced off his helmet. The lieutenant’s resilience and personal courage inspired every Soldier from the wide array of units under his control.



DISCIPLINE

Discipline is the soul of an army.

George Washington

Commander, Continental Army (1775-81) and President of the United States (1789-97)



Discipline is essential to character, just as it is to an organization. All leaders must demonstrate self-discipline—the ability to control one’s own behavior—to do the harder right over the easier wrong. Doing tasks to the established Army standard without deviation reflects discipline.

Individual discipline supports the unit or an organization. At the unit level, leaders maintain discipline by enforcing standards impartially and consistently. Often this involves attending to mundane details, which may seem less urgent than an organization's key tasks, but are necessary to ensure success. Examples include preventive maintenance checks and services, pre-combat checks and inspections, effective Command Supply Discipline Programs, Organizational Inspection Programs, and training management. When enforcing standards, Soldiers expect their leaders to do so in an impartial, transparent, just, and consistent manner.







Discipline in the Face of the Enemy Iraq—28 February 1991About a half-hour prior to the cease-fire, a T-55 tank pulled up to an American Bradley unit that immediately prepared to engage with tube launched, optically tracked, wire guided (commonly called TOW) missiles. A vehicle section consisting of the platoon sergeant and his wingman tracked the Iraqi tank, ready to unleash two deadly shots. Suddenly, the wingman saw the T-55 stop; a head popped up from the commander’s cupola. The wingman immediately radioed his platoon sergeant to hold fire, believing the Iraqi was about to dismount, possibly to surrender.The Iraqi tank crew jumped out and ran behind a sand dune. Sensing something was off, the platoon sergeant immediately instructed his wingman to investigate the area, while he provided cover. To everyone’s surprise, the wingman discovered 150 enemy combatants ready to surrender. To deal with this large number of prisoners, the Americans lined them up for disarming and checking for items of intelligence value. Then the unit called for prisoner of war handlers to pick the Iraqis up.Before moving on, the platoon sergeant had to destroy the T-55. Before blowing it in place, the noncommissioned officer had the tank moved behind a sand berm to protect his people and the prisoners from the shrapnel of the on-board munitions.When the tank suddenly exploded and the ammunition cooked-off, the prisoners panicked, believing the Americans would shoot them. Quickly, the Soldiers communicated that this would not happen, one saying, “Hey, we’re from America, we don’t shoot our prisoners!”



Discipline in the Face of the Enemy Iraq—28 February 1991

About a half-hour prior to the cease-fire, a T-55 tank pulled up to an American Bradley unit that immediately prepared to engage with tube launched, optically tracked, wire guided (commonly called TOW) missiles. A vehicle section consisting of the platoon sergeant and his wingman tracked the Iraqi tank, ready to unleash two deadly shots. Suddenly, the wingman saw the T-55 stop; a head popped up from the commander’s cupola. The wingman immediately radioed his platoon sergeant to hold fire, believing the Iraqi was about to dismount, possibly to surrender.

The Iraqi tank crew jumped out and ran behind a sand dune. Sensing something was off, the platoon sergeant immediately instructed his wingman to investigate the area, while he provided cover. To everyone’s surprise, the wingman discovered 150 enemy combatants ready to surrender. To deal with this large number of prisoners, the Americans lined them up for disarming and checking for items of intelligence value. Then the unit called for prisoner of war handlers to pick the Iraqis up.

Before moving on, the platoon sergeant had to destroy the T-55. Before blowing it in place, the noncommissioned officer had the tank moved behind a sand berm to protect his people and the prisoners from the shrapnel of the on-board munitions.

When the tank suddenly exploded and the ammunition cooked-off, the prisoners panicked, believing the Americans would shoot them. Quickly, the Soldiers communicated that this would not happen, one saying, “Hey, we’re from America, we don’t shoot our prisoners!”



HUMILITY

Humility in its simplest form is the absence of arrogance. It is a sign of a leader being unselfish, working toward something more important than themselves. A person of high integrity, honesty, and character embodies the qualities of humility. For humility to apply, a leader must first have competence and confidence. A leader with the right level of humility is a willing learner, maintains accurate self-awareness, and seeks out others’ input and feedback. Leaders are seen as humble when they are aware of their limitations and abilities and apply that understanding in their leadership.

Humility exists on a continuum. Too little humility represents arrogance or hubris, which may lead to overconfidence. Excess humility is problematic because it is interpreted as shyness, meekness, passivity, blind obedience, or timidity. Either extreme signals a lack of self-awareness that undermines followers’ trust and confidence in the leader’s ability to make good decisions, look out for the unit’s welfare, and to achieve success.

It is difficult to judge our own humility. One’s humility is largely determined by other people. It is a subjective perception of the leader. Humility is interpreted differently by different genders and cultures. Individuals need to guard against their biases and assess character based on the whole set of Army Values and attributes.







Table 2-1. Attributes associated with CHARACTER









Chapter 3

Presence



FOUNDATIONS OF ARMY LEADER PRESENCE

3-1. Demonstrating presence is more than just showing up and being seen, although both are important. The actions, words, and the manner in which leaders carry themselves should convey confidence, competence, and a positive example for others to emulate. Presence represents who leaders are and what they stand for. Every leader has presence. Unfortunately, some lose the respect and confidence of their subordinates because their presence provides little or no positive effect on others. Part of projecting a positive leadership presence is being comfortable in one’s own skin. While leaders should understand that their subordinates are always observing how leaders carry themselves, they should also understand that subordinates can quickly tell the difference between leaders who are trying to portray themselves as something they are not. This often happens when a leader is new to a duty position or lacks experience. Remembering that most subordinates want their leaders to be successful is important. When they sense that their leaders are genuine, honest, and willing to learn by putting themselves into positions where they might risk a little embarrassment learning a new skill, their level of respect for a leader increases. Leaders able to do what they ask others to do, who can ‘walk the talk,’ generate a positive reputation that contributes to their effective presence around Soldiers. Table 3-1 is a summary of the presence attributes (see page 3-3).

3-2. Through their presence, leaders show what they stand for and how they expect others to carry themselves. Leaders who routinely share in hardships and dangers have firsthand knowledge of what they are asking subordinates to do, and show their subordinates that they are not above putting themselves at the same level of risk or discomfort. It assures Soldiers that what they are doing is important. A leader’s effectiveness is dramatically enhanced by understanding and developing the following areas:

Military and professional bearing: projecting a commanding presence, a professional image of authority, calmness under pressure, and control over emotions.

Fitness: looking like a fit, professional Soldier, having the strength, and endurance to lead others from the front, and being physically able to do what subordinates are expected to do.

Confidence: projecting self-confidence and certainty in the unit’s ability to accomplish the mission, able to retain composure and demonstrate calm through steady control over emotion.

Resilience: demonstrating the psychological and physical capacity to overcome failures, setbacks, and hardship.



MILITARY AND PROFESSIONAL BEARING

3-3. The Army expects all Army members to look and act as professionals. Skillful use of professional bearing—fitness, courtesy, proper military appearance, appropriate civilian attire, and professionally correct behavior in accordance with established Army standards sets the professional tone with which a unit functions. A professional military demeanor establishes credibility, sets expectations, and reduces organizational ambiguity. Consistent professionalism strengthens mutual respect among members of the team.



FITNESS

3-4. The Army’s approach to holistic fitness reduces the risk of unnecessary harm during operations, while training, in garrison, and off duty. Holistic fitness recognizes that individual well-being depends on interdependent areas including physical fitness (see FM 7-22), resilience, training, individual spirituality (self-identity, beliefs, and life purpose beyond self), social interaction (positive connection with others), and







physical, psychological, and behavioral health. Leaders promote policies and practices to maintain total fitness for themselves and their subordinates.

3-5. Unit readiness begins with physically fit Soldiers. Operations place physical, mental, and emotional demands upon the individuals conducting them. Physical fitness, while crucial for success in battle, is important for all members of the Army team in all environments. Physically fit people feel more competent and confident, handle stress better, can work longer more effectively, and recover faster from hardship. Physical fitness is the cornerstone of combat readiness.

3-6. The physical demands of leadership during repeated deployments or continuous operations can erode how well one thinks and emotional stability, both of which are essential to the effective decision making required for sound leadership. Poor physical fitness multiples the effects of stress, eventually compromising mental and emotional fitness. Operations in difficult terrain, extreme climates, or high altitudes require extensive physical conditioning. Once in the area of operations, leaders must continue efforts to sustain their own fitness and that of their subordinates.

3-7. Preparedness for operational missions should be the primary focus of the unit’s fitness program. The forward-looking leader develops a balanced fitness program that enables Soldiers to execute the unit’s most challenging missions.

3-8. It is a leader’s duty to stay healthy and fit since the leader’s decisions affect the welfare of the entire organization. Fit and healthy leaders motivate and challenge subordinates to become like them. Staying healthy and physically fit enables Soldiers to cope with the psychological effects of extended operations. To maintain peak performance, leaders and Soldiers need exercise, sufficient sleep, nutritional food, and adequate hydration.

3-9. Health fitness includes having routine physical exams and keeping immunizations current, as well as practicing dental hygiene, personal grooming, and cleanliness when in the field during training and operations. Health fitness includes avoiding things that can degrade personal health, such as, substance abuse, tobacco use, over-eating, as well as overuse of caffeine, energy drinks, and other stimulants (for more information see FM 7-22).



CONFIDENCE

3-10. Confidence is the faith leaders place in their abilities to make decisions and take appropriate action in any situation, no matter how stressful or ambiguous. Confidence grows from professional competence and a realistic appraisal of one’s abilities. A leader’s confidence is contagious and permeates the entire organization. Confident leaders who help Soldiers control doubt reduce anxiety in a unit. Effective leaders temper confidence with humility—the understanding that no one is perfect, all knowing, or always correct. Humility prevents overconfidence and arrogance.



RESILIENCE

3-11. Resilience enables leaders and their organizations to endure and ultimately prevail over hardship. Resilience and commitment to accomplish the mission is critical to overcoming adversity. Resilient Soldiers can recover quickly from setbacks, shock, and injuries while maintaining focus on their jobs and the mission. Resilient leaders learn and grow from experiencing difficult situations. Leaders instill resilience and a winning spirit in subordinates through personal example and tough, realistic training.



Presence



Commanding PresenceFor nine months, the commander conducted route clearance patrols with his subordinate platoons. Nearly every day, his platoons received direct fire as they found and neutralized hundreds of improvised explosive devices that endangered friendly forces using the roads. A change of command occurred and the commander went to brigade staff. The new commander quickly endeared himself to his subordinates as he patrolled daily, sharing risk and hardship. The new commander and his driver were killed in action.The unit, nearing their end of their tour, struggled with the deaths of their teammates. The former commander spoke to the brigade commander and explained that he was the best officer available to bring the unit home. The brigade commander supported him; he resumed command of the company and continued operations.The former commander could have suggested that the next engineer captain in line deploy the company home. However, understanding the unit and the situation, he assessed correctly that the unit had experienced enough turmoil. He returned knowing that he was placing himself back into harm’s way. All of the Soldiers in the company knew the risks and their morale improved because they trusted his demonstrated competence, judgment, and courage.



Commanding Presence

For nine months, the commander conducted route clearance patrols with his subordinate platoons. Nearly every day, his platoons received direct fire as they found and neutralized hundreds of improvised explosive devices that endangered friendly forces using the roads. A change of command occurred and the commander went to brigade staff. The new commander quickly endeared himself to his subordinates as he patrolled daily, sharing risk and hardship. The new commander and his driver were killed in action.

The unit, nearing their end of their tour, struggled with the deaths of their teammates. The former commander spoke to the brigade commander and explained that he was the best officer available to bring the unit home. The brigade commander supported him; he resumed command of the company and continued operations.

The former commander could have suggested that the next engineer captain in line deploy the company home. However, understanding the unit and the situation, he assessed correctly that the unit had experienced enough turmoil. He returned knowing that he was placing himself back into harm’s way. All of the Soldiers in the company knew the risks and their morale improved because they trusted his demonstrated competence, judgment, and courage.

Table 3-1. Attributes associated with PRESENCE





















































This page intentionally left blank.







Chapter 4

Intellect



FOUNDATIONS OF AN ARMY LEADER INTELLECT

4-1. Intellect is fundamental to successful leadership. Intellect consists of one’s brainpower and knowledge. Intellect enables leaders to think creatively and critically to gain situational understanding, make sound judgments, solve problems, and take action. Intellect allows leaders to reason analytically, critically, ethically, and with cultural sensitivity. Intellect is involved in considering the intended and unintended consequences of the decisions a leader makes. Effective leaders must anticipate the second- and third-order effects of their decisions.

4-2. A leader’s mental abilities affect how well they think and lead others. People differ in intellectual strengths and ways of thinking—there is no one right way to think. Each leader needs to be self-aware of their strengths and limitations and apply them accordingly. Experience informs intellect. Table 4-1 is a summary of the intellect attributes (see page 4-5).

4-3.  The leader attributes making up an Army leader’s intellect include—

Mental agility.

Sound judgment.

Innovation.

Interpersonal tact.

Expertise.



MENTAL AGILITY

4-4. Mental agility is the ability to think flexibly. Mental agility helps leaders effectively react to change and adapt to the dynamic situations inherent to military operations. Mental agility keeps leaders from fixating on the wrong problems or getting stuck on poor solutions. Agility enables thinking when current decisions or actions are not producing the desired results and a new approach is necessary. Mental agility in leaders and followers provides organizations with the adaptability necessary for the disciplined initiative essential to mission command.

4-5. Mental agility relies upon curiosity and the ability to reason critically. Inquisitive or intellectually curious leaders are eager to understand a broad range of topics and keep an open mind to multiple possibilities before reaching decisions. Critical thinking is purposeful and helps find facts, challenge assumptions, solve problems, and make decisions. Critical thinking enables understanding of changing situations, arriving at justifiable conclusions, making judgments, and learning from experience. Critical and creative thinking provide the basis for understanding, visualizing, and describing complex, ill-structured problems and developing approaches to solve them. Critical thinking provides a basis for reflection and continual learning. Creative thinking involves thinking in innovative ways using imagination, insight, and novel ideas. Critical and innovative thought are abilities that enable adaptability.

4-6. Critical thinking examines a problem in depth from multiple points of view. The first and most important step in finding an appropriate solution is to isolate the main problem. A leader’s mental agility to quickly isolate a problem and identify solutions facilitates seizing initiative and adapting effectively during operations when many things occur simultaneously and in close succession. Leaders must instill agility and initiative within subordinates by creating a climate that encourages risk taking within the commander’s intent. Underwriting risk and accepting honest mistakes in training makes subordinates more likely to develop and take initiative.





SOUND JUDGMENT

Judgment comes from experience and experience comes from bad judgments.

General of the Army Omar N. Bradley Address at the U.S. Army War College (1971)



4-7. Judgment requires the capacity to assess situations accurately, draw rational conclusions, and make decisions. Sound judgment enables leaders to make sensible decisions in a timely manner, a quality critical to building trust with subordinates and earning their confidence. Experience contributes to the development of sound judgment when it contributes to learning. Leaders acquire experience through trial and error and by observing others. Learning from others can occur through mentoring and coaching (see chapter 6).

4-8. Often, leaders must balance facts, question assumptions, and sense intangible factors like morale or the enemy’s intent. Judgment contributes to the ability to compare possible courses of action and decide what one to take. There are times, particularly in combat, where there are no good decisions, only the least bad decision possible in the moment. Sound judgment requires consideration of consequences. It also includes the ability to assess strengths and weaknesses of subordinates, peers, and the enemy. Like mental agility, sound judgment is a critical part of problem solving and decision making.



INNOVATION

4-9. Innovation describes the ability to introduce or implement something new. Innovative problem solvers tend to be inquisitive, looking to understand why something is the way it is or questioning how something could work better. Being innovative requires creative thinking that uses both adaptive (drawing from expertise and prior knowledge) and innovative approaches (developing completely new ideas).

4-10. Innovative leaders prevent complacency by finding new ways to challenge subordinates with alternative approaches and ideas. They recognize that other people have good ideas and they recognize those who do. To be innovators, leaders rely on intuition, experience, knowledge, and input from subordinates, peers, and superiors. Innovative leaders reinforce team building by making everybody responsible for—and stakeholders in—innovation.

Gatlings to the AssaultSan Juan Hill, Santiago de Cuba—1 July 1898An important yet little known incident in American arms occurred during the assault on San Juan Hill in the war with Spain. The going was tough up the hill, since the Spaniards were well entrenched. Lieutenant John H. Parker was in command of the Gatling Gun Detachment composed of men from four different infantry regiments. Parker believed that his guns, which normally played only a defensive role in battle, could be of decisive importance in the attack by giving fire superiority to the infantry just when most needed. Receiving permission to advance the guns, Parker brought his detachment abreast of the Infantry, in fact ahead of some elements of it, and opened fire. This, the United States Army's first use of close support machine guns in the attack, was decisive in the capture of San Juan Hill. Lieutenant Parker's initiative developed an important principle of fire and maneuver—the use of close support machine guns in the attack.



Gatlings to the Assault

San Juan Hill, Santiago de Cuba—1 July 1898

An important yet little known incident in American arms occurred during the assault on San Juan Hill in the war with Spain. The going was tough up the hill, since the Spaniards were well entrenched. Lieutenant John H. Parker was in command of the Gatling Gun Detachment composed of men from four different infantry regiments. Parker believed that his guns, which normally played only a defensive role in battle, could be of decisive importance in the attack by giving fire superiority to the infantry just when most needed. Receiving permission to advance the guns, Parker brought his detachment abreast of the Infantry, in fact ahead of some elements of it, and opened fire. This, the United States Army's first use of close support machine guns in the attack, was decisive in the capture of San Juan Hill. Lieutenant Parker's initiative developed an important principle of fire and maneuver—the use of close support machine guns in the attack.



INTERPERSONAL TACT

4-11. Effectively interacting with others is a skill that requires self-awareness. Interpersonal tact is a component of professional behavior. Interpersonal tact relies on understanding the character, reactions, and motives of oneself and others. It can be distilled down to the idea of honestly stating one’s views about an idea or another person as diplomatically as possible to ensure it is understood without causing unnecessary offense. Tact should be balanced by professional candor, in terms of saying what needs to be said or done for the good of the mission or the unit. Leaders, who understand how subordinates, peers, and superiors view







them, and clearly understand others, have a better idea how to communicate with tact. Candor and tact are important aspects of personal composure and an element for effectively leading diverse organizations.



RECOGNIZING DIVERSITY

4-12. Personal perspectives vary within every individual human being and societal groups. Understanding the different backgrounds, qualifications, experiences, and potential of each of the individuals in an organization is an important part of being an effective leader. It is fundamental to knowing your people and harnessing their diverse skills and perspectives to build cohesive teams. Good leaders create conditions where subordinates know they are valued for their individual talents, skills, and perspectives that contribute to mission accomplishment.



COMPOSURE

4-13. Effective leaders control their emotions. Emotional self-control, balance, and stability enable leaders to make sound, ethical decisions. Leaders must remain calm under pressure and expend energy on things they can positively influence rather than those things they cannot affect. An Army leader’s level of self-control greatly influences how they interact with others, particularly during periods of crisis when things are not going well. Leaders understand that emotional energy sparks motivation and endurance. Enthusiastic leaders, who are in control of their emotions, will be able to energize others to rise above difficult conditions.

4-14. A leader’s emotional state influences subordinates’ emotions. Balancing the right level and mix of emotions for a situation provides confidence. Extreme, rash displays of emotion can threaten subordinate confidence in a leader’s judgment. Displaying panic or no emotion at all are opposite extremes. A sense of calm encourages feedback from subordinates, improving communication while contributing to shared understanding. Self-control in combat is especially important—emotions like rage, panic, or fear can be contagious. Leaders who lose their composure cannot expect subordinates to maintain theirs. Practicing composure in garrison and training events provides the experience a leader can draw upon during crisis.

4-15. Effective leaders can read others’ emotional states to employ the right balance of interpersonal tact and candor in a particular situation. They draw on experience to provide subordinates the proper perspective on unfolding events. They possess a range of attitudes, from relaxed to intense, from which to choose appropriately for the circumstances they face. Balanced leaders know how to convey urgency without throwing the entire organization into chaos.

4-16. Effective leaders are steady, levelheaded when under pressure and tired, and calm when facing danger. They model the emotions they want their subordinates to display and resist temptation to do or say what personally feels justified. They remember that venting frustrations publicly may seem to release stress, but actually tends to increase stress across the organization when not done judiciously for sound reasons.

Those Guys Can’t ShootThe cordon was beginning to collapse. The enemy had taken random shots at the platoon and the gunners were hunkered down behind their shields. The platoon leader opened the door to get in the vehicle. An insurgent on a scooter darted out from an alley and shot, hitting the inside of the open door. The platoon leader got in, stared at his frightened driver, and said, “Those guys can’t shoot.”While this may come across as bravado, it was not. The platoon leader was just as surprised and frightened as the driver was; however, in the moment he knew that he needed to say something to distract his driver.



Those Guys Can’t Shoot

The cordon was beginning to collapse. The enemy had taken random shots at the platoon and the gunners were hunkered down behind their shields. The platoon leader opened the door to get in the vehicle. An insurgent on a scooter darted out from an alley and shot, hitting the inside of the open door. The platoon leader got in, stared at his frightened driver, and said, “Those guys can’t shoot.”

While this may come across as bravado, it was not. The platoon leader was just as surprised and frightened as the driver was; however, in the moment he knew that he needed to say something to distract his driver.



EXPERTISE

4-17. Expertise is in-depth knowledge and skill developed from experience, training, and education. Leaders use in-depth knowledge to focus on key aspects of a problem, make effective and ethical decisions, and achieve a high level of performance. Leaders have a moral obligation to those they lead to improve their expertise continuously. Leaders themselves should be open and eager to benefit from others’ knowledge to







enhance their own tactical and technical expertise. Military professionals require in-depth knowledge in a variety of areas. Tactical knowledge relates to accomplishing military objectives during operations. Technical knowledge consists of specialized information associated with a function or system. Joint knowledge is an understanding of joint organizations, procedures, and roles in national defense. Cultural and geopolitical knowledge is awareness of cultural, geographic, and political differences and sensitivities.



TACTICAL KNOWLEDGE

4-18. Army leaders must know the fundamentals of their duty position related to warfighting, tactics, techniques, and procedures. Their tactical knowledge allows them to employ individuals, teams, and organizations properly to accomplish missions at least cost in lives and materiel. Competent readiness-focused leaders seek professional military education opportunities to develop tactical knowledge and demand realistic operational conditions during training. They do this for themselves and their subordinates.

4-19. Fieldcraft is an essential element of tactical knowledge that leaders must understand, teach, and enforce during both training and operations. Fieldcraft encompasses all of the techniques associated with operating and surviving in austere, hostile field conditions, like camouflage, noise and light discipline, and field sanitation. Leaders set a positive personal example in terms of fieldcraft and ensure subordinates adhere to prescribed standards in a disciplined manner. Good fieldcraft is an indicator of a well-disciplined and well-led organization. Leaders gain proficiency in fieldcraft through education and practice during training.



TECHNICAL KNOWLEDGE

4-20. Technical knowledge relates to equipment, weapons, systems, and functional areas. Leaders need to know how the equipment for which they are responsible works and how to use it. Subordinates generally expect their organizational leaders to be technically competent, and their direct leaders to be technically expert.

4-21. Leaders ensure their subordinates know how to operate and maintain their equipment, which often requires setting an example with a hands-on approach. They understand and explain critical equipment capabilities, strengths, and weaknesses. They provide context for the employment of friendly technical capabilities to their subordinates, which means leaders must also understand the operational environments in which they are used.



JOINT KNOWLEDGE

4-22. Leaders acquire joint knowledge through formal training in the joint professional military education program and experience from assignments in joint organizations. Army leaders must understand how to integrate Army capabilities with those of the other Services and unified action partners, particularly at the organizational and strategic levels.



CULTURAL AND GEOPOLITICAL KNOWLEDGE

4-23. Army organizations operate around the world in a wide variety of environments with different unified action partners representing many different cultures. Leaders should acquire cultural and geopolitical knowledge about the areas in which they expect to accomplish the mission.

4-24. Leaders require cultural and geopolitical awareness to properly prepare subordinates for the places they will work, the people with whom they will operate, and the adversaries or enemies they will face. The Army requires leaders who are geopolitically aware and can explain how their unit mission fits into the broader scheme of operations. These are important factors when Army leaders attempt to extend influence beyond the chain of command.

4-25. Culture consists of shared beliefs, values, and assumptions. Army leaders are mindful of cultural factors in three contexts:

Sensitivity to unified action partners’ backgrounds to determine how to best use their capabilities.

Awareness of the culture of the area in which the organization is operating.

Consideration of partners’ customs, traditions, doctrinal principles, and operational methods.







4-26. Cultural understanding is crucial to the success of operations. To operate in a multinational setting, Army leaders must understand differences in doctrinal terminology and the interpretation of orders and instructions. They must learn how and why others think and act as they do. Multicultural conditions, such as exist during multinational operations, require leaders to keep plans and orders as clear and concise as possible to prevent misunderstandings. Dedicated liaison teams and linguists provide a cultural bridge between partners to mitigate some differences, but they cannot eliminate them.

Table 4-1. Attributes associated with INTELLECT





















































This page intentionally left blank.







PART TWO

Competency-based Leadership for Direct Through Strategic Levels

Part Two describes the core leader competencies and their application. Army leaders lead others; develop themselves, their subordinates, and organizations; and accomplish assigned and implied missions. The ten competencies of Army leadership apply across leadership levels as core requirements, while subtle changes occur in purpose and activity at each successive level.









Chapter 5

Leads

The American soldier…demands professional competence in his leaders. In battle, he wants to know that the job is going to be done right, with no unnecessary casualties. The noncommissioned officer wearing the chevron is supposed to be the best soldier in the platoon and he is supposed to know how to perform all the duties expected of him. The American soldier expects his sergeant to be able to teach him how to do his job. And he expects even more from his officers.

Omar N. Bradley General of the Army (1950-1953)



LEADS OTHERS

5-1. Leads consists of five competencies. Leads others includes influencing members in the leader's organization. Influence is central to leadership. Extends influence beyond the chain of command involves influencing others when the leader does not have designated authority or when others may not recognize the leader's authority. Builds trust establishes conditions that lead to mutual confidence among leaders and subordinates. Leader actions and words comprise the competencies of leads by example and communicates. Actions can speak louder than words and leaders who embody standards as role models are generally more effective than those who simply talk about standards. Effective leaders clearly communicate what needs to be done and why.

5-2. Army leaders draw upon their character, presence, and intellect while leading others. Direct leaders influence others person-to-person, such as a team leader who instructs, encourages hard work, and recognizes achievement. Organizational and strategic leaders guide organizations directly through their subordinate leaders, using both direct and indirect means of influence. A company commander directly leads the platoon leaders, who in turn know what the battalion commander wants done, because the lieutenants understand the commander’s intent two levels up. The battalion commander does not communicate to the platoon leaders directly, but rather depends upon the company commanders to lead their organizations according to the commander’s intent. Intent links higher and lower echelons.







5-3. All Army leaders are followers; each reports to someone higher in the chain of command, ultimately up to the Secretary of the Army who answers to the President. Leaders inspire and guide subordinates to follow; subordinates react to inspiration and follow guidance while performing their duties. Leaders assess and establish rapport with followers, and followers act in good conscience to follow guidance. Whether serving in the role of leader or subordinate, all are honor bound to perform their duties to the best of their abilities.

5-4. Context determines when a Soldier or DA Civilian is a leader or follower. A first sergeant receives guidance from the company commander as a follower and then as a leader translates that guidance to the platoon sergeants. As a leader, the first sergeant does not simply parrot the guidance received. The first sergeant translates the guidance into terms that are appropriate for the company NCOs in the context of other information received from the battalion command sergeant major and issues instructions that best meet the commander’s intent. The activity of influencing others depends on the followers’ knowledge, skills, and commitment level. The principles of mission command in ADP 6-0 inform the level of control leaders employ in a particular situation.

5-5. Effective leadership depends on the alignment of purpose, direction, and motivation among leaders and subordinates. Working with a shared understanding of the operational picture and higher intent generates the unity of purpose, unity of effort, and consistency essential to maintaining a positive leadership climate. Subordinates who see consistency will sense shared purpose and be less prone to distraction by confusing or conflicting guidance from different leaders. Those who align their decisions and activities with their peers, for example during garrison activities and training, may have greater influence than a leader who does not. This unifying aspect of leadership can—

Ensure attitudes and actions up, down, and across units are aligned around a common vision.

Enable mission command by delegating authority and control appropriate for the situation.

Cultivate mutually beneficial relationships with others inside and outside the organization.

Draw on sources of expertise across a unit.

5-6. Leading others requires that leaders influence others to conduct tasks, make decisions, and perform their duty in ways consistent with Army standards. It is the duty of leaders to motivate others to accomplish missions in accordance with the Army Values. Leaders influence others to perform their duties in service of a higher purpose, not personal gain or advantage. Army leaders can draw on a variety of methods to influence others and can use one or more methods to fit to the specific context of any situation. Some tasks only require subordinate compliance for success, such as meeting the requirement for flu shots. Others require building a high level of commitment on the behalf of subordinates to achieve success, such as a platoon seizing a heavily fortified enemy position. Compliance is the act of conforming to a requirement or demand. Commitment is willing dedication or allegiance to a cause or organization. Active opposition to influence denotes resistance.



USING COMPLIANCE AND COMMITMENT

5-7. Successful leadership depends upon both the compliance and commitment of those being led. Neither succeeds on its own in most situations; rather, there is a blend of compliance and commitment amongst subordinates in each situation. The best leaders generate a sense of commitment that causes subordinates to go beyond achieving the bare minimum. Compliance to legal and ethical orders, directives, and instructions is always required. Willing and eager agreement is commitment.

5-8. Whereas compliance only affects a follower’s behavior, commitment reaches deeper—changing attitudes, beliefs, and behavior. Commitment generally produces longer lasting and broader effects that result in subordinates being willing to expend more effort of their own accord, or even put themselves at personal risk, to accomplish the tasks at hand. Once a leader builds commitment among followers, they will likely demonstrate more initiative, personal involvement, and creativity. Commitment grows from an individual’s desire to contribute to the organization. Leaders can strengthen commitment by reinforcing followers’ identification with the Nation (loyalty), the Army (professionalism), the unit or organization (esprit de corps), the leadership in a unit (respect), and to the mission (duty).







Methods of Influence

5-9. Influence is the essential activity of leadership and refers to how people affect the intentions, attitudes, and actions of another person or group of people. Influence depends upon the relationship that develops between leaders and others. Positive rapport and a sense of mutual trust make subordinates more likely to respond positively to a leader’s influence. Examples of rapport building include having genuine interest in a subordinate’s well-being, offering praise for a job well done, and taking time to understand a subordinate’s position on an issue. Leaders indirectly influence others by demonstrating integrity, empathy, judgment, expertise, and commitment. Army leaders employ various methods of direct influence based on audience, intent, and context of the situation. The nine methods listed below represent different ways to influence:

Pressure.

Legitimating.

Exchange.

Personal appeals.

Collaboration.

Rational persuasion.

Apprising.

Inspirational appeals.

Participation.

5-10. Pressure occurs when leaders use explicit demands to achieve compliance, such as establishing deadlines for the completion of tasks and communicating negative consequences for those not met. This approach is generally appropriate under two conditions. The first is when emphasis is required to ensure compliance with previously unmet requirements and subordinates need to reorder their priorities to meet the higher-level intent to do so. The second is during combat operations, when the pressure the leader applies explicitly relates to the negative consequences likely to occur should the subordinates fail. Leaders should use this method infrequently, particularly in garrison, since it tends to create subordinate resentment, especially if the pressure becomes severe. When subordinates perceive that pressures originate from their leader’s attempt to please superiors for personal recognition, resentment can quickly undermine an organization’s morale, cohesion, and quality of performance. Pressure is a suitable choice when the stakes are high, time is short, or previous attempts to direct action have not been successful.

5-11. Legitimating occurs when leaders establish their authority as the basis for a request when it may not be obvious. Certain tasks must happen regardless of circumstances when subordinate leaders receive legitimate orders from higher headquarters. Reference to one’s position suggests to subordinates that there is potential for adverse action if the request is not completed.

5-12. Exchange is an influence method that leaders use when they offer to provide incentives for gaining a higher level of compliance with orders or instructions. A four-day pass as reward for excelling during a maintenance inspection is an example of exchange. The use of rewards should be impartial and as objective as possible.

5-13. Personal appeals occur when the leader asks for a subordinate’s support based upon their personal or longstanding professional relationship, generally out of loyalty. This may be useful in a difficult situation when mutual trust is the key to success. The leader makes a special appeal by highlighting special talents the subordinate or team have, as well as the unique bonds they all share before taking on a tough mission. An S3 might ask a staff officer to brief a difficult audience at an important conference that makes it clear that the subordinate is the one best suited and most trusted to give the briefing.

5-14. Collaboration occurs when the leader engages with subordinates or peers to apply influence by contributing to the outcome. The leader is making commitment more attractive to followers by stepping in and resolving problems, offering additional resources, or sharing in the work. A collaborative approach works well in many environments. It can increase mutual understanding and clarify commander’s intent while giving subordinates the opportunity to share their ideas and perspective.

5-15. Rational persuasion requires providing a broader context, logical argument, or explanations showing how a request is relevant to the goal and why something should or must be done. This is often the first approach a leader takes to gain compliance or commitment from subordinates and is more effective when







others recognize the leader as an expert. Leaders draw from their own experience to give reasons why a task should be accomplished in a particular manner. Rational persuasion is often used in combination with other approaches, particularly collaboration.

5-16. Apprising happens when the leader explains why an order or request will benefit a subordinate or team, such as explaining how performing a task a certain way that will save time. In contrast to the exchange approach, the benefits of apprising are generally beyond the direct control of the leader to provide. A commander may use the apprising method to inform a newly assigned NCO that serving in a staff position, before serving as a platoon sergeant, could provide invaluable experience. The commander points out that additional knowledge may make the NCO a stronger candidate for promotion.

5-17. Inspirational appeals occur when the leader creates enthusiasm for a request by arousing strong emotions in support of a decision they must make or have already made. Inspirational appeals are best employed when the stakes are high, and subordinates or peers understand what those stakes are. A leader may stress to a fellow leader that without help, the safety of the team may be at risk.

5-18. Participation occurs when leaders ask others to join them in determining how best to address a problem or meet an objective. Active participation leads to an increased sense of worth and recognition among subordinates that contributes to unit cohesion. Participation increases the commitment of subordinates to execute whatever is decided and contributes to shared understanding of the commander’s intent. By involving subordinate leaders during planning, the senior leader is helping to ensure subordinates will later be able to pursue critical intermediate and long-term objectives on their own initiative.



Application of Influence

5-19. Creating commitment among subordinates requires that they know their leaders are sincere. Committed subordinates trust their leaders to be doing what is right for the Army, the mission, the team, and each individual Soldier. Leaders who primarily focus on personal gain or recognition are seen by subordinates as self-serving, which undermines trust and erodes motivation. Honorable intentions wrongly perceived by followers as self-serving will yield mere compliance.

5-20. The nature of the mission determines which influence method or combination of methods is appropriate. When a situation is urgent and greater risk is involved, eliciting follower compliance through more directive methods may be desirable. Direct-level leaders are often required to coordinate team activities in an expedient manner, meaning that they focus on explaining themselves before or after the activities, and not during execution. In comparison, organizational leaders typically use methods that draw out strong commitment from their subordinate leaders.

5-21. The degree to which a leader uses commitment or compliance depends on the leader, the led, and the situation. When influencing others, Army leaders understand—

The reasons for influence should align with the Army Values, the Uniform Code of Military Justice, the Soldier’s Creed, and the Army Civilian Corps Creed.

Commitment emphasizes empowerment and long-lasting trust.

Compliance focuses on quickly meeting task demands.



Resistance

5-22. When leaders experience resistance, the first response is to understand the nature of the relationship and reasons for opposition or non-compliance. Resistance may stem from a lack of trust, lack of understanding, or concerns about well-being. Leaders may need to clarify misperceptions or correct false beliefs. Unfounded rumors can hurt unit cohesiveness and create friction if not confronted at their source. Gossip and rumors reduce focus while increasing the amount of energy leaders must spend on activities other than the mission at hand.

5-23. Leaders need to ensure all parties focus on a shared understanding. Overt acknowledgement of resistance can be the first step in reducing it. Leaders should confront resistance quickly to determine the reasons why it exists and how to address the causes constructively. This may be enough to change negative mindsets and build or restore mutual trust within the organization. Leaders can lessen resistance by acknowledging concerns with their own position or requests. This demonstrates that the leaders recognize







both the positives and negatives of a given request and that they are approaching the issue even-handedly and fairly.

5-24. Repeated, consistent requests can signal that the leader is intent on overcoming resistance. For instance, if an Army leader wants local police to participate in patrols, the leader may ask the police to participate a dozen times on different occasions. Eventually the repeated requests may wear down resistance. Repetition could have the opposite effect of entrenching the opposition in their original negative position, which would signal the need for a different method. Embedding the desired outcome into stories can show how the actions are possible and how all sides can benefit. Regardless of approach taken, leaders must not risk their integrity nor wander from their mission for the sole purpose of others perceiving them as influential.



PROVIDING PURPOSE, DIRECTION, AND MOTIVATION

5-25. Leaders influence others to achieve some purpose. To be successful at exerting influence, Army leaders have an end or goal in mind. Sometimes the goal will be specific, and at other times, goals are more general, but in both cases, the goal should be valid and meaningful. Leaders should clearly define the ‘what’ and ‘why’. Subordinates should be able to start the mission or task with the end in mind by knowing what success looks like and how they can track their own progress. Motivation increases when subordinates understand how their roles relate to larger and more important outcomes.

5-26. Leaders must establish clear understanding of the higher commander’s intent to ensure the team understands what must be done and why. Commander’s intent is a concise expression of the purpose of an operation and the desired end state. Leaders communicate purpose with implied or explicit instructions so others may exercise initiative. This is important for situations when unanticipated opportunities arise or the original assigned tasks no longer achieve the desired end state.

5-27. Besides purpose, leaders provide direction. Direction deals with how to achieve a goal, task, or mission. Subordinates do not always need to receive guidance on the details of execution. A skilled leader will know when to provide detailed guidance or promote subordinate initiative by focusing primarily on purpose.

5-28. Motivation is linked to the reason and level of enthusiasm for doing something. Army leaders use the knowledge of what motivates others to influence those they lead. Understanding how motivation works provides insight into why people may take action and how strongly they are driven to act.

5-29. Setting achievable goals can shape motivation. Leaders can break larger missions into smaller tasks to keep individuals engaged without being overwhelmed by the scale or scope of what needs to be done. Subordinates require the necessary skills and abilities to perform the tasks they are assigned, have reason to be committed to the goal, and receive feedback to gauge progress. Task assignment and goal setting account for the capabilities and limitations of those performing the tasks a leader directs. Finally, framing performance goals positively produces better persistence and performance than negative framing.

5-30. Leaders can encourage subordinates to set goals of their own while setting goals for them in terms of duty performance during counseling and coaching. When subordinates accept goals, they are better able to prioritize, focus their attention, and gauge the amount of effort necessary to achieve them.

5-31. Positive reinforcement such as tangible incentives (time off) as well as intangible rewards (praise or recognition) can enhance motivation. Everyone wants their efforts to be appreciated by others. Leaders can use healthy competition to renew intensity, such as recognition for the most improved fitness test score or top crew gunnery score. Leaders can use corrective measures when an immediate need arises to discontinue dangerous or undesirable behavior. By doing so, leaders send a clear message about expectations of behavior and the consequences of violating those expectations. Administer punishment fairly; otherwise, it leads to resentment.

5-32. Leaders assign responsibility, delegate authority, and allocate resources. Leaders empower subordinates by giving them the necessary resources, authority, and clear intent for success. Subordinates should dutifully accept assigned responsibility, take initiative and accept risk within the limits of their authority, and make disciplined use of the resources entrusted to their care. People value opportunities to be responsible for their own work, be creative, and be respected for their abilities. Leaders apply judgment about when to step aside to let subordinates accomplish a mission. Leaders continually develop subordinates so







they are ready to accept ever increasing delegated responsibilities. Empowering others is a forceful statement of trust and one of the best ways of developing subordinates as leaders.

5-33. General Eisenhower’s D-Day statement to the Soldiers, sailors, and airmen (see figure 5-1) is an example of how to provide purpose, direction, and motivation.



Figure 5-1. General Eisenhower’s D-Day statement



UPHOLDING STANDARDS

5-34. Standards provide a mark for performance to assess execution of tasks, as well as compliance with established policy and law. Standards are formal, detailed instructions—observable, measurable, and achievable. Standards and discipline are the point of departure for leading Army organizations. Leaders must enforce Army standards, establish appropriate standards congruent with the Army Ethic where no standards currently exist, and ensure that subordinates understand and adhere to the standards.

5-35. When upholding standards, leaders must be sensitive to the reality that not everything can be a number one priority. In practice, leaders establish priorities because it is impossible to accomplish everything at once. A leader’s ultimate goal is to train to the standards that ensure mission success; all other matters that consume significant time are of secondary importance. To be successful, leaders use the Army training management







process to prepare the organization to meet standards by setting appropriate training goals and to plan, resource, execute, and evaluate training accordingly.



Performing Checks and Inspections

5-36. Thorough inspections ensure equipment is mission capable and subordinates are prepared to perform their assigned duties. Mission specific checks and inspections minimize the chances of neglect or oversight that result in mission failure or needless casualties. Inspections give leaders a chance to recognize subordinates preparedness or make on-the-spot corrections. Subordinates understand that units that routinely perform checks and inspections have established standards and enforce them. Learning to perform effective, efficient checks and inspections is a critical leadership skill. Checks and inspections are a fundamental part of caring for subordinates.



Instilling Discipline

5-37. Leaders who consistently enforce standards instill discipline that will payoff in critical situations. True discipline demands habitual and reasoned obedience. An effective leader instills discipline by training to standard, using rewards and corrective actions judiciously, instilling confidence, building trust among team members, and ensuring they have the necessary technical and tactical expertise to perform their job. Some may associate discipline only with regulations and the consequences for errors in judgment and conduct. However, it is important to understand that discipline is fundamentally about the manner in which leaders practice their profession. Discipline is the means by which leaders advance the standards that are the hallmark of good Army units and organizations.



BALANCING MISSION AND WELFARE

5-38. Having genuine concern for subordinate health and welfare generates motivation, inspiration, and influence—it is the right thing for leaders to do. Army members will be more willing to go the extra mile for leaders whom they respect, and they are more likely to respect leaders who respect them. Sending Soldiers or DA Civilians into harm’s way to accomplish missions is always in tension with the desire to take care of people. Leaders display genuine concern by preparing subordinates through tough realistic training that prepares them for the hazards and dangers of combat.



Taking Care of Subordinates

5-39. Taking care of subordinates is a solemn responsibility. The Army’s purpose demands individuals perform their duties even at risk to their lives. Preparing subordinates for combat is the most important leader duty. Preparation entails creating disciplined conditions for learning and growth and enforcing standards in training. Training must be rigorous and simulate mission conditions as much as possible while keeping safety in mind. Leaders use risk management to balance risk cost with mission benefits during training and operations (see ATP 5-19). Effective leaders also recognize the need to provide reasonable comforts to bolster morale and maintain long-term operational effectiveness.

5-40. Many leaders connect at a personal level with their subordinates, which helps leaders to anticipate and understand individual circumstances and needs. Leaders who take an interest in Soldier and DA Civilian development show they care about their subordinates. It ranges from ensuring a subordinate is given time away from the unit to attend Army schools to finding out about a person’s personal interests. Leaders should provide an adequate family support and readiness network to help families, while at home station or deployed, whether military or civilian.



Identifying High Risk Behavior

5-41. Leaders identify subordinates who exhibit high-risk behavior and take action to reduce it whenever possible. High-risk behavior is a behavioral pattern that intentionally or unintentionally increases an individual’s probability of negative consequences. Examples include driving under the influence, failing to wear proper protective equipment, criminal activity, or illegal use of drugs. Studies also suggest a direct link between increased life stressors and increased high-risk behavior, so knowing subordinates well enough to understand when they are under increased stress is important.







5-42. The Army regulates order and discipline through enforcement of statutes (such as the Uniform Code of Military Justice) and policy. Misconduct represents a conscious decision to accept both the risk associated with a prohibited activity (such as riding a motorcycle without a helmet) and the risk of being caught while violating the standard (the Army’s helmet policy).

5-43. A commander’s primary responsibility is to ensure the readiness, health, morale, welfare, and discipline of the unit. Every leader and follower has a role in supporting that responsibility. Leaders must identify at-risk subordinates and intervene to help them. Table 5-1 summarizes the competency leads others.

Table 5-1. The competency LEADS OTHERS





BUILDS TRUST

5-44. Trust enables the ability of leaders to influence subordinates and effective command and control. Trust encompasses reliance upon others, confidence in their abilities, and consistency in behavior. People naturally accept the influence of people they trust. When high levels of trust exist among members of an organization, its members are more likely to influence each other up and down the chain of command and laterally with other organizations. Trust increases readiness and is essential for developing the shared understanding of intent that facilitates initiative by everyone within the organization. Trust builds over time through mutual respect, shared understanding, and common experiences. Communication contributes to trust by keeping others informed, establishing expectations, providing feedback, and developing commitment. Sustaining trust depends on meeting expectations and commitments. Leaders and subordinates all contribute to the level of trust that occurs in a unit. Leaders and subordinates earn or lose trust through everyday actions and attitudes.

5-45. Importantly, leaders should promote a culture and climate of trust. Teams develop trust through cooperation, identification with other members, and contribution to the team effort. Leaders build trust with their followers and those outside the organization by practicing the leadership competencies and demonstrating character, presence, and intellect. Leaders need to be competent, of good character, and fair and reliable to generate trust.

5-46. Leaders who commit to coaching, counseling, and mentoring subordinates build relationships that foster trust. These relationships built on trust enable leaders to empower subordinates, encourage initiative,







reinforce accountability, and allow for open communication. Further, these relationships establish predictability and cohesion within the team.

5-47. Failure to cultivate a climate of trust or a willingness to tolerate discrimination or harassment on any basis erodes unit cohesion and breaks the trust subordinates have for their leaders. Counterproductive leadership such as favoritism, personal biases, unethical behavior, and poor communication often creates suspicion, doubt, and distrust. Restoring broken trust is not a simple process, requiring situational awareness and significant effort on the part of all affected. Table 5-2 summarizes the competency builds trust.

Table 5-2. The competency BUILDS TRUST





EXTENDS INFLUENCE BEYOND THE CHAIN OF COMMAND

5-48. Extending influence beyond the chain of command is an essential leader competency. While Army leaders exert influence within their established chains of command, leaders must also be capable of extending influence to others beyond the chain of command. Extending influence beyond the chain of command is critical to achieving success in unified action. Extending influence requires special awareness about how influence works in different groups and different situations.

5-49. The key element of extending influence and building teams is creating a shared purpose among prospective team members. A unique aspect of extending influence is that those who a leader wishes to influence outside the unit may not recognize or willingly accept the authority of an Army leader. Often, informal teams develop in situations where no official chains of authority exist. In some cases, this may require leaders to establish their credentials and capability for leading others. Credibility of a person or organization may stem from their appearance, conduct, or reputation. The ways Soldiers act and treat others outside the organization contribute to how others perceive the organization and the credibility of its leaders. Leaders ensure subordinates do not diminish the organization’s credibility or esteem with external observers.

5-50. When extending influence beyond the traditional chain of command, leaders often have to influence without authority designated or implied by rank and position. Civilian and military leaders often find themselves in situations where they must task organize teams to accomplish missions. Leaders, especially commanders, engage and communicate via multiple means (face-to-face, print media, broadcast media, social media, and other emerging collaboration technologies) to influence the perceptions, attitudes, sentiments, and behaviors of key actors and agencies. Leaders should personally engage key players to ensure audiences receive messages as intended.

5-51. Leading without formal authority requires adaptation to the conditions and cultural sensitivities of a given situation. Leaders require cultural knowledge to understand different social customs and belief systems and to address issues in those contexts. When conducting operations, for example, small-unit leaders must understand that their interaction with the local populace and their leaders can have dramatic effects on strategic objectives. The manner in which a unit conducts house-to-house searches for enemy combatants can influence the local population’s acceptance of authority or become a recruiting incentive for the enemy. Table 5-3 summarizes the competency extends influence beyond the chain of command (see page 5-11).







BUILDING TRUST OUTSIDE LINES OF AUTHORITY

5-52. Forming effective, cohesive teams is often a leader’s first challenge working outside a traditional command structure. These teams may form from disparate groups unfamiliar with military customs and culture. Successful teams develop an infectious winner’s attitude. Problems are challenges rather than obstacles. Cohesive teams accomplish missions more efficiently than a loose group of individuals.

5-53. Building coalitions is similar to building teams, but groups maintain generally greater independence in coalitions. Trust is a common ingredient in effective coalitions. Coalitions evolve by establishing contact with others, building relationships, and identifying common interests. An effective strategy for breaking down the barriers among smaller, subordinate group identities is to build or strengthen a common group identity for all members, such as highlighting the common cause shared by all coalition partners.

5-54. Training and working together builds collective competence, mutual trust, and promotes interoperability. Mutual trust ultimately permeates the entire organization, embracing every member.

Breakthrough at Chipyong-ni Korea—February 1951The 23d Infantry Combat Team, 2d Infantry Division, with attached French and Dutch units, was moving forward to attack in advance of the Eighth Army. They were cut off and surrounded by overwhelming forces of Chinese Reds at Chipyong-ni in a narrow Korean valley. The Reds occupied the commanding ridges, while the American commander, isolated far in advance of the general battle line, used a ring of lower hills within the valley itself for his defensive perimeter. For more than three days in near-freezing weather, the defenders held their positions. On the fourth day, an American armored unit broke through from the south. The 23d Infantry Combat Team smashed out of the perimeter at the lower end of the valley to break the encirclement and rejoined the Eighth Army with its units and most equipment intact.General Matthew B. Ridgway, in his official report to a Joint Session of Congress, stated, "These American fighting men with their French comrades in arms measured up in every way to the battle conduct of the finest troops America or France has produced throughout their national existence."



Breakthrough at Chipyong-ni Korea—February 1951

The 23d Infantry Combat Team, 2d Infantry Division, with attached French and Dutch units, was moving forward to attack in advance of the Eighth Army. They were cut off and surrounded by overwhelming forces of Chinese Reds at Chipyong-ni in a narrow Korean valley. The Reds occupied the commanding ridges, while the American commander, isolated far in advance of the general battle line, used a ring of lower hills within the valley itself for his defensive perimeter. For more than three days in near-freezing weather, the defenders held their positions. On the fourth day, an American armored unit broke through from the south. The 23d Infantry Combat Team smashed out of the perimeter at the lower end of the valley to break the encirclement and rejoined the Eighth Army with its units and most equipment intact.

General Matthew B. Ridgway, in his official report to a Joint Session of Congress, stated, "These American fighting men with their French comrades in arms measured up in every way to the battle conduct of the finest troops America or France has produced throughout their national existence."



UNDERSTANDING SPHERE, MEANS, AND LIMITS OF INFLUENCE

5-55. When operating within an established command structure and common procedures, the provisions and limits of roles and responsibilities are readily apparent. When leading outside an established organization, assessing the parties involved becomes another part of the operation. Identifying who is who, what role they have, over whom they have authority or influence, and how they are likely to respond to the Army leader’s influence are important considerations. Sometimes this is viewed as understanding the limits to the Army’s or the leader’s influence.

5-56. Spanning the boundaries of disparate groups or organizations requires special attention. A key to extending influence outside the chain of command is learning about those organizations. By understanding their interests and desires, the leader will know what methods of influence are most likely to work.



NEGOTIATING, BUILDING CONSENSUS, AND RESOLVING CONFLICTS

5-57. Leaders must often resolve conflicts. One method is negotiation. Negotiation is a problem-solving process in which two or more parties discuss and seek to satisfy their interests on various issues through joint decisions. The desired end state of the negotiation process is creation of a suitable choice between a clear, realistic, and satisfactory commitment and a reasonable alternative to a negotiated agreement that better meets the leader’s interests. Interests relate to each party’s needs, fears, concerns, goals, and motivations. Parties’ interests may be shared, different, or in conflict. Effective leaders negotiate around interests rather than positions that tend to be static and unyielding.







5-58. Leaders often must use negotiation skills to obtain the cooperation and support necessary to accomplish a mission beyond the traditional chain of command. During complex operations, different unified action partners might operate under constraints of their national or organizational chains. This can result in important negotiations and conflict resolution versus a simpler process of issuing binding orders.

5-59. Successful negotiation, employing a joint problem-solving approach, involves building effective relationships, establishing two-way communication, understanding positions to clarify interests, creating possible solutions, using fair standards, and creating a sensible choice from firm, clear commitments, and realistic alternatives. Credible negotiators test their assumptions, measure success appropriately for a given situation, systematically prepare, make deliberate process-oriented decisions in conducting negotiations, and thoroughly review interactions.

5-60. Not all partnerships are enduring. Some are intended only for a limited time. Others are expected to last until a specific end state has been achieved. Leaders look ahead, anticipating future scenarios and the conditions under which a partnership will or should dissolve. They help define roles and responsibilities for elements of a post-alliance state to ensure a smooth transition process and set conditions so the desired end state persists after the partnership has ended.

5-61. Successful negotiations involve several activities. Leaders should—

Understand and be willing to challenge assumptions about all parties involved, the desired outcome, the situation, and the negotiation itself.

Consider the measures of success for negotiation and choose the correct one for the situation.

Prepare thoroughly in a manner that supports the desired outcome and process for negotiation.

Build effective working relationships based on genuine rapport, respect, and reputation. Separate relationship issues from substantive issues and address both on their own merits.

Use meaningful communication among involved parties to inquire, acknowledge, and advocate by demonstrating active listening and understanding while shaping perceptions and emotions of all parties.

Generate many options or creative solutions that meet the interests of all parties as well as possible. Creating options should be separate from evaluating and deciding.

Use objective, balanced, and fair criteria, standards, and merit to evaluate options. Apply a reciprocity test: would one party find this aspect fair if they proposed it?

Determine alternatives to a negotiated agreement. Alternatives are ways that each party can meet their interests without creating an agreement in the current negotiation. What is the best alternative to a negotiated agreement for each party?

Commit to an agreement only if it is better than alternatives, is the best option, and meets interests based on fair criteria. A commitment should be clearly defined, well planned, and reasonable to implement. Leaders must not promise what they cannot or will not deliver just to reach an agreement.

Review each negotiation systematically and use lessons to learn from one interaction to the next.

Table 5-3. The competency EXTENDS INFLUENCE BEYOND THE CHAIN OF COMMAND







LEADS BY EXAMPLE

Example whether it be good or bad has a powerful influence…

George Washington

Commander, Continental Army (1775-81) and President of the United States (1789-97)



DISPLAYING CHARACTER

5-62. Leaders are a product of their experiences. What leaders see others do forms their expectations for decisions and actions. Leaders who intentionally live by the Army Values and the Warrior Ethos will consistently display the character and actions that set a positive example. They put the organization and subordinates above personal self-interest, career, and comfort. For the Army leader, it requires putting the lives of others above a personal desire for self-preservation.



Leading with Confidence in Adverse Conditions

5-63. A leader who projects confidence is an inspiration to others. Subordinates will follow leaders who are competent and comfortable with their own abilities. Leaders who understand their own abilities can gain greater respect from their subordinates for their honesty, even as they seek to improve.

5-64. Displaying confidence and composure when situations are not going well can be a challenge for anyone, but is important for the leader trying to lead others through challenging, stressful, and ambiguous situations. Calm determination reflects confidence and is a key component of leader presence. A leader who shows hesitation or panic in the face of setbacks can trigger a chain reaction among others. A leader who is over-confident in difficult situations may lack the proper degree of care or concern, and risks being viewed as not understanding the seriousness of the problems at hand.

5-65. Leading with confidence requires a heightened self-awareness and ability to master one’s emotions. Regardless of the situation, developing the ability to remain confident involves—

Having prior opportunities to experience one’s reactions to adverse, high-pressure situations.

Maintaining a positive outlook when a situation becomes confusing or changes.

Remaining decisive after making or realizing mistakes.

Encouraging others when they show signs of weakness.



Displaying Courage

5-66. Projecting confidence in combat and other dangerous situations requires physical and moral courage. While physical courage allows Soldiers to face mortal risks to life and limb, moral courage empowers leaders to stand firm on values, principles, and convictions. Leaders who take responsibility for their decisions and actions display moral courage. Morally courageous leaders critically look at themselves, consider new ideas, and implement change when needed.

5-67. Moral courage in daily operations is as important as physical courage in combat. Consider a DA Civilian test board director who has the responsibility to determine whether a new piece of military equipment performs to established specifications. Knowing that a failed test may cause the possibility of personal pressure and command resistance from the program management office, a morally courageous tester will be prepared to endure that pressure and remain objective and fair in test procedures and conclusions. Moral courage is fundamental to living the Army Values of integrity and honor, for all civilian or military members.



DEMONSTRATING COMPETENCE

5-68. Having the appropriate levels of expertise is vital to competent leaders who display confidence through their attitudes, actions, and words. Subordinates become suspicious of leaders who act confident but do not demonstrate the competence to justify their confidence.









Master Sergeant Roy P. Benavidez Vietnam—2 May 1968

On Sergeant Roy Benavidez's first tour of duty in Vietnam in 1965, he was severely injured by a land mine. Never expected to walk again, he proved the doctors wrong. Through raw tenacity, he regained the mobility and fitness to return to South Vietnam with the 5th Special Forces Group in 1968. In May, a distress call came over the radio: a team had become surrounded and was taking heavy casualties. With no time to grab his rifle and armed with only a knife, he joined the rescue helicopter.

Upon arriving, he realized that all of the team were either dead or wounded and unable to move. Then-SSG Benavidez directed the aircraft to a clearing and jumped to the ground. He was wounded in his leg, face, and head while moving to the isolated team. Despite these injuries, he took charge, repositioning and directing their team’s fire to facilitate the landing of an extraction aircraft. He bound the survivors’ wounds and administered morphine. Despite his own severe wounds and under intense enemy fire, he carried and dragged half of the wounded to the awaiting aircraft. He then provided protective fire by running alongside the aircraft as it moved to pick up remaining team members. Under intense enemy fire, he moved around the perimeter distributing water and ammunition, and re-instilling the will to live and fight. Facing a buildup of enemy opposition, SSG Benavidez called in tactical air strikes and directed fire from supporting gunships to permit another rescue attempt. He was wounded again by small arms fire while administering first aid to a wounded team member. Still, he assisted his comrades to the craft. "Pray and move out" he told each one as they boarded. SSG Benavidez's gallant choice to voluntarily join pinned down Soldiers, to expose himself repeatedly to enemy fire, and his refusal to be stopped despite severe injuries, saved the lives of at least eight men. When his actions were described as awesome and extraordinary, Benavidez replied: “No, that's duty.”

President Ronald Reagan presented Benavidez the Medal of Honor on 24 February 1981 for his heroism while wounded.







5-69. Table 5-4 summarizes the competency leads by example.

Table 5-4. The competency LEADS BY EXAMPLE





COMMUNICATES

5-70. Competent leadership requires good communication. Communication as a competency ensures more than the simple transmission of information. Communication generates shared understanding and situational awareness. Succinctly communicating information in a clear manner is an important skill for both leaders







and subordinates to learn. Leaders cannot lead, supervise, counsel, coach, mentor, or build teams without communication. Table 5-5 summarizes the competency communicates (see page 5-16).



LISTENING ACTIVELY

5-71. An important part of effective two-way communication is active listening. Although the most important purpose of listening is to comprehend the sender’s message, listeners should provide an occasional indication to the speaker that they are attentive, such as a head nod when face-to-face or stating “roger” when using radio or telephonic communication. Active listening involves avoiding interruption and keeping mental or written notes (when possible) of important points or items for clarification. Good listeners will understand the message being sent in terms of its content, urgency, and the emotion with which it is communicated.

5-72. Leaders should remain aware of barriers to listening that prevent hearing and absorbing what speakers say. Avoid formulating a response before hearing what the person says. Avoid distraction by anger, disagreement with the speaker, or other things that impede focusing on the message itself.



CREATE SHARED UNDERSTANDING

5-73. Competent leaders know themselves, the mission, and the message. They owe their organizations and subordinates information that directly applies to their duties, providing context, and purpose. Sharing information contributes to shared understanding. Additionally, sharing information prepares subordinates for future duties and greater responsibility.

5-74. When leaders keep their organizations informed, they build trust. Shared information contributes to reduced stress and controls rumors. Timely information exchange allows team members to determine requirements and adjust to changing circumstances. Informing subordinates of a decision and the supporting reasons shows respect and conveys the need for their support and input. Good information flow ensures the next leader in the chain is sufficiently prepared to take over, if required.

5-75. Leaders use a variety of means to share information: face-to-face talks, written and verbal orders, running estimates and plans, published memos, white board sketches, briefings, email, websites, social media, and newsletters. To create shared understanding, a leader must acknowledge two critical factors:

A leader is responsible for making sure the team understands what is communicated.

A leader must consider informing elements outside the formal chain of command.

5-76. Any means other than face-to-face communication present some risk for misunderstanding due to the lack of verbal and non-verbal cues. Building rapport and trust is an ongoing, long-term effort that occurs during unit formation, individual unit reception, day-to-day garrison operations, and training exercises. It continues during operational missions. Learning what key leaders and staff mean when they say or write something is key to creating a basis for shared understanding. Taking adequate time to communicate when forming relationships is important to setting the right conditions, as are brief backs to confirm intent. Speaking candidly and asking for clarification when necessary are important steps in creating shared understanding. Email, websites, and social media have increased the volume and speed of available information. However, they minimize verbal cues and lack the non-verbal cues that are vital to clear communications and shared understanding between people. Leaders need to guard against over-reliance upon electronic means to communicate with each other and with subordinates. Leaders should use face-to-face communications with subordinates as much as possible to ensure understanding and to observe the feedback cues given by listeners.

5-77. Communication also flows from bottom to top. Leaders find out what their people are thinking, saying, and doing by listening. Effective leaders observe their organizations by circulating among their followers to coach, listen, and clarify. They pass relevant observations to enable planning and decision-making.

5-78. To lead an organization effectively, leaders must determine how to reach their superiors when necessary and to build relationships of mutual trust upward. Leaders assess how their direct leader communicates and prefers to receive information. Some use direct and personal contact while others may be more comfortable with weekly meetings, email, or memoranda. Knowing the leader’s intent, priorities, and thought processes improves the likelihood of effective communication. A leader who communicates well minimizes friction and improves the overall organizational climate.







5-79. To prepare organizations for inevitable communication challenges, leaders may create situations that train subordinates to act with minimal guidance or only the commander’s intent. Leaders provide formal or informal feedback to highlight things subordinates did well, what they could have done better, and what they should do differently next time to improve information sharing and processing.

5-80. Open communication does more than share information. It shows leaders care about those they work with on a daily basis. Competent and confident leaders encourage open dialogue, listen actively to all perspectives, and ensure others can voice honest opinions without fearing negative consequences.

Table 5-5. The competency COMMUNICATES









Chapter 6

Develops

The commander must assure each of his officers, noncommissioned officers, and soldiers, the opportunity to improve military proficiency and to prepare mentally and physically for battle. Every unit commander of the US Army is responsible for the progressive professional development of every soldier in his command.

FM 100-5 (1976)



DEVELOPS LEADERS

6-1. Military leadership is unique because the armed forces develop and select their own leaders. The responsibilities of Army members change as they assume new leadership positions. To ensure the quality of our leaders and future leaders does not diminish, all Army Soldiers and DA civilians have a responsibility to develop themselves and their subordinates. In Army leadership, there are four competencies in the category of develops that leaders consider while preparing themselves and their subordinates. A leader—

Prepares self to encourage improvement in leading and other areas of leader responsibility.

Creates a positive environment and inspires an organization’s climate and culture.

Develop others to assume greater responsibility or achieve higher expertise.

Stewards the profession to maintain professional standards and effective capabilities for the future.

6-2. Leaders develop their own leadership proficiency through deliberate study, feedback, and practice. Fundamentally, leadership develops when an individual desires to improve and invests effort, their superior supports development, and the organizational climate values learning. Learning to be a leader requires knowledge of leadership, experience using this knowledge, and feedback from one’s seniors, peers, and subordinates. It also requires opportunities to practice leading others as often as possible. Formal systems such as evaluation reports, academic evaluation reports, and 360 assessments offer learning opportunities, but the individual must embrace the opportunity and internalize the information. The fastest learning occurs when multiple challenging and interesting opportunities to practice leadership with meaningful and honest feedback are present. These elements contribute to self-development, developing others, and setting a climate conducive to learning.

6-3. Leader development of others involves recruiting, accessing, developing, assigning, promoting, and retaining the leaders with the potential for levels of greater responsibility. Leaders develop subordinates when they prepare and then challenge them with greater responsibility, authority, and accountability. It is the individual professional responsibility of all leaders to develop their subordinates as leaders.

6-4.  Successful leader development is based on five tenets (see FM 6-22):

Strong commitment by the Army, superiors, and individuals to leader development.

Clear purpose for what, when, and how to develop leadership.

Supportive relationships and culture of learning.

Three mutually supportive domains (institutional, operational, and self-development) that enable education, training, and experience.

Providing, accepting, and acting upon candid assessment and feedback.

6-5. Committed leaders continuously improve their organization, leaving it better than they found it. They expect other leaders to do the same. Leaders look ahead and prepare subordinates with potential to assume positions with greater leadership responsibility; in turn, subordinates develop themselves to prepare for future leadership assignments. Leaders ensure subordinates know that those who are best prepared for increased responsibility are those they are most likely to select for higher leadership positions.







6-6. Army leaders set priorities and weigh competing demands to balance individual and unit goals over various timeframes. They carefully steer their organizations’ efforts to develop toward both short- and longterm goals, while continuing to meet immediate requirements. Competing demands that vie for an organization’s resources complicate a leader’s work. Guidance from higher headquarters may help, but leaders have to make the tough calls to maintain a healthy balance.



PREPARES SELF

6-7. Leader preparation begins with self-awareness about one’s strengths and limitations, followed by focused self-development. Leaders maintain self-discipline, physical fitness, and mental well-being. They continue to improve their technical, tactical, and leadership expertise. Acquiring the necessary leadership skills to be successful is challenging and critical. In no other profession is the cost of being unprepared to lead so unforgiving in terms of mission failure and loss of life.

6-8. Self-development is continuous and begins with the motivated individual, supplemented by a concerted team effort. Part of that team effort is quality feedback from multiple sources, including peers, subordinates, and superiors to establish self-development goals and self-improvement courses of action. These improve performance by enhancing previously acquired skills, knowledge, behaviors, and experience. Mentorship can focus self-development efforts to achieve professional objectives. Table 6-1 summarizes the competency prepares self (see page 6-4).



BEING PREPARED FOR EXPECTED AND UNEXPECTED CHALLENGES

6-9. Successful self-development concentrates on the key attributes of the leader: character, presence, and intellect. While refining abilities to apply and model the Army Values, Army leaders maintain high levels of fitness and health, not only to set the example and earn the respect of others, but also to withstand the stresses of leading and maintaining their ability to think clearly. Leaders must exploit every available opportunity to sharpen their intellectual capacity and relevant knowledge. A developed intellect enables the leader to think creatively and reason analytically, critically, ethically, and with cultural sensitivity.

6-10. When faced with diverse operational settings, leaders draw on their intellectual capacity, critical and creative thinking abilities, and applicable expertise. Leaders create these capabilities by studying doctrine and putting the information into context with personal experiences, military history, and geopolitical awareness. Self-development should include learning languages, the operational environment, military theory, and tactics, techniques, and procedures of potential adversaries. A broad and continuous approach to learning lessens the chances that a leader will face a completely unfamiliar situation, no matter how unexpected.

6-11. Civilian and military education is an important part of professional development. Leaders should seek out further education and training opportunities beyond what the Army requires; doing so reflects the intellectual curiosity that the most effective leaders understand being prepared for the unexpected situations they may face. As leaders assume levels of greater responsibility, the problems they face and decisions they make become more complex. This requires that they become life-long learners and develop a keen sense of self-awareness. Leaders who assume they already know everything they need to know set themselves and their organizations up for failure.



EXPANDING KNOWLEDGE

6-12. Leaders read about, write about, and practice their profession. They prepare themselves for leadership positions through lifelong learning and broadening experiences relevant to their career paths. Lifelong learning involves study to acquire new knowledge, reflection, and understanding about how to apply it when needed. Broadening consists of those education and training opportunities, assignments, and experiences that provide exposure outside the leader’s narrow branch or functional area competencies. Broadening should be complementary to a leader’s experience, and should provide wider perspectives that prepare the leader for greater levels of responsibility.

6-13. Some are fast learners; others must work harder to learn. Becoming a better learner involves—







Having a plan.

Focusing on achievable goals.

Making time to study.

Absorbing new information.

Applying what one has learned.



DEVELOPING SELF-AWARENESS

6-14. As a critical element of adaptability, self-awareness enables leaders to recognize their strengths and weaknesses across a range of conditions and progressively employ strengths to correct weaknesses. Awareness of weaknesses also helps leaders rely on others who possess strengths the leader may lack. To be self-aware, leaders must be able to formulate accurate self-perceptions, gather feedback from others, and change their self-concept as appropriate. Being self-aware ultimately requires leaders to develop a clear, honest picture of their capabilities and limitations.

6-15. Leaders develop self-awareness though self-critique and self-regulation. Self-aware leaders are open to feedback from others and actively seek it. They possess the humility to ask themselves hard questions about their performance, decisions, and judgment. They are serious about examining their own behavior to determine how to be a better, more effective leader. Self-aware leaders are reflective, hold themselves to higher standards than their subordinates, and look to themselves first when subordinates are unsuccessful. Self-aware leaders use others’ strengths to offset their professional shortcomings and are willing to learn from others. Being self-aware ultimately requires leaders to develop a clear, honest picture of their own capabilities and limitations.

6-16. Self-aware leaders understand they are a component of a larger organization that demands both adaptability and humility. They understand the importance of flexibility because conditions continuously change. They also understand that the focus is on the mission, not them. Subordinates see leaders who lack self-awareness as arrogant or disconnected. They may be technically competent but lack awareness as to how others see them. This may obstruct their readiness to learn and ability to adapt. Lacking awareness can keep them from creating a positive, learning work climate. Self-aware leaders sense how others react to their actions, decisions, and example.

6-17. Competent and confident leaders make sense of their experience and use it to learn more about themselves. Journals and after action reviews (AARs) are valuable tools in gaining an understanding of one’s experiences and reactions to changes in conditions. Self-critique can be as simple as posing questions about one’s own behavior, knowledge, or feelings or as formal as using a structured set of questions about an event. Critical questions include—

What happened?

How did I react?

How did others react and why?

What did I learn about myself based on what I did and how I felt?

How will I apply what I learned?

6-18. In rapidly changing conditions, self-awareness is a critical factor in making accurate assessments of changes and a leader’s personal capabilities and limitations to operate in those conditions. Self-awareness allows leaders to translate prior training to new conditions and seek the information they need to adapt. Self-aware leaders are more responsive to situational and interpersonal cues regarding actions to take. They are better informed and able to determine what assistance to seek to handle a given situation.

6-19. Adjusting one’s thoughts, feelings, and actions without prompting from others is self-regulation. Soldiers and DA Civilians self-regulate when they realize that their actions fall short of the standards they have for themselves and take the initiative to close the gap. Leaders who self-regulate have an advantage over those who do not.







Table 6-1. The competency PREPARES SELF





CREATES A POSITIVE ENVIRONMENT/FOSTERS ESPRIT DE CORPS

6-20. Army leaders ensure that they create the conditions for a positive environment, build trust and cohesion on their team, encourage initiative, demonstrate care for their people, and enhance esprit de corps by







connecting current operations to the unit's traditions and history. Army leaders are approachable when they encourage open, candid communications and observations. Approachable leaders show respect for others' opinions, even if contrary or non-doctrinal. To be approachable, leaders remain objective when receiving bad news and encourage subordinates to be open and candid in their communication.

6-21. Culture and climate describe the conditions in which a leader leads. Leaders have direct and indirect effects on culture and climate. Culture refers to the environment of the Army as an institution and of major elements or communities within it. All leaders affect the climate at their respective echelon, which may eventually affect the Army’s culture.

6-22. Culture is a longer lasting and more complex set of shared expectations than climate. Culture consists of shared attitudes, values, goals, and practices that characterize the larger institution over time. The Army’s culture is deeply rooted in tradition. Leaders refer to Army’s culture to impress on Army personnel that they are part of something bigger than themselves. Soldiers and DA Civilians uphold the Army’s culture to honor those who have gone before and those who will come after.

6-23. Climate is a shorter-term experience than culture and reflects how people think and feel about their organization. Climate depends upon a network of personalities within a unit that changes as Army personnel come and go. A unit’s climate, based on shared perceptions and attitudes, affects mutual trust, cohesion, and commitment to the mission. A positive climate ensures Soldiers and DA Civilians are engaged and energized by their duties, work together as teams, and show respect for each other.

6-24. A healthy Army culture and organizational climate will exhibit six overarching characteristics (see AR 600-100 ):

The Army culture and unit climate foster unity, cohesion, and trust.

The culture promotes and rewards mental agility, the ability to break from established paradigms, recognize new patterns or circumstances, and adopt new solutions to problems.

The Army supports the selection of leaders and rewards members who demonstrate the ability to sense and understand the environment quickly to exploit fleeting opportunities or counter unexpected threats.

The Army requires and rewards delegation of authority on the part of leaders, and the understanding and prompt, thorough execution of leader’s intent (two levels up) by subordinates.

The Army selects and rewards leaders who provide clear priorities and focus their unit’s time and organizational energy on their mission.

The Army culture is one of inclusion that demands diversity of knowledge and perspectives to accomplish missions ethically, effectively, and efficiently.



ESTABLISHING A POSITIVE ENVIRONMENT

6-25. Leaders make it a point to dialogue with subordinates about the conditions of their lives and the unit to get a sense of the climate. Communicating goals openly provides subordinates a clear vision to achieve. Communication between subordinates and leaders is essential to achieve and maintain a positive climate. Leaders inspire and motivate subordinates to bring creative and innovative ideas forward and they seek feedback from subordinates about the climate. Openly taking part in unit events and activities increases the likelihood that subordinates perceive leaders are concerned about the group’s welfare and has the group’s best interests at heart.

6-26. Leaders are ethical standard-bearers for the organization, responsible for establishing and maintaining a professional climate wherein all are expected to live by and uphold the Army Values. Other staff specialists—the chaplain, staff judge advocate, inspector general, and equal employment opportunity specialist—assist leaders and assess the organization’s climate. Regardless of available expert assistance, the ultimate responsibility to create and maintain an ethical climate rests with the leader.

6-27. Setting the right example does not necessarily mean subordinates will follow it. Some may feel that circumstances justify misconduct. Therefore, leaders must monitor the organization’s ethical climate and take prompt action to correct any discrepancies. It is important for subordinates to have confidence in the organization’s ethical environment because much of what is necessary in combat conflicts with societal







values that individuals bring into the Army. Strong commitment to the Army Values, Army Ethic, and Warrior Ethos by the commander fosters a unit’s ethical climate.

6-28. Leaders need to continually assess the organizational climate, realize the importance of development, and work to limit any zero-defect mentality. Recognizing the importance of long-term sustainability and sharing and encouraging feedback (both positive and negative) should be a priority for all team members. Leaders create positive climates by treating all fairly, maintaining open and candid communications between other leaders and subordinates, and creating and supporting learning environments.



ASSESSING ENVIRONMENT

6-29. Leader behavior signals to every member of the organization what is and is not tolerated. The members’ collective sense of the group—its organizational climate—is influenced by the leader’s values, skills, and actions. Leaders must continuously assess the state of their organizational climates. Feedback from climate assessments (see AR 600-20 and AR 600-100) assist leaders in this effort.

6-30. To accurately assess organizational climates, leaders can develop a focused plan of action as follows—

Assess the unit. Observe those in the unit, gather feedback, and conduct focus group sessions of the workplace. Chaplains may assist with ethical climate assessment through informal means or by use of ethical climate assessment surveys (see GTA 22-06-001).

Analyze gathered information to identify what needs improvement. After identifying what needs improvement, begin developing courses of action for improvements.

Select a plan of action to correct identified weaknesses. Gather important information, assess limitations and risks associated with the various courses, identify available key personnel and resources, and verify facts and assumptions. Attempt to predict outcomes for each possible course of action. Based on predictions, select several leader actions to address target issues.

Execute the plan of action by educating, training, or counseling subordinates; instituting new policies or procedures; and revising or enforcing proper systems of rewards and punishment. Periodically reassess the chosen actions.



BUILDING TRUST AND COHESION

6-31. Trust and cohesion are characteristics of the Army culture that have direct impacts on climate. Leaders encourage subordinates to work together for the greater good while promoting pride in organizational accomplishments. Subordinates trust leaders who underwrite their good faith efforts to act in accordance with their leaders' intents. If the outcome is not what the leader expects, the leader and subordinate discuss the problem and develop a strategy to get back on track.

6-32. Trust also follows when a team appreciates a concerted, honest effort even when the results are incomplete. Army members gain confidence in leaders who enable them to achieve standards and demand quality performance. Leaders build cohesive teams by setting and maintaining a collective mindset among team members and enabling successful performance.

6-33. Conflict occurs when people disagree about ideas or feel their interests are threatened. Conflict does not require the involvement of two people, nor is it necessarily based on facts. One person may be in conflict with another, without the second person realizing it or being at fault. Leaders should identify and resolve conflict before it affects personal and organizational functioning, good order and discipline, and cohesion.

6-34. Leaders should be able to resolve two kinds of conflicts: work-related and personal. Any given conflict is likely to contain some level of both elements. Work-related conflict can stem from disagreement over a course of action, workload perceptions, or the best steps for completing a specific task. Personal conflicts generally stem from people who do not like or respect each other or some perceived grievance based upon individual behavior. Leaders need to develop the skills to address both types of conflicts as rapidly and effectively as possible. Conflicts that simmer lower the morale and duty performance of those involved and can corrode an organizational cohesion when not quickly addressed.







ENCOURAGING INITIATIVE

6-35. Encouraging subordinates to exercise initiative can be a significant challenge. Those who are not in leadership positions are sometimes reluctant to recognize when a situation calls for them to accept responsibility and step forward. Climate largely shapes the degree to which unit members feel comfortable exhibiting initiative and providing input. Leaders create the conditions for initiative by guiding others in thinking through problems for themselves.



DEMONSTRATING CARE FOR PEOPLE

6-36. The nation entrusts the Army leader with its most precious commodity, its sons and daughters. Army leaders embrace this responsibility and keep the well-being of their subordinates and their families in mind. There are times when leaders place their subordinates in harm’s way; this is not because they do not care for them, but because they have a duty to the Nation. Leaders also care for subordinates by maintaining their training level so in the event of combat they are well prepared.

6-37. Leaders who respect those with whom they work will likely garner respect in return. Simple actions can demonstrate respect and care, such as listening patiently or addressing families’ needs. Detecting change in morale and actively seeking honest feedback about the health of individuals and the organization indicate care.



ESPRIT DE CORPS, TRADITION, AND HISTORY

6-38. Historians describing great armies often focus on weapons, equipment, and training. They may mention advantages in numbers or other factors easily analyzed, measured, and compared. However, many historians place great emphasis on two factors not easily measured: esprit de corps and morale.

6-39. Esprit de corps is a traditional military expression that denotes the collective camaraderie and cohesion within a unit. Morale is associated with an individual's sense of well-being—mental, spiritual, and physical. Esprit de corps and individual morale are critical factors affecting mutual trust, cohesive teamwork, and the commitment to persevere through adversity, challenges, and setbacks. Focus on customs, courtesies, traditions, and reflection on the organization’s history and accomplishments strengthen esprit de corps. Whether engaging enemy forces, establishing security for a lasting peace, or rebuilding a community devastated by natural disaster, esprit de corps helps organizations overcome adversity and challenges. Leaders who demonstrate genuine concern for the welfare of their subordinates strengthen morale. However, leaders breed cynicism, compromise mutual trust, and degrade morale if they allow disconnects between their words and deeds to occur.

6-40. Leaders who foster tradition and an awareness of history build camaraderie and unit cohesion, becoming esprit de corps. Army members draw strength from knowing they are part of long-standing tradition. Many of the Army’s everyday customs and traditions remind Soldiers they are the latest addition to a long line of Soldiers. The uniforms, official ceremonies, music, salutes, military titles, organizational history, and the Army Values are reminders of tradition. This sense of belonging lives in many veterans long after they have left service. For many, service to the Nation remains the single most significant experience of their lives.

6-41. Unit names such as the Big Red One, All American, Keystone Division, and Rainbow Division carry extensive histories and traditions. To sustain tradition, leaders pass on the history that surrounds unit crests, awards, decorations, and badges. Upholding traditions ensures the Army’s culture becomes integral to every member of the Army team.

6-42. Table 6-2 on page 6-8 summarizes the competency creates a positive environment.







Table 6-2. The competency CREATES A POSITIVE ENVIRONMENT





DEVELOPS OTHERS

6-43. Army leaders, as stewards of the profession, place the needs of the Army as a whole above organizational or personal needs. They have an obligation to be competent in their jobs and train subordinates







to be competent in their jobs. Effective leaders balance the long-term needs of the Army, the near-term and career needs of their subordinates, and the immediate needs of their unit’s mission. All Army leaders have a duty to prepare subordinates for responsibilities at the next level.

6-44. The Army develops leaders through three complementary domains. The institutional domain includes Army centers and schools that provide functional and professional military education such as Airborne school and the Army Management Staff College. The basic knowledge gleaned in the institutional Army develops further through the operational domain. The operational domain encompasses all activities that allow leaders to learn through experiences. Optimizing leader development in the operational domain requires a deliberate approach to leader progression in the context of training events and operational deployments, where leaders apply what they learned from schools to a wide variety of situations and environments. The self-development domain encompasses what individuals do to pursue personal and professional development goals.

6-45. FM 6-22 provides techniques about how to create a leader development program and enhance leader development. Effective leader development programs instill in all Soldiers and DA Civilians the desire and drive to improve their professional knowledge and competencies. This approach prepares current and future Army leaders for the challenges they face ahead.



EMPOWERING LEARNING

6-46. A leader has the responsibility to foster subordinates’ learning. Leaders explain the importance of a particular topic or subject by providing context—how it will improve individual and organizational performance. For instance, leaders discuss the significance of effective counseling with subordinates to help them understand its impact in developing future leaders, achieving goals, managing expectations, and improving organizations.

6-47. Learning from experience is not always possible—leaders cannot have every experience in training. Taking advantage of what others have learned provides benefits without having the personal experience. Leaders should share their experiences with subordinates through counseling, coaching, and mentoring sessions; for example, combat veterans can share experiences with Soldiers who have not been in combat. Leaders should also take the opportunity to write about their experiences, sharing their insights with others in professional journals or books.



ASSESSING DEVELOPMENTAL NEEDS

6-48. An important step in developing others is to understand which areas are already strong and which should be stronger. Leaders who know their subordinates understand where to encourage development. Leaders observe new subordinates under different task conditions to identify strengths and weaknesses and to see how quickly they pick up new information and skills.

6-49. Leaders continuously assess the developmental needs of their subordinates. They evaluate the competence of their subordinates. They assess whether someone can meet the expectations of a new position. They review the organization’s policies, status reports, and recent inspection results for indicators of weak areas. They ask outgoing leaders for an assessment and meet with key people outside the organization. Effective leaders periodically update their in-depth assessments since a thorough assessment enables gradual and systematic changes without causing damaging organizational turmoil.

6-50. FM 6-22 provides indicators of leader performance and information on determining whether each attribute and competency is a strength, meeting standard, or a developmental need. To objectively assess subordinates over time, leaders—

Observe and record subordinates’ performance in the core leader competencies.

Determine if their performances meet, exceed, or fall below expected standards.

Share observations with subordinates and provide an opportunity for them to comment.

6-51. Leader development doctrine furnishes detailed information on assessing individual capabilities and expanding them through feedback, study, and practice. FM 6-22 provides learning activities for all leader attributes and competencies. This information is useful whether a leader is developing self or others.







COUNSELING, COACHING, AND MENTORING

6-52. Leaders have three principal roles in developing others. They provide knowledge and feedback through counseling, coaching, and mentoring. Providing feedback is a common element of interacting with others, regardless of developmental role or process. Feedback significantly contributes to development, accelerates learning in day-to-day experiences, and translates into better performance. Providing feedback starts with observation and accurate assessment of performance. Planning to make observations of a subordinate is the first step in feedback. The best observations occur when subordinates engage in critical performance, interact with others, or address a challenging problem. Keeping observation notes is useful when tracking multiple subordinates. Table 6-3 provides a concise comparison of each approach to development (see page 6-11).



Counseling

6-53. Counseling is central to leader development. Counseling is the process used by leaders to guide subordinates to improve performance and develop their potential. Subordinates are active participants in the counseling process. During counseling, leaders help subordinates to identify strengths and weaknesses and create plans of action. To make the plans work, leaders actively support their subordinates throughout the implementation and assessment processes. Subordinates invest themselves in the process by being forthright in their willingness to improve and being candid in their assessment and goal setting. Counseling is an integral part of a comprehensive program to develop subordinates. With effective counseling, no evaluation report— positive or negative—should be a surprise. A counseling program includes all subordinates, not just those thought to have the most potential. See ATP 6-22.1 for more information on the counseling process.



Coaching

6-54. Coaching relies primarily on teaching and guiding to bring out and enhance capabilities already present. Coaching is a development technique used for a skill, task, or specific behaviors. The coach helps them understand their current level of performance and guides them to reach the next level of development. Coaches should possess considerable knowledge in the area in which they coach others.

6-55. Coaches use all or some of the following approaches depending on the subordinate and situation:

Focus Goals: This requires the coach to identify the specific purpose of the coaching session. Both the person being coached and the coach need to discuss expectations. The coach communicates to the individual the developmental tasks for the coaching session, which can incorporate results of the individual’s 360-degree assessment and feedback report.

Clarify the Leader’s Self-Awareness: The coach works directly with the individual to define both strengths and developmental needs. During this session, the coach and the individual communicate perceived strengths, developmental needs, and focus areas to improve performance. Both the coach and the individual agree on areas of developmental needs.

Uncover Potential: The coach facilitates self-awareness of the individual’s potential and developmental needs by guiding the discussion with questions. The coach actively listens to how the individual perceives potential. The aim is to encourage the free flow of ideas. The coach also assesses the individual’s readiness to change and incorporates this into the session.

Eliminate Developmental Barriers: The coach identifies developmental needs with the individual and areas that may hinder self-development. The coach helps the individual determine how to overcome barriers to development and implement an effective plan to improve performance. The coach helps identify potential sources of support for implementing an action plan.

Develop Action Plans: The coach and the individual develop an action plan defining actions that can improve performance within a given period. The coach uses a developmental action guide to communicate those self-directed activities the individual can accomplish to improve performance in a particular competency.

Follow-Up: After the initial session, the coach should conduct a follow-up as part of a larger transition. Additionally, participants should provide feedback concerning the effectiveness of the assessment, the usefulness of the information received, and progress made. Coaches provide frequent informal feedback and timely, proactive, formal counseling to regularly inspire and improve subordinates.







Mentoring

6-56. Mentorship is the voluntary developmental relationship that exists between a person of greater experience and a person of lesser experience that is characterized by mutual trust and respect (AR 600-100). The following generally characterize mentorship:

Mentoring takes place when the mentor provides a less experienced leader with advice and counsel over time to aid professional and personal growth.

The developing leader often initiates the relationship and seeks counsel from the mentor. The mentor takes initiative to check on the well-being and development of the leader.

Mentorship affects personal development (maturity, interpersonal and communication skills) as well as professional development (technical, tactical, and career path knowledge).

Mentorship empowers the Army to maintain a highly competent set of leaders.

The strength of a mentoring relationship relies on mutual trust and respect. Protégés carefully consider assessment, feedback, and guidance; these become valuable for growth to occur.

6-57. Mentoring relationships exist outside the superior-subordinate relationship. Supportive mentoring occurs when a mentor does not outrank the person mentored, but has extensive knowledge and experience to share. Mentoring relationships may occur between peers and between senior NCOs and junior officers; thus, mentoring can occur across many levels of rank. Civilian leaders and senior civilian subordinates can provide a substantial mentorship resource for training and integration of military and civilian personnel. Often, this relationship extends past the time where one party has left the other’s chain of command.

6-58. While many associate mentoring with improving duty-related performance and growth, mentoring may include a spiritual dimension. A chaplain or other spiritually trained individual may play a significant role in advising individuals regarding spiritual issues to help clarify and develop personal and professional identity, purpose, motivation, and resiliency in adversity.

Table 6-3. Counseling—Coaching—Mentoring Comparison









OPERATIONAL DEVELOPMENT

6-59. Working in real settings—solving real problems with actual team members—provides challenges and conditions where leaders see the significance of leadership and practice their craft. Good leaders encourage subordinates to develop in every aspect of daily activities and should seek to learn every day themselves. The operational domain includes the three factors of leader, led, and situation and provides real tasks with feedback. This combination provides ideal conditions for development. Planning that includes identification and creation of learning opportunities for leaders promotes development. FM 6-22 provides techniques for how to plan and ensure a mindset to develop leaders. Integrating leader development into the organization creates a positive, learning climate, builds an expectation that leader development is a priority, and produces improved individual and unit readiness.

6-60. Good leaders seek ways to define duties to prepare subordinates for responsibilities in their current position or next assignment. Assigning a leader to set up and control a firing range is an opportunity to coach them on working with sister units and ways to train Soldiers. The DA Civilian intern program is another example where duty performance is used for development. Leaders can rotate into special duty assignments to give them broad leadership experiences and be given stretch assignments or tasks to accelerate their development.

6-61. Leaders are responsible for ensuring subordinates receive the appropriate education, training, and experiences at the proper time for promotion as well as increasing their potential in current and future assignments. Self-development can occur anywhere, so it is also an important aspect of development in organizations. Individuals must be active participants in their developmental process. They must not wait for a leader or mentor to choose them but have the responsibility to be proactive in their own development. Every Army officer, NCO, Soldier, and DA Civilian should identify personal strengths and areas for improvement. Each individual should then determine a developmental plan. Some strategies to use in planning development are—

Ask questions and pay attention to experts.

Read and study.

Observe those in leadership positions.

Find educational opportunities (civilian, military, and correspondence).

Seek and engage in new and varied opportunities.



DEVELOPING TEAMS

6-62. A team is any collection of people that functions together to perform a mission or collective task. Teams that work well have an advantage of increasing motivation and accountability among members. Developing close teams takes hard work, patience, and interpersonal skill on the part of the leader (see ATP 6-22.6). Because high-functioning teams complete missions on time with given resources and a minimum of wasted effort, they are a worthwhile investment. In war and peace, cohesive teams, operating with mutual trust, accomplish the missions more effectively than those lacking trust and cohesion. Hallmarks of cohesive teams include—

Trusting each other and being able to predict what each will do.

Working together to accomplish the mission.

Executing tasks thoroughly and quickly.

Meeting and exceeding standards.

Adapting to demanding challenges.

Learning from their experiences and developing pride in accomplishments.

6-63. Leaders must guide teams through three developmental stages: formation, enrichment, and sustainment. Leaders remain sensitive to the fact that teams develop differently and the boundaries between stages are not absolute. The results can determine what to expect of the team and what improves its capabilities. Understanding the perspectives of team members is important. Leaders understand that the national cause, mission, purpose, and many other concerns may not be relevant to the Soldier’s perspective. Regardless of larger issues, Soldiers perform for others on the team, for the Soldier on their right or left. A fundamental truth is that Soldiers accomplish tasks because they do not want to let each other down.







Developing close teams takes hard work, patience, and interpersonal skill on the part of the leader (see ATP 6-22.6).



Formation Stage

6-64. Although Army leaders generally do not select most of their team members, they have the responsibility to ensure their teams are high performing units. Teams work best when new members quickly feel a part of the team. There are two critical steps of the formation stage: reception and orientation.



Reception

6-65. Reception is the leader’s welcome to new members of the organization. Time permitting, reception should include a personal introduction. Initially, all new team members will be concerned about fitting in and belonging. As teams receive new personnel, they try to diminish the uncertainty for the new team member. This is a team responsibility, not just a leader’s responsibility.



Orientation

6-66. Orientation begins with meeting other team members, learning the layout and schedule of the workplace, and generally understanding conditions. In combat, leaders may not have much time to orient new team members. Leaders pair new arrivals with more experienced Soldiers to help orient them.

6-67. Leaders play a pivotal role in how a team forms and works together. During team formation, leaders assess skills and expertise present on the team and determine how to best apply them. Leaders provide direction and reinforce the norms within the teams, and communicate performance standards.



Enrichment Stage

6-68. During the enrichment stage, teams strengthen relationships between members and focus on team objectives. Members become accountable to and for the team. New members gradually move from questioning everything to trusting themselves, their peers, and their leaders. Trusted team members are more willing to resolve differences of opinion and fact, suspend doubt, and concentrate on duties and missions. Leaders learn to trust by listening, establishing clear lines of authority, and enforcing standards. Leaders should understand indicators of distrust such as persistent defense of personal opinion, conflict avoidance, suspicion about others’ motivation, and ignoring the importance of team membership. Leaders improve trust and build morale by getting to know members, communicating truthfully, treating them fairly, and recognizing good work and teamwork.

6-69. Cohesion is the bond of relationships and motivational factors that help a team stay together. A cohesive team puts aside its differences and chooses to work together. Cohesive teams achieve greater success, feeding a sense of greater team competence, commitment, and confidence. These factors increase cohesion and contribute to the willingness to undertake new challenges and overcome hardship.



Sustainment Stage

6-70. During this stage, members identify as a “team.” They own it, have pride in it, and want team success. There is pride in knowing that individuals are part of a recognized organization: best squad, best tank crew, or best dining facility. Recognition elevates the professional status of the team members. While not all teams can achieve this level of recognition, the team’s attitude about its capabilities elevates motivation and the desire to meet new challenges.

6-71. Teams may encounter difficulties in the sustainment stage. Leaders watch for signs of complacency and intervene by reinforcing good interaction practices and holding the team to standard. Changes for which the team is not prepared can be another challenge for the leader. Shared experiences and regular training allow teams to address unexpected changes in situations. Empowering the team to improve coordination and standing operating procedures can strengthen its ability to handle change.

6-72. Key responsibilities of the team leader in all stages of team building and teamwork include trust, cooperation, task commitment, accountability, and the work to be completed. When any of these erodes—







trust is broken, conflict arises, commitments are disregarded, members are not accountable, or work goes undone—the leader must step in and guide the team back on track.

6-73. Table 6-4 summarizes the competency develops others.

Table 6-4. The competency DEVELOPS OTHERS





STEWARDS THE PROFESSION

6-74. Leaders take care of the Army profession by applying a mindset that embodies cooperative planning and management of all resources, but especially providing for a strong Army team both now and in the future. Leaders actively engage in sustaining full military readiness and preventing the loss of effectiveness as far into the future as possible. Leaders support developmental opportunities for subordinates such as professional military education attendance, key developmental assignments in other organizations, and attendance at Army schools. Leaders also make decisions and take action to improve the organization beyond their tenure. Table 6-5 summarizes the competency stewards the profession.



SUPPORTING PROFESSIONAL AND PERSONAL GROWTH

6-75. Developing multiskilled leaders is the goal of preparing self and subordinates to lead. An adaptable leader will more readily comprehend the challenges of constantly evolving conditions, demanding not only warfighting skills, but also creativity Army leaders who reflect upon their experiences and learn from them will often find better ways of doing things. Leaders must employ openness and imagination to create effective organizational learning conditions. Effective leaders are not afraid to underwrite mistakes. They allow others to learn from them. This attitude allows growth into new responsibilities and adaptation to inevitable changes.







IMPROVING THE ORGANIZATION FOR THE LONG-TERM

6-76. Leaders demonstrate stewardship when they act to improve the organization beyond their own tenure. Improving the organization for the long-term is deciding and taking action to manage people or resources when the benefits may not occur during a leader’s tour of duty with an organization.

Table 6-5. The competency STEWARDS THE PROFESSION





















































This page intentionally left blank.







Chapter 7

Achieves

The truly great leader overcomes all difficulties, and campaigns and battles are nothing but a long series of difficulties to overcome. The lack of equipment, the lack of food, the lack of this or that are only excuses; the real leader displays his quality in his triumphs over adversity, however great it may be.

General of the Army George C Marshall Graduation address to the first Officer Candidate School class (1941)



GETS RESULTS

7-1. Gets results is the single achieves competency and relates to actions of leading to accomplish tasks and missions on time and to standard. Getting results requires the right integration of tasks, roles, resources, and priorities. Getting results focuses tasks, priorities, people, and other resources to achieve the desired outcomes. Leaders are ready to take action all the time to achieve outcomes and make necessary adjustments for success. Leaders also work to sustain or improve the organization’s performance by assessing and giving feedback as they execute and make adjustments. Table 7-1 summarizes the competency gets results (see page 7-3).



PURPOSE

7-2. A leader’s primary purpose is to accomplish the mission. Leadership builds and guides the effective organizations necessary to do so. Leaders require a focus on the future that views building and maintaining effective organizations as critical to mission accomplishment. Building effective Army organizations serves the larger purpose of mission accomplishment. Mission accomplishment takes priority over everything else, especially in combat where their unit may be at risk of destruction.

7-3.  Achieves embraces all actions to accomplish tasks on time and to standard by—

Providing direction, guidance, and priorities.

Assessing, adjusting, and continuing mission.



PROVIDING DIRECTION, GUIDANCE, AND PRIORITIES

7-4. Many matters consume a leader’s time and attention. Leaders have obligations that are far ranging and at times are contradictory. Leaders make these challenges transparent to their subordinates whenever possible. Leaders are responsible to create conditions that enable subordinates to focus and accomplish critical tasks. They do this by minimizing distractions and prioritizing what they need to accomplish within the commander’s intent. Leaders are responsible for anticipating the consequences of any action. Thorough planning is beneficial, but anticipating second- and third-order effects requires imagination, vision, and an appreciation of other people, talents, and organizations.

7-5. When communicating the mission, leaders provide clear guidance so subordinates and others understand the mission and their commander’s intent. Leaders ensure tasks are within the capabilities of the organization and do not detract from the ability to accomplish the mission. If leaders are unable to deconflict the friction between taskings, they should seek relief by approaching superiors with the impact on their critical task and possible alternative courses of action.

7-6. All leaders understand that change is inevitable. Army leaders prepare their organizations to adapt. It does not matter if the unit is on block leave, in a garrison support cycle, or in the most intense firefight. Leaders focus their subordinates on what they need to do to accomplish the mission. This allows subordinates







to know where to place effort or what not to do. Leaders monitor their subordinates to ensure they are handling the stress that a task or mission places on them. Even in the most mundane or dangerous situations, there are opportunities to restore or build morale.

7-7. All leaders have a responsibility to ensure resources are available and used wisely. Managing resources requires different approaches and different skills. Resources can take the form of money, materiel, personnel, or time. Getting resources can be a relatively straightforward process, such as putting in an ammunition request through established support channels for an upcoming range. Other times, a leader may need to be more creative and resourceful in securing resources for a complex task.

7-8. Ultimately, a leader must decide how to best allocate resources to accomplish the mission. Leaders need to deal openly and honestly with their allocation decisions and be prepared to handle reactions from those who feel the leader handled their requests unfairly or ineffectively.

7-9. When teams stress over high workloads, leaders should intervene to prioritize tasks and mitigate the causes or symptoms of seemingly insurmountable workloads. As a preventive step, planning aids even distribution of tasks—mission prioritization allows followers to know where to place effort or what to delay or suspend. Other measures require leaders to shield or protect subordinates from excessive taskings when possible and to ensure appropriate resources are available. A long-term measure is to develop individuals and train teams through cross training to be capable of assuming high workload levels. Effective communications allows members to prepare themselves to handle greater levels of workload or handle the effects of stress that the workload places on them. Morale-building activities, wellness and resilience steps, and granting breaks from operational rigors when possible, can also help address stress. Successful organizations have leaders who understand workload levels and are proactive in mitigating stress or stressors.

7-10. Many leaders struggle with delegation, from the newly promoted to the most experienced who simply take on too much. Moving from an individual contributor to overseeing the efforts of others can be challenging. It requires leaders to spend their time differently and develop different skill sets this includes balancing workloads and avoiding overtasking subordinates. Some leaders may experience the opposite situation by delegating too much. Some basic guidelines apply to all leaders:

Delegating improperly, or failing to delegate at all, leads to organizational failure.

A leader’s role is to ensure the task is accomplished, not to complete the task personally.

While completing daily, weekly, and monthly planning and reflection, leaders ask, “What am I doing that I should delegate?" “What do I delegate that I should not?”

Leaders cannot develop subordinates without delegating to them.

Leaders cannot adjust and expand their unit’s capabilities without delegating.



ASSESSING, ADJUSTING, AND CONTINUING MISSION

7-11. The ability to assess a situation accurately and reliably against desired outcomes, established values, and ethical standards is a key way for leaders to achieve consistent results and mission success. Assessment occurs continually during planning, preparation, and execution; it is not solely an after-the-fact evaluation. Accurate assessment requires instinct and intuition based on experience and learning. Accurate assessment requires reliable and valid information. Leaders take action based on their assessments to reset or keep tasks and missions on track. Leaders periodically assess individual and organizational weaknesses to prevent mishaps and mission failure. Accurate assessment is essential to developing subordinate leadership, training management, and initiating improvements.

7-12. To accomplish missions consistently, leaders need to maintain motivation within the team. One of the best ways to do this is to recognize and reward good performance. Leaders who recognize individual and team accomplishments promote positive motivation and actions for the future. Recognizing individuals and teams in front of superiors and others gives those contributors an increased sense of worth. Leaders seek opportunities to recognize the performance of their subordinates. They do this by crediting their subordinates for the work they do. Sharing credit has enormous payoffs in terms of building trust and teams.

7-13. Army members take advantage of opportunities and encourage ideas to improve the performance of themselves, subordinates, and their organizations. Leaders encourage a mindset that strives for increased effectiveness and efficiencies. Army members do the following to improve performance:



Achieves





Ask questions about how to perform tasks better.

Anticipate the need for change and action.

Analyze tasks to determine better ways to achieve desired end states.

Identify ways to improve unit or organizational procedures.

Leverage technologies to improve effectiveness.

Demonstrate and encourage critical and creative thinking.

7-14. Leaders need to encourage ideas for improvement. Leaders should guard against discouraging ideas and encourage subordinates to present new ideas. The concept of improvement applies equally to the organization as well as to the individual. These and similar phrases kill initiative and discourage others from implementing changes to improve the organization:

We tried that before.

There’s no budget for that.

You misunderstood my request—don’t rock the boat.

We do not have time for that.

This is the way we have always done it.

That is not a priority.

Table 7-1. The competency GETS RESULTS









Table 7-1. The competency Gets results (continued)









Chapter 8

Leadership in Practice

But once war is forced upon us, there is no other alternative than to apply every available means to bring it to a swift end.

General of the Army Douglas MacArthur Farewell address to Congress (1951)



LEADERS AND CHALLENGES

8-1. Contextual factors and operational challenges affect leaders, their subordinates, and accomplishment of the mission. This chapter builds upon the foundation of attributes and examines dynamic factors—positive and negative—that may arise when applying leadership across different areas and contexts.

8-2. The nature of large-scale combat operations creates situations where leaders may send Soldiers and entire units into harm's way knowing they may not survive. Army leaders perform this solemn duty because war demands nothing less than total commitment to accomplish the larger mission. The purpose, direction, and motivation Army leaders provide Soldiers and units is made in good faith that personal sacrifices serve the greater good of the Army and the Nation.

Third Battalion, 358th Infantry Regiment Mahlman Line—10-12 July 1944The officers and men displayed great courage, endurance, and dogged determination in the attack through the dense Foret de Mont Castre, France, against the position known as the Mahlman Line, a part of the main enemy defensive line. It consisted of dug-in positions, cunningly camouflaged in the tangled underbrush, and other devices that maximized the natural defensive qualities of the area. Despite repeated fierce enemy counterattacks, the battalion relentlessly drove forward and eliminated a battalion of parachute infantry and a company of parachute engineers, both of which were part of the elite 5th German Parachute Division. By the end of the first day, the battalion commander and 11 of the 17 company officers were casualties, but the advance had progressed to within 75 yards of the initial objective. The following day the remnants of the three rifle companies (one had only 20 Soldiers), reorganized into one composite company with a strength of 126 and commanded by a lieutenant. In a renewed charge, the depleted battalion overran the objective, killed 40 enemy, and captured eight machine guns, bazookas, and mortars. As it left the forest, the consolidated unit, retaining its aggressiveness, fought with exceptional daring and great skill to take successive objectives. The battalion’s break-through of the enemy’s main position contributed materially to the division’s advance. The inspiring leadership and gallantry displayed by all garnered the unit the Presidential Unit Citation.



Third Battalion, 358th Infantry Regiment Mahlman Line—10-12 July 1944

The officers and men displayed great courage, endurance, and dogged determination in the attack through the dense Foret de Mont Castre, France, against the position known as the Mahlman Line, a part of the main enemy defensive line. It consisted of dug-in positions, cunningly camouflaged in the tangled underbrush, and other devices that maximized the natural defensive qualities of the area. Despite repeated fierce enemy counterattacks, the battalion relentlessly drove forward and eliminated a battalion of parachute infantry and a company of parachute engineers, both of which were part of the elite 5th German Parachute Division. By the end of the first day, the battalion commander and 11 of the 17 company officers were casualties, but the advance had progressed to within 75 yards of the initial objective. The following day the remnants of the three rifle companies (one had only 20 Soldiers), reorganized into one composite company with a strength of 126 and commanded by a lieutenant. In a renewed charge, the depleted battalion overran the objective, killed 40 enemy, and captured eight machine guns, bazookas, and mortars. As it left the forest, the consolidated unit, retaining its aggressiveness, fought with exceptional daring and great skill to take successive objectives. The battalion’s break-through of the enemy’s main position contributed materially to the division’s advance. The inspiring leadership and gallantry displayed by all garnered the unit the Presidential Unit Citation.



LEADERS AND COURAGE

8-3. Army leaders accept the responsibility to develop and lead others to achieve results. All members of the Army swear an oath to support and defend the Constitution of the United States against all enemies, foreign and domestic. This oath subordinates the military leader to the laws of the Nation and its elected and appointed leaders, creating a distinct civil-military relationship. Fulfilling that oath, leaders will face—and







have to overcome—fear, danger, and physical and moral adversity while caring for those they lead and protecting the organization entrusted to them.

8-4. Taking the initiative to make something happen requires more personal courage rather than standing by or withdrawing and hoping events will turn out well. Leaders require personal courage in many conditions: confronting problems of discipline or disorderly conduct, leading Soldiers in harm's way, needing innovation or adaptation to do something never done before, being candid with a superior about a risky or improper course of action, deferring to a more technically competent subordinate, or freeing units and personnel to solve problems. Leaders must have the courage to make tough calls, to discipline or demand better when required. Consistent and fair leaders will earn the respect of their followers.

Remagen Bridgehead Remagen, Germany—7 March 1945On the Ludendorf Bridge crossing the Rhine, Combat Command B, 9th Armored Division—headed by the 27th Armored Infantry Battalion—with "superb skill, daring, and esprit de corps" successfully effected the first bridgehead across Germany's formidable river barrier and contributed decisively to the enemy’s defeat. The 27th Battalion reached Remagen and found the bridge intact but mined for demolition. Although its destruction was imminent, without hesitation and in face of heavy fire, infantrymen rushed across the structure and seized the surrounding high ground with energy and skill. The entire episode illustrates a high degree of initiative, leadership, and gallantry toward which all armies strive but too rarely attain, and won the Distinguished Unit Citation.



Remagen Bridgehead Remagen, Germany—7 March 1945

On the Ludendorf Bridge crossing the Rhine, Combat Command B, 9th Armored Division—headed by the 27th Armored Infantry Battalion—with "superb skill, daring, and esprit de corps" successfully effected the first bridgehead across Germany's formidable river barrier and contributed decisively to the enemy’s defeat. The 27th Battalion reached Remagen and found the bridge intact but mined for demolition. Although its destruction was imminent, without hesitation and in face of heavy fire, infantrymen rushed across the structure and seized the surrounding high ground with energy and skill. The entire episode illustrates a high degree of initiative, leadership, and gallantry toward which all armies strive but too rarely attain, and won the Distinguished Unit Citation.

8-5. A self-aware leader will learn from each decision and action; with guidance from superiors, the leader will grow in confidence. Resilient and fit leaders have the psychological and physical capacity to bounce back from life's stressors to thrive in an era of persistent conflict.



LEADERSHIP AND MANAGEMENT

8-6. Leadership and management both cover the actions to influence, motivate, provide purpose and give direction to others, and to sustain and improve the organization. Both add order to situations by planning, controlling, coordinating human, and material resources and by communicating with and gaining commitment from others. Management is complementary to leadership and applies to maintaining order, achieving efficiency, and complying with law. Processes, resources, and systems are things that leaders must manage. Leaders manage personnel as an important resource, but they lead people as individuals and groups to accomplish missions. Management is one of the skills that leaders need more as the scope and scale of their responsibilities increase over the course of a career. Successful management requires understanding about policy, regulations, and the procedural aspects of how an organization functions as part of a larger organization. The leader attributes and competencies apply to management as well as to leadership.



ADAPTABILITY AND VERSATILITY

8-7. The Army recognizes that it faces highly adaptive enemies and operates within dynamic, ever-changing conditions. Sometimes conditions change suddenly and unexpectedly from a calm, relatively safe operation to a close combat situation. Other times conditions differ (such as day to night) and leaders adapt. Adaptability is the ability to influence conditions and respond effectively to changing threats and situations with appropriate, flexible, and timely actions. Leaders develop their skill sets over time and learn what to apply in given situations. This demonstrates versatility. Versatility is having the ability to succeed across a spectrum of demanding, tough situations. Versatility increases the likelihood of effective adaptability by being trained and ready with multiple capabilities. The leader must be willing to deviate from usual, ingrained approaches. Together, adaptability and versatility improve a leader’s ability to anticipate and react appropriately to change.







ADAPTABILITY

8-8. Adaptable leaders are comfortable with ambiguity. They are flexible and innovative—ready to face the challenges with available resources Adaptability has two key components:

Ability to identify essential elements critical for performance in each new situation.

Ability to change practices or the unit to meet the requirement for change.

8-9. Experienced leaders recognize when conditions change. As conditions change, leaders apply their experiences to determine a way forward. Leaders exhibit this quality through critical thinking, creative thinking, willingness to accept risk, displaying comfort with ambiguity, and the ability to adjust rapidly while continuously assessing the situation.

8-10. Highly adaptable leaders have the proper frame of mind for operating under mission orders. Adaptable leaders can quickly assess the situation and determine skills needed to address it. If skills learned in the past are not sufficient for success under new conditions, adaptable leaders seek to apply new or modified skills.

8-11. Adaptive leadership includes being an agent of change. This means encouraging others to recognize conditions are changing and build consensus as change occurs. As consensus builds, adaptive leaders influence the course of the organization. Depending on the immediacy of the problem, adaptive leaders may use several different methods for influencing their organization.

8-12. Adaptability takes effort to develop. To become adaptable, leaders must challenge their previously held ideas and assumptions by seeking out novel and unfamiliar situations. Leaders who remain safely inside their comfort zone (current level of education, training, and experience) are less likely to recognize change or understand inevitable changes in conditions. Mindsets affect adaptability. Developing a few systematic ways of thinking encourages adaptability. These include open-mindedness, ability to consider multiple perspectives, not jumping to conclusions about what a situation is or means, willingness to take risks, and being able to overcome setbacks. To become more adaptable, leaders should—

Embrace opportunities to adapt. Leaders must go beyond what they are comfortable with and experience the unfamiliar through diverse and dynamic challenges. For example, the Army’s best training uses thinking like an enemy (red teaming) to enable leaders to recognize and accept that no plan survives contact. Training to improve adaptability should include changing conditions and scenarios so that training does not become routine.

Seek challenges. Leaders must seek out and engage in assignments that involve major changes in the environment. Leaders can be specialists, but their base of experience should still be broad. As the breadth of experience accumulates, so does the capacity to adapt. Leaders exposed to different types of thinking, different people and cultural norms, everyday changes in execution, and new challenges will learn the value of adaptation. They carry forward the skills to develop adaptable Soldiers, DA Civilians, units, and organizations.



VERSATILITY

8-13. Experiences form the basis of how people react to certain situations. A broader experience base offers greater opportunity to be a versatile leader. Versatile leaders seek opportunities to expand their experiences. They also understand the need to develop these same characteristics and qualities in their subordinates and teams. To promote a climate that promotes versatility, leaders maintain standards and accept constructive feedback without threat of repercussion or blame. Instead, they challenge subordinates to think in new ways and build a broader set of trained and practiced responses.

8-14. Leaders lacking adaptability and versatility enter every situation in the same manner and often expect their experience in one position to carry them to the next. Consequently, they may use ill-fitting or outdated approaches that may result in poor performance in new conditions or outright failure. Determining when and how to adapt is important. Adaptability and versatility do not produce certainty that change will improve results. Sometimes, persistence on a given course of action may have merit over change.





CHALLENGES OF AN OPERATIONAL ENVIRONMENT

8-15. Each situation a leader faces is unique and brings new challenges. Some challenges are predictable based on experiences; some are unpredictable, surfacing because of a situation or place in time. Leaders must be prepared to face the effects of stress, changing technology, fear in combat, geopolitical climate, and external influences from the media.

8-16. Future leaders must be adept at operating in ambiguity and chaos while possessing technical and professional expertise that enables cognitive overmatch of the enemy. Awareness, proper training, and open, frank discussion mitigate some of these factors. Army leaders must consider these external influences and plan accordingly. An effective leader recognizes the need to adapt in changing situations.



EVOLVING THREATS

8-17. Agility and adaptability at all levels of Army organizations are important to address unanticipated situations. The Army must adapt to constantly evolving threats while taking advantage of the latest technological innovations and adjusting to societal changes. The uncertain nature of the threat will always have major effects on Army leadership.



MEDIA

8-18. The media can be both an asset and impediment to leadership. Embedded media can tell the story from the Soldier’s perspective to an anxious nation at home. The media can provide real-time information, sometimes unfiltered and raw, which the enemy could exploit as a means to change the international political climate. Leaders must understand the speed and scrutiny of continuous news coverage and that the enemy does not bear the same responsibility for telling the truth. Leaders must be wary of propaganda and critically assess the accuracy of media reports and seek information from reliable sources.

8-19. The media not only report the situation, but also affect the situation. Leaders must train subordinate leaders and Soldiers to work with the media, understand the effects of pervasive media, and understand the long-term effects of stories and images. Commanders synchronize actions and messages to inform domestic audiences and influence selected foreign audiences (see FM 3-13).



JOINT AND MULTINATIONAL CONDITIONS

8-20. Soldiers often find themselves serving with members of other Services, allies, and partner nation forces. Understanding the unique cultures and subcultures of these various groups can be essential to success in a volatile and changing world.

8-21. Leaders should recognize the existence of subcultures such as law enforcement, special operations forces, and medical and branch-specific communities. Consequently, leaders involved in conducting operations need to understand how members of these specialized units train and work. Often, specialized units approach missions from a different perspective and sometimes use unconventional methods to accomplish them. These functional subcultures can be useful as a means to exchange knowledge and provide solutions when the Army needs answers from subject matter experts.



GEOPOLITICAL SITUATION

8-22. Though technology and economic ties interconnect the world, the world remains diverse in terms of religions, cultures, living conditions, education, and health. Within the political sphere, maintaining presence in foreign countries through a careful mix of diplomatic and military arrangements remains an important challenge. Leaders must be aware that the balance between diplomacy and military power is fragile. Army leaders must consistently consider the effect on local civilians, as well as on cultural and religious treasures, before committing forces.

8-23. Leaders can expect to operate under many different conditions worldwide. While most Soldiers speak English as their first language, continued deployments and global interaction require an understanding of other languages and cultures. Leaders will need to become multilingual and study the cultures and histories of other regions of interest. Technology provides a vehicle for gaining geopolitical knowledge.







TECHNOLOGY

8-24. While the stresses of combat have been constant for centuries, another aspect of the human dimension has assumed increasing importance—the effect of rapid technological advances on organizations and people. Technological changes and the speed at which they occur force the Army and its leaders to adapt and respond.

8-25. Army leaders must stay abreast of technological advances and their applications, advantages, and requirements. Together with technical specialists, leaders can make technology work for the Soldier. Properly integrated technology can increase operational effectiveness, survivability, and lethality.

8-26. Technological challenges facing Army leaders include—

Learning the strengths and vulnerabilities of different technologies that support the organization and its mission.

Considering the ethical implications of advanced technologies.

Thinking through how the organization will operate with other less or more technologically complex organizations, such as operating with unified action partners.

Considering technological effect on the time available to analyze problems, decide, and act. Events happen faster today and the stress encountered as an Army leader is correspondingly greater.

Using technology to influence dispersed teams given the increasing availability and necessity to use reachback and split-based operations.

8-27. Technology can lead to operational issues. A growing reliance on 'Global Positioning System (GPS) navigation technology since the Desert Storm era decreased emphasis on manual land navigation skills in training, rendering forces vulnerable if the technology fails. Leaders determined how to exploit GPS technology while guarding against its weaknesses through improved training. This included reintroducing essential land navigation training and detailed instructions on the maintenance and operation of GPS equipment.

8-28. Technology changes leadership conditions in many aspects, especially with how much information is available for decision makers. Although advances allow the modern leader to handle large amounts of information more effectively than before, enhanced technology can still cause information overload. Leaders must be able to sift through provided information then analyze, synthesize, and forward only important data up the chain of command. Senior leaders rely on subordinates to process information, isolating critical information to expedite decisions. Leaders owe their subordinates information gathering and reporting procedures that streamline work for already stretched staffs and units.

8-29. Army leaders and staffs have always needed to determine mission-critical information, prioritize incoming reports, and process them quickly. The volume of information provided by current technology makes this ability critical. The answer lies in the agile, adaptable human mind. Sometimes a nontechnological approach can divert the flood of information into channels the leader and staff can manage. For example, understanding the commander’s intent and commander’s critical information requirements can free leaders from nonessential information overload. The Army concept of command and control is critical in conditions of information overload. Mission command delegates most decisions to lower echelons to free higher echelons for critical decisions only they can make. Army leaders should continue to resist the lure of centralized decision making although they have more information available to them.



SYSTEMS

8-30. Army leaders require increased technical and tactical knowledge and understanding of systems. Leaders must understand the fine line between a healthy questioning of new systems’ capabilities and an unreasonable hostility that rejects the advantages technology offers. The adaptable leader remains aware of the capabilities and shortcomings of advanced technology and ensures subordinates do as well.

8-31. Leaders must consider systems within their organizations—how they work together, how using one affects others, and how to get the best performance from the whole. They must think beyond their own organization and consider how the actions of their organization influence other organizations as a whole.

8-32. Technology changes battlefield dispersal and the speed of operations. Instant global communications are accelerating the pace of military actions. GPS and night vision capabilities mean the Army can fight at







night and during periods of limited visibility—conditions that halted or slowed the pace of operations in the past. Additionally, nonlinear and noncontiguous operations create more difficulty for commanders to determine critical points on the battlefield.

8-33. Modern technology has increased the complexity of skills the Army requires. Leaders must carefully manage low-density occupational specialties and fill critical positions with properly trained people who maintain proficiency in these perishable high-tech skills. Army leaders must balance leadership, personnel management, and training management to ensure their organizations have people with the appropriate specialty training and that the entire organization stays continuously trained, certified, and ready.



HEALTH OF THE COMMAND

8-34. The health threat faced by deployed forces is a combination of ongoing or potential enemy threats; adverse environmental, occupational, and geographic and meteorological conditions; endemic diseases; and employment of chemical, biological, radiological, and nuclear weapons. To counter health threats, commanders and leaders must ensure that field hygiene and sanitation, preventive medicine measures, inspection of potable water and field feeding facilities, sleep discipline (including work and rest schedules), and personal protective measures are instituted and receive command emphasis. Leaders must ensure Soldiers practice these activities continuously during force projection and post-deployment processes.

8-35. Additionally, concussive injuries are associated with explosions, blasts, and blows to the head during combat operations, training activities or contact sports. Leaders and Soldiers at all echelons must be aware of this invisible injury and receive education and training to decrease stigma associated with seeking medical assistance. Leaders have a responsibility to ensure their Soldiers receive a medical evaluation following a concussive event, no matter how mild. Prompt medical attention maximizes recovery, decreases risk of a subsequent concussion while the brain heals, and ultimately preserves combat power. For additional information on concussive injuries and leader protocols, refer to ATP 6-22.5.



STRESS OF CHANGE

8-36. To succeed in conditions of continuous change, leaders emphasize the constants of the Army Values, teamwork, and discipline while helping subordinates anticipate change, adapt, and seek new ways to improve. Competent leadership implies managing change, adapting, and making change work for the team. Leaders determine what requires explicit actions to respond to change. Often, building on what already exists limits stress.

8-37. Stress is a major part of leadership conditions. Major sources of stress include an ever-changing geopolitical situation, operational stress and related fears, the rapid pace of change, and the increasing complexity of technology. A leader’s character and professional competence are important factors in mitigating stress for the organization and achieving mission accomplishment, despite environmental pressures and changes. When dealing with these factors, adaptability is essential to success.



OPERATIONAL STRESS

8-38. Stress in response to threatening or uncertain situations occurs across the range of military operations as well as at home, in garrison, and during training exercises. Military experiences expose Soldiers to various operational stresses throughout their careers. Operational stress control does not minimize the experiences faced while engaged in such operations, but provides mechanisms to mitigate reactions to those experiences so Soldiers remain combat effective and maintain the quality of life to which they are entitled (see ATP 6-22.5).

8-39. Leaders must understand stress and anticipate Soldiers’ reactions. Overcoming obstacles, such as Soldiers becoming wounded or dying, or the enemy attacking unexpectedly, takes mental discipline and resilience. Off-site leaders cannot discount the fear Soldiers may experience. A leader who does not share the same risks could easily fall into the trap of making a decision that could prove unworkable given the Soldiers’ psychological state. Army leaders with responsibility over a distributed team should ask for detailed input from the Soldiers or subordinate commanders who are closer to the action and can provide the most accurate information about the situation.







8-40. When preparing for sustained operations, leaders must thoroughly condition their Soldiers to address operational stress during all phases of force projection—mobilization, deployment, employment, sustainment, and redeployment. Positive action to reduce operational stress empowers Army members to cope with typical, everyday situations and enhance adaptive stress reactions.

8-41. When possible, Soldiers should have access to operational stress control team/behavioral health personnel, medical personnel, and chaplains to continue their physical and psychological recovery to ensure successful reintegration. Experts treating the psychologically wounded must work hand-in-hand with the unit chain of command to stress the importance of maintaining order and discipline. Leaders must not tolerate aggressive or criminal behavior as compensation for negative operational experiences.

8-42. The Army has implemented a comprehensive recovery plan for all returning Soldiers to counter operational stress. Sound leadership, unit cohesion, and close camaraderie are essential to assure expeditious psychological recovery from combat experiences.

8-43. Leaders need to understand that danger and fear will always be a part of their duties. Fear is a natural, human reaction to danger. Courage does not mean absence of fear—courage is overcoming fear to accomplish the mission. Battling fear means recognizing fear and effectively dealing with it. Understanding the situation and acting with foresight and purpose overcomes fear. Fear of the unknown can be terrifying; fear can paralyze a Soldier. Soldiers who see friends killed or wounded become aware of their own mortality. Army leaders must expect fear to take hold when setbacks occur, the unit fails to complete a mission, or the unit takes casualties.

8-44. Preparation, planning, and rigorous training carry Soldiers through the challenges of operating under hazardous conditions. Leaders must add unanticipated elements to training to create demanding learning conditions. Realistic training developed around critical warrior tasks and battle drills is a primary source for the resilience and confidence to succeed along with the ability to demonstrate grit in tough situations. Leader competence, confidence, agility, courage, and resilience enable units to persevere and find workable solutions to tough problems. Living the Army Values and the Army Ethic along with the Warrior Ethos and resilience mobilize the ability to forge success out of chaos to overcome fear, hunger, deprivation, and fatigue to accomplish the mission.



COUNTERPRODUCTIVE LEADERSHIP

8-45. The Army expects all leaders to live the Army Values and demonstrate the positive characteristics described by the leader attributes and core leader competencies. Effective leadership is essential for realizing the full potential of an organization’s combat power and can compensate for deficiencies in other warfighting functions. The opposite is also true; counterproductive leader behaviors can negate combat power advantages.

8-46. Counterproductive leadership is the demonstration of leader behaviors that violate one or more of the Army's core leader competencies or Army Values, preventing a climate conducive to mission accomplishment. Counterproductive leadership generally leaves organizations in a worse condition than when the leader arrived and has a long-term effect on morale and readiness. The term toxic has been used when describing leaders who have engaged in what the Army now refers to as counterproductive leadership behaviors. Counterproductive leadership is incompatible with Army leadership doctrine and Army Values. It often violates regulations and can impede mission accomplishment.

8-47. All leaders are susceptible to displaying counterproductive leadership behaviors in times of stress, high operational tempo, or other chaotic conditions to achieve short-term results. Counterproductive leadership decreases followers' well-being, engagement, and undermines the organization's readiness and ability to accomplish the mission in the long term. It can have an adverse effect on the unit with cascading results, such as lowering morale, commitment, cohesion, effectiveness, readiness, and productivity. Counterproductive leadership behaviors prevent establishing a positive organizational climate and interfere with mission accomplishment, especially in highly complex operational settings. Prolonged use of counterproductive leadership destroys unit morale, trust, and undermines the followers' commitment to the mission. Counterproductive leadership can also decrease task performance, physical and psychological well-being, and increase negative outcomes such as depression or burnout.







8-48. Army leaders can and will make mistakes, so distinguishing between occasional errors of judgment and counterproductive behavior is important. Counterproductive leadership can include recurrent negative leader behaviors and more serious one-time behaviors that have a damaging effect on the organization's performance and subordinate welfare. Infrequent or one-time negative behaviors do not define counterproductive leadership. Often, counterproductive leadership behaviors have harmful effects on individuals or a unit when several instances occur together or take place frequently.

8-49. Counterproductive leadership spans a range of leader conduct that can be organized into several broad categories that are useful to inform strategies for identifying and addressing such behaviors. Counterproductive leadership is not limited to these behaviors listed below. Leaders can demonstrate more than one of the behaviors and their conduct can span multiple categories:

Abusive behaviors—includes behaviors that involve a leader exceeding the boundaries of their authority by being abusive, cruel, or degrading others. These behaviors are contrary to what is required for the moral, ethical, and legal discharge of their duty. Specific examples include, but are not limited to, bullying, berating others for mistakes, creating conflict, ridiculing others because of the authority held, domineering, showing little or no respect to others, insulting or belittling individuals, condescending or talking down to others, or retaliating for perceived slights or disagreements.

Self-serving behaviors—includes behaviors that result from self-centered motivations on the part of the leader, where they act in ways that seek primarily to accomplish their own goals and needs before those of others. Specific examples include, but are not limited to, displaying arrogance, lacking concern or empathy for others, taking credit for others' work, insisting on having their way, distorting information to favor own ideas, exaggerating accomplishments or abilities, putting own work and accomplishments ahead of others' and the mission, displaying narcissistic tendencies, or exhibiting a sense of entitlement.

Erratic behaviors—includes behaviors related to poor self-control or volatility that drive the leader to act erratically or unpredictably. Specific examples include, but are not limited to, blaming others, deflecting responsibility, losing temper at the slightest provocation, behaving inconsistently in words and actions, insecurity, or being unapproachable.

Leadership incompetence—includes ineffective leadership behaviors that result from a lack of experience or willful neglect. Incompetence can include failure to act or acting poorly. While incompetent leadership can arise from reasons unrelated to counterproductive leadership, it is included as a category often associated with arrogant or abusive leaders who are not aware of their shortcomings and do not seek to correct their shortcomings. Conversely, some leaders lacking competence are aware of their shortcomings, which lead them to behave in counterproductive or negative ways to cover up their shortcomings or mistakes. Specific examples include, but are not limited to, unengaged leadership, being passive or reactionary, neglecting leadership responsibilities, displaying poor judgment, poorly motivating others, withholding encouragement, failing to clearly communicate expectations, or refusing to listen to subordinates.

Corrupt behaviors—includes behaviors that violate explicit Army standards, regulations, or policies. Violations may range from behaviors subject to administrative discipline to criminal actions subject to discharge or incarceration. Specific examples include, but are not limited to, dishonesty, misusing government resources or time, creating a hostile work environment, EEO/SHARP violations, or violating Section 3583 (Requirement of Exemplary Conduct), Title 10, United States Code, AR 600-100, or the Uniform Code of Military Justice.

8-50. As the Army moves into increasingly more complex operational environments, it is critical that leaders rely on positive behaviors to influence others and achieve results. The Army is committed to stopping these negative behaviors and promoting positive work environments. All leaders are susceptible to counterproductive behaviors, so they must monitor their personal behavior. Commanders and leaders have a responsibility to monitor and take action to eliminate counterproductive leadership. All Army members who witness these behaviors have a responsibility to prevent, intervene, counter, or mitigate them. Soldiers and DA Civilians must be willing to confront and address these behaviors in their units and should leverage their chains of command to assist and involve relevant installation resources where and when necessary.







PART THREE

Leading at Organizational and Strategic Levels

Part Three addresses organizational and strategic leaders in additional detail. Both organizationaand strategic leaders are still direct leaders. This part describes what makes organizational and strategic leaders unique from direct leaders.









Chapter 9

Organizational Leadership

You have to lead men in war by requiring more from the individual than he thinks he can do. You have to lead men in war by bringing them along to endure and to display qualities of fortitude that are beyond the average man’s thought of what he should be expected to do. You have to inspire them when they are hungry and exhausted and desperately uncomfortable and in great danger; and only a man of positive characteristics of leadership, with the physical stamina that goes with it, can function under those conditions.

General of the Army George C. Marshall Testimony to the U.S. Senate Committee on Military Affairs (1940)



LEADING

9-1. Whether they fight for key terrain or work to achieve training readiness, organizational leaders must be able to translate complex concepts into understandable plans their subordinates can execute. Organizational leaders develop the plans and synchronize the systems that allow subordinates to turn ideas into action.

9-2. Organizational leaders build teams of teams with discipline, cohesion, trust, and proficiency through personal example, using a wide range of knowledge and applying leader competencies. They focus their organizations down to the lowest level on the mission by disseminating a clear intent, sound concepts, and a systematic approach to execution.

9-3. Organizational leaders build on direct leader experiences, reflect the Army Values, and instill pride within organizations. Since they lead complex organizations throughout the Army’s generating forces and operating forces, organizational leaders often apply elements of direct and organizational leadership simultaneously.



LEADS OTHERS

9-4. Organizational leaders have developed a strong background in fundamentals as well as an appreciation for the geopolitical implications of their situation. From their experiences, they have developed the instincts, intuition, and knowledge that form their understanding of the interrelation of the levels of leadership. Their refined skills allow them to understand, integrate, and synchronize the activities of multiple systems and employ resources and systems across a range of challenges.







9-5. Given the increased size of their organizations, organizational leaders influence indirectly more often than directly. Soldiers and subordinate leaders look to their organizational leaders to set achievable standards, to provide clear intent, and to provide the necessary resources. Decisions and actions by organizational leaders have greater consequences for more people over a longer time than those of direct leaders. Since the connections between action and effect are sometimes more remote and difficult to see, organizational leaders spend more time than direct leaders coordinating, thinking, and reflecting about what they are doing and how they are doing it. Organizational leaders develop clear concepts for operations as well as policies and procedures to control and monitor execution.



EXTENDS INFLUENCE BEYOND THE CHAIN OF COMMAND

9-6. While organizational leaders primarily exert direct influence through their chain of command and staff, they extend influence beyond their chain of command and organization by other means. These other means include persuasion, empowerment, motivation, negotiation, conflict resolution, bargaining, advocacy, and diplomacy. They often apply such skills when serving as military negotiators, consensus builders, and a direct interface to local populace.

9-7. Today’s operations present Army leaders, particularly organizational leaders, with nonlinear, dynamic, and ambiguous conditions. These varied, information-intense conditions challenge leaders to synchronize efforts beyond the traditional military chain of command. Likely mission complexities demand the full integration and cooperation of unified action partners to accomplish missions.

9-8. Establishing effective relationships with unified action partners is an important step. Organizational leaders and their staffs must understand joint doctrine as well as Army fundamentals and procedures. Additionally, corps or divisions may have control over forces from other nations. They may work with liaison officers from other nations. In some cases, U.S. Army or U.S. joint force staffs may have members of other nations permanently assigned. Echelons of command often have interagency representation embedded in their staffs or operating in their areas. Leaders therefore impart influence through their conduct—striving to set a positive impression of themselves, the Army, and the Nation they serve.



LEADS BY EXAMPLE

9-9. The Army’s organizational leaders play a critical part in maintaining focus on fighting the enemy and not the plan. They are at the forefront of adapting to operational environment changes and exploiting emerging opportunities by applying a combination of intuition, analytical problem solving, systems integration, and leadership by example—as close to the action as feasible.

9-10. Organizational leaders position themselves with the necessary means to maintain contact with critical elements and headquarters. Proximity to operations provides organizational commanders with the required awareness to apply quick creative thinking in collaboration with subordinate leaders. Proximity facilitates adjustments for deficiencies in planning and shortens reaction time when applying sound tactical and operational solutions to changing realities. Operations require leaders who understand the context of factors affecting the situation, act within that understanding, continually assess and adapt those actions based on the interactions and circumstances of the enemy and conditions, consolidate tactical and operational opportunities into strategic aims, and are able to effectively transition operations.

9-11. .Organizational leaders prioritize what changes their organization will pursue and guide their organizations through several steps to ensure their initiatives for change last. The steps of the leading change process are—

Assess the need for change (anticipate problems or identify opportunities).

Build a guiding coalition.

Create and communicate a compelling vision.

Determine how to implement vision (design plan, gather resources).

Empower others to act.

Facilitate learning (promote new skill development).

Goal reinforcement (identify and reinforce evidence of progress).

Hone the change process through monitoring and reinvesting.







Institutionalize change (modify policies or procedures).



COMMUNICATES

9-12. Leaders are responsible for ensuring shared understanding. They should share information as much as possible with their organization and subordinates. An open, two-way exchange of information reinforces sharing team values and encourages constructive input.

9-13. Communicating openly and clearly with superiors is important for organizational leaders. Understanding the intent, priorities, and thought processes makes anticipating future planning and resourcing priorities easier. Understanding the direction of the higher headquarters reduces course corrections at lower levels, thus minimizing friction and maintaining a stable organizational tempo and climate.



Using the Staff as a Communications Tool

9-14. Organizational leaders need to understand what is happening within their organization, developing laterally, and unfolding within the next two higher echelons. Networking between staffs gives organizational leaders a broader picture of the overall operational environment. Coordination allows leaders to constantly interact and share thoughts, ideas, and priorities through multiple channels, creating a more complete picture. With reliable information, staffs can productively turn policies, concepts, plans, and programs into achievable results and quality products.

9-15. By interacting with the next-higher staff, organizational leaders understand the superior’s priorities and impending shifts in focus or guidance. This helps inform their own organizational requirements and changes. Constantly sensing, observing, questioning, and actively listening enables organizational leaders to identify and solve potential problems or to avoid them. Communication allows them to anticipate decisions and put their organization in the best possible position in time and space to appropriately respond and execute.



Using Persuasion to Build Teams and Consensus

9-16. Persuasion is an important communication method for organizational leaders. Well-developed skills of persuasion and openness to working through controversy help organizational leaders overcome resistance and build support in a positive manner. By reducing grounds for misunderstanding, persuasion reduces time wasted overcoming unimportant issues. Persuasion is an important method of extending influence. Working through controversy in a positive, open way overcomes resistance to an idea or plan and builds support. By demonstrating these traits, organizational leaders provide an example that subordinates can use in self-development. In some circumstances, persuasion may be inappropriate. During operations, leaders must often make decisions quickly, requiring a more direct style when leading and deciding on courses of action.



DEVELOPING

9-17. Comparatively, organizational leaders take a long-term approach to developing the entire organization. They prepare their organizations for the next quarter, next year, or five years from now. The responsibility to determine how the Army fights the next war lies with today’s Army leaders, especially those at the organizational and strategic levels. Leaders at the organizational level rely more on indirect leadership methods, which can make leading, developing, and achieving more difficult.



CREATES A POSITIVE ENVIRONMENT

9-18. An organization’s climate springs from its leader’s attitudes, actions, and priorities communicated through choices, policies, and programs. Leaders in organizational leadership positions determine the organizational climate by assessing the organization from the bottom up. An organizational leader can initiate command climate surveys to collect climate input while protecting individual anonymity. Organizational-level leaders ensure company commanders meet requirements for initial and annual climate surveys (see AR 600-20). These leaders should assess subordinate command climate results and supplemental indicators such as instances of misconduct. With a completed assessment, the leader can provide clear guidance and focus (purpose, direction, and motivation) to move the organization toward the desired end state.







9-19. Characteristics of successful organizational climates include a clear, widely known purpose; well trained, confident Soldiers and DA Civilians; disciplined, cohesive teams; and trusted, competent leaders. It is a climate that adheres to and promotes the Army Values and fosters the Warrior Ethos, encourages learning, promotes creativity and performance, and establishes cohesion. To create such a climate, organizational leaders recognize mistakes as opportunities to learn, create cohesive teams, and reward leaders of character and competence with increasing responsibilities. Organizational leaders value honest feedback and constantly use available means to maintain a feel for the organization. Special staff members including equal opportunity advisors, chaplains, medical officers, and legal advisors assist the organizational leader with maintaining a positive environment.



PREPARES SELF

9-20. The demands on leaders vary at different levels. While leader competencies stay the same across levels, moving from direct to the organizational level requires a shift in approach. What may occupy a great deal of a leader’s time at a lower level (for example, face-to-face supervision of Soldiers) involves less time at higher levels. Certain technical skills vital to a direct leader will be of less importance to an organizational leader who must spend time on system-wide issues. Leaders need to accustom themselves to rely on less direct means of direction, control, and monitoring to aid their transition in the scope and breadth of responsibilities.

9-21. Organizational leaders keep a focus on where the organization needs to go and what leaders must be capable of accomplishing. As role models, they develop themselves and actively counsel their subordinate leaders about their professional growth. Organizational leaders continue to seek broadening experiences to expand their knowledge, skills, and capabilities. At the organizational level, leaders ensure that systems and conditions are in place for objective feedback, counseling, and mentoring for all organization members, including themselves.

9-22. Self-aware organizational leaders who know their organizations generally achieve high quality results and do not shy away from asking close subordinates to give informal feedback as part of an open, transparent assessment and feedback effort. When they are part of official AARs, organizational leaders should invite subordinates to comment on how the leaders could have made things better. Subordinates easily spot errors by organizational leaders since these errors often affect those lead. Consequently, admitting, analyzing, and learning from these errors add value to the training. For the Army’s organizational leaders—just as leaders at other levels—reflecting, learning, and applying corrective actions in operations is critical for effectiveness.



DEVELOPS OTHERS

9-23. Organizational-level leaders are stewards of the Army profession. They fulfill this function by placing a high priority upon investment in future leaders at all levels. Leader development is an investment required to maintain the Army as a profession and is a key source of combat power. Organizational leaders set conditions for a robust leader development system and create conditions that enable organization members to learn from their experiences and those of others. They rely on conditions that use learning as well as self-development through various procedures such as 360 assessments. To strengthen learning, organizational leaders can make numerous avenues available for lifelong learning: assignment-oriented training, simulations, learning centers, and virtual training.

9-24. Organizational leaders determine the potential of others. This takes awareness of others and flexibility to build on strengths and address weaknesses. Developing others at this level is challenging; the organizational leader has to balance the criticality of the task and the developmental needs of all subordinates. Another consideration for organizational leaders is how and what individuals need to learn. Learning in challenging situations may be a good way for leaders to learn from failure, but others need to experience more successes than failures to develop self-confidence and initiative. Organizational leaders lead, coach, and mentor subordinate leaders.



Building Team Skills and Processes

9-25. Organizational leaders recognize that the Army is a team of teams, composed of numerous functional organizations. These organizations perform necessary tasks and missions that coordinate the effort of all







Army components. Strategic leaders influence organizational leaders. Organizational leaders, in turn, influence subordinate leaders to achieve organizational goals.

9-26. Generally, organizational leaders rely on others to follow and execute their intent and guidance as well as to communicate effectively that intent and guidance to subordinates. Turning a battlefield vision or training goal into reality takes the combined efforts of many teams inside and outside of the organization. Organizational leaders build solid, effective teams by developing and training them.

9-27. By circulating among subordinate units, organizational leaders can assess subordinates’ understanding of intent, preparation, execution, and assure successful command and control. Organizational leaders learn about units in the task organization and personally motivate Soldiers by their presence. Organizational leaders work with subordinate units to create shared understanding. Together they identify options of greatest value and manage high-risk actions. Organizational leaders act with other leaders across the chain of command to create context for fostering organizational and team capabilities.

9-28. Well-trained subordinates who work hard and fight tenaciously sense they are part of a first-rate team. Collective confidence comes from succeeding under challenging, stressful conditions. Sense of belonging derives from experiencing technical and tactical proficiency—first as individuals and later collectively. That proficiency expresses itself in the confidence team members have in their peers and leaders and trust shared with each other. Ultimately, cohesive teams combine into a network—a team of teams. Cohesive organizations work in synchronized fashion to complete tasks and missions.



Encouraging Initiative and Acceptance of Responsibility

9-29. Since missions for larger organizations are more complex and involve concurrent efforts, leaders at higher levels must encourage subordinate initiative. Effective organizational leaders must delegate authority, support their subordinates’ decisions, and hold them accountable for their actions.

9-30. Successful delegation of authority involves convincing subordinates that they are empowered and have the freedom to act independently. Empowered subordinates understand that they bear more than the responsibility to accomplish tasks. They have the authority to operate as they see fit, within the limits of the commander’s intent and available resources. This helps them lead their people with determination.

9-31. Since delegation is a critical factor for success in organizations, leaders must know the talents of their subordinates and prepare them to assume critical roles when necessary. To empower the diverse elements within a larger organization, organizational leaders must exploit the value of a creative staff composed of competent and trustworthy subordinates. Organizational leaders develop the competence and judgment of their staffs to handle greater responsibility.



Choosing Talented Staff Leaders

9-32. Building a high-performing staff begins with putting the right people in the right positions. Organizational leaders make time to evaluate the staff and develop them to full capability. They avoid micromanaging the staff while trusting and empowering them to think creatively and provide truthful answers and feasible options. For example, an important decision is getting the right chief of staff or deputy. The chief of staff or deputy is the principal assistant for directing, coordinating, supervising, and training the staff. This leader earns the respect of the staff, focuses them, inspires them, and moves them to achieve results. Although staff sections work as equals, they require good leadership from their chief of staff to make them function as a cohesive team.

9-33. Inquisitive leaders who conduct regular assessments of themselves and their organizations hold their organizations to the highest standards. Open-minded reflection and corrective action in training is critical for effective performance in crisis. This continuous assessment process enables organizational leaders to translate lessons learned into usable knowledge.





ACHIEVING

9-34. For consistent results, organizational leaders have to be competent in planning, preparing, executing, and assessing. They must provide clear focus with their intent so subordinates accomplish the mission, regardless of the original plan.



PROVIDING DIRECTION, GUIDANCE, AND CLEAR PRIORITIES

9-35. Organizational leaders are more likely than direct leaders to provide guidance and make decisions with incomplete information. Part of the organizational leaders’ analysis must determine which decisions to make themselves or push to lower levels. While determining the right course of action, they consider possible second- and third-order effects and project into the future—months or years. Organizational leaders must consider the timing of their decisions. In many cases, organizational leaders must exercise patience and not make decisions before allowing subordinates time to overcome the frictions inherent to military operations.



MASTERING RESOURCES AND SYSTEMS

9-36. During operations, organizational leaders integrate and synchronize available resources. They assign missions and empower their subordinates to execute within the given intent. Effective organizational leaders must be resourcing experts, which requires significant education and self-study. Achieving organizational goals requires resources—including time, equipment, facilities, budgets, and people. Organizational leaders aggressively manage and prioritize the resources at their disposal to ensure optimal readiness of the organization. A leader’s situation is more difficult when unanticipated events shift priorities.

9-37. Organizational leaders are stewards of their people’s time and energy, as well as their own. They do not waste resources but skillfully evaluate objectives, anticipate resource requirements, and efficiently allocate what is available. They balance available resources with organizational requirements and distribute them in a way that best achieves organizational goals. Because of the more indirect nature of their influence, organizational leaders continuously assess interrelated systems and design longer-term plans to accomplish missions.

9-38. Leaders who reach the organizational level should have a comprehensive systems perspective, clearly understanding how all the elements of combat power work together. These systems provide the framework for influencing people and organizations at all levels. They are the foundation for conducting a wide variety of operations and continually improving the organization and the force.

9-39. Organizational leaders process tremendous amounts of information. Analysis and synthesis are essential to effective decision making and program development. Analysis breaks a problem into its component parts. Synthesis assembles complex and disorganized data into solutions. Good information management filters relevant information to enable organizational leaders and staffs to exercise effective command and control. Information management uses procedures and information systems to collect, process, store, display, and disseminate information.

9-40. While a single leader in isolation can make good decisions, the organizational leader needs a creative staff to make quality decisions during continuous operations of long duration. In the complex operational environments faced today, organizational leaders must be able to rely on an experienced and trustworthy staff and other experts to acquire and filter huge amounts of information, monitor vital resources, synchronize systems, and assess operational progress and success.



UNDERSTANDING AND SYNCHRONIZING SYSTEMS FOR COMBAT POWER

9-41. Leaders apply a systems perspective to develop and employ their organizations. The ability to understand and effectively employ systems is critical to achieving organizational goals, objectives, and tasks. Organizational leadership, combined with effective information and integration of the warfighting functions, generates combat power.

9-42. Effective organizational leaders excel at tactical and operational synchronization. They must arrange activities in time, space, and purpose to mass maximum relative combat power or organizational effort at a decisive point. Organizational leaders further synchronize by applying the complementary and reinforcing







effects of joint military and nonmilitary assets to overwhelm opponents. Effective synchronization and integration requires leaders to pull together technical, interpersonal, and conceptual abilities and apply them to warfighting goals, objectives, and tasks.



ASSESSING TO ENSURE MISSION SUCCESS AND ORGANIZATIONAL IMPROVEMENT

9-43. Assessing situations—looking at the state of the organization and its component elements—is critical for organizational leaders to achieve consistent results and mission success. Accurate assessment requires their instincts and intuitions based on the reliability of information and their sources. Quality organizational assessment can determine weaknesses and force focused improvements.

9-44. Besides designing effective assessment systems, organizational leaders set achievable, measurable assessment standards. Organizational leaders ask—

What is the standard?

Does the standard make sense to all concerned?

Did we meet the standard?

What system measures the standard?

Who is responsible for the system?

How do we reinforce or correct our findings?

9-45. Because their decisions can have wide-ranging effects, leaders must be sensitive to how their actions affect the organization’s climate. The ability to discern and predict second- and third-order effects benefits organizational leaders in assessing the health of the organizational climate and providing constructive feedback to subordinates.



















































This page intentionally left blank.







Chapter 10

Strategic Leadership

If we desire to avoid insult, we must be able to repel it; if we desire to secure peace, one of the most powerful instruments of our rising prosperity, it must be known, that we are at all times ready for War.

George Washington Commander, Continental Army (1775-81) and President of the United States (1789-97)



STRATEGIC LEADERS

10-1. Strategic leaders represent a finely balanced combination of high-level thinkers, accomplished Soldiers, and military experts. Strategic leaders simultaneously sustain what is necessary within current conditions, envision the future, and convey that vision to a wide audience. They often personally spearhead change. Their policies guide lifecycles and talent management of all Army personnel. They guide the design and employment of technological advances and establish programs that care for Army families. They secure resources for facilities and infrastructure, weapons and equipment, supply and maintenance, and manpower and force structure. America’s complex national security conditions require strategic leaders with an in-depth knowledge of the diplomatic, informational, military, and economic instruments of national power.

10-2. Strategic leadership involves the activities to affect the achievement of a desirable and clearly understood vision. It focuses on influencing Army culture, securing and prioritizing resources, and shaping and supporting organizational and direct level leaders. These goals are realized through directives, policies, programs, systems, and consensus building.

10-3. Strategic leaders serve inside or outside the Army and must thoroughly understand political-military relationships. Army strategic leaders have responsibilities that extend beyond the Army to the national government, its leaders, and ultimately, to the American people. Senior Army leaders are the strategic stewards of the profession. At the strategic level, senior Army leaders address ends, ways, and means to accomplish global missions. They maintain the trust of the American people by living and upholding the Army Values in their decisions and actions taken in regard to policies, programs, systems and the care they provide to Soldiers, DA Civilians, and Army Families. Those serving in strategic leadership positions may lead complex organizations composed of members of the U.S. Army, other U.S. armed services, and those of other nations, members of federal agencies, and non-governmental entities. Strategic leaders, regardless of position, apply professional expertise and uphold the Army Values.

10-4. Strategic leaders have a stewardship responsibility for the relationship between the military and civilian leaders of the Army. Leaders take an oath of office that subordinates the military leader to the laws of the Nation and its elected and appointed leaders, creating a distinct civil-military relationship. Army professionals understand this and appreciate the critical role this concept has played throughout America's history. Equally important, this concept requires military professionals to understand the role of civilian leaders and their responsibilities to the civilian leadership. A critical element of this relationship is the trust that civilian leaders have in their military leaders to represent the military and provide professional military advice. Military professionals have unique expertise, and their input is vital to formulating and executing defense policy. Based on mutual trust, this relationship requires candor and authority to execute the decisions of the civilian leaders. These decisions provide the strategic direction and framework in which strategic military leaders operate.

10-5. To maintain focus, strategic leaders survey conditions to understand the context for their roles. Highly developed interpersonal abilities and intergroup relations are essential to building consensus with civilian and military policy makers on national and international levels. Strategic leaders must think in multiple timelines to anticipate change and be agile to manage change. Strategic leaders extend influence in conditions







where they interact with other high-level leaders and influential figures over whom they have minimal formal authority or no authority at all.

10-6. Strategic leaders are keenly aware of the complexities of national and international security conditions. They operate in intricate networks of overlapping and sometimes competing constituencies. Strategic leaders identify trends, opportunities, and threats that could affect the Army’s future and move vigorously to address them. Their actions affect acquisitions, budget constraints, Total Army issues, civilian programs, research, contracting, congressional hearings, and inter-service cooperation. Strategic leaders process information from these areas while assessing alternatives. They formulate practical decisions and garner support.

10-7. Strategic leaders operate with the same attributes and competencies as direct and organizational leaders. The situations and conditions create differences in how attributes and competencies apply. In general, strategic leaders accommodate—

Greater complexity under high uncertainty.

Broader scope with longer time spans.

Greater risks and stakes.

Greater need for indirect methods of influence.

National-level interests, goals, and priorities.

10-8. Strategic leaders understand the influence of their decisions and actions and contribute their best efforts to accomplish the strategic mission. They set the example for the Army and inspire others to do what is right—for its own sake—and understand that violations of the Army Values can compromise the mission and have strategic implications contrary to national interests.

10-9. While direct and organizational leaders have a more near- and mid-term focus, strategic leaders must concentrate on the future. They spend much of their time looking toward long-term goals and positioning for long-term success as they contend with mid-term and immediate issues.

10-10. To create powerful organizations and institutions capable of adaptation, strategic leaders and their staffs develop networks of knowledgeable individuals who can positively develop their own organizations. Through continuous assessments, strategic leaders seek to understand the personal strengths and weaknesses of the main players on a particular issue. Strategic leaders adeptly read other people while disciplining their own actions and reactions. Strategic leaders influence external events by providing quality leadership, timely and relevant information, and access to the right people and agencies.



LEADING

10-11. When leading at the highest levels of the Army, the DOD, and the national security establishment, Army strategic leaders spearhead changes and, at the same time, must balance risks. They balance current operational risks against future institutional or operational risks. To mitigate future institutional risks, these leaders are responsible for providing leadership to the men and women who serve in their organizations and developing their successors to meet future challenges.



LEADS OTHERS

10-12. Strategic leaders influence both the organization and external conditions. Like direct and organizational leaders, strategic leaders lead by example and exert indirect leadership by communicating, inspiring, and motivating. Strategic leaders make decisions balancing delegation, empowerment, and control. A truly effective strategic leader understands the organization from multiple perspectives, transcending from an inside perspective to understanding the views of outsiders. Strategic leaders are able to move beyond their own experiential biases to view the environment and their mission objectively. Through formal and informal networks, strategic leaders actively seek information relevant to their organizations as well as subject matter experts who can help.

10-13. Strategic leaders routinely address complexity, ambiguity, rapid change, and alignment of policies. They are responsible for developing well-reasoned positions and advise the Nation’s highest leaders. Strategic leaders seek to determine what is important now and what will be important in the future. Their experience, wisdom, and conceptual abilities contribute to solid insight and sound judgment across many







simultaneous challenges. Strategic leaders need an acute sense of timing—knowing when to accept risk and proceed vigorously or when to proceed incrementally, testing the waters as they go. Their insight on issues is strong, and they can skillfully sort relevant from irrelevant connections.

10-14. Envisioning is a key function of strategic leaders made possible by their insight and expertise. Leaders determine a vision by applying thoughtful analysis and judgment to the current or projected situation. Strategic leaders identify trends, opportunities, and threats that could affect the Army’s future and move vigorously to mobilize the talent that will create strategic vision. Strategic leaders are open to ideas from many sources, not just their own organizations.

10-15. When providing vision, direction, giving guidance, and setting priorities, strategic leaders must judge realistically what the future may hold. Strategic leaders seek to keep their vision consistent with external conditions, alliance goals, and national strategy. They incorporate new ideas, technologies, and capabilities. From a mix of ideas, facts, conjecture, and personal experience, they create an image of their organizations and the means to achieve desired results. A strategic leader’s vision may have a time horizon of years or decades.

10-16. The ability to provide clear vision is vital to the strategic leader. The strategic leader’s vision provides the ultimate sense of purpose, direction, and motivation. This vision is the starting point for developing goals and plans, measuring accomplishment, and checking organizational values. For a vision to be effective, the strategic leader must personally commit to it, gain commitment from the organization as a whole, and persistently pursue the goals and objectives that will spread the vision throughout the organization.



EXTENDS INFLUENCE

10-17. Strategic leaders use focused messages to extend influence and to gain support. Whether by nuance or overt presentation, strategic leaders represent the Army and influence other organizations and agencies by communicating what the Army does. Their audience is the Army itself, the Nation, and the rest of the world. Strategic leaders must be proactive in creating relationships. Extending influence requires a shift from direct influence to greater reliance on indirect methods. They focus on increasing engagement with multiple parties or organizations and creating conditions to maximize unity of effort. Strategic leaders rely on writing and public speaking to reinforce their central messages.

10-18. Successful negotiating requires a wide range of interpersonal skills. Strategic leaders must often rely on negotiation skills to obtain the cooperation and support necessary to accomplish a mission. To resolve conflicting views, strategic leaders visualize several possible end states while maintaining a clear idea of the best end state from the national command’s perspective. Strategic leaders must use tact to justify standing firm on nonnegotiable points while still communicating respect for other participants.

10-19. A successful negotiator must be particularly skilled in active listening. Other essential personal characteristics include logical judgment and mental agility. Successful negotiating involves communicating a clear position on the issues while conveying a willingness to bargain on negotiable portions. Negotiators must be able to diagnose unspoken agendas and detach themselves from the negotiation process. This requires recognizing what is acceptable to all concerned parties and working toward a common goal.

10-20. To reach acceptable consensus in negotiations, strategic leaders often circulate proposals early so that further negotiations can focus on critical issues and solutions. Strategic leaders’ commitment to selfless service enables them to subordinate the need for personal recognition for ideas to finding positive solutions that produce the greatest good for their organization, the Army, and the Nation.

10-21. Outside Army boundaries, strategic leaders have roles as integrator, alliance builder, negotiator, and arbitrator. Strategic leaders are skilled at reaching consensus and building coalitions. They may apply these skills to tasks—such as designing combatant commands, joint task forces, and policy working-groups—or determine the direction of a major command or the Army as an institution. Strategic leaders routinely bring designated people together for missions lasting from a few months to years. Using peer leadership rather than strict positional authority, strategic leaders carefully monitor progress toward a visualized end state. They focus on the health of the relationships necessary to achieve the end state. Interpersonal contact sets the tone for professional relations: strategic leaders must be tactful.







10-22. General Dwight D. Eisenhower’s creation of Supreme Headquarters Allied Expeditionary Force during World War II is an inspiring example of coalition building and sustaining fragile relationships. General Eisenhower exercised his authority through an integrated command and staff structure that respected the contributions of all nations involved. To underscore the united team spirit, sections within had chiefs of one nationality and deputies of another.

Across the AtlanticDuring World War II, General George C. Marshall, the Army Chief of Staff, had to seek strategic consensus with demanding peers such as Admiral Ernest J. King, Commander in Chief, U.S. Fleet, and Chief of Naval Operations. General Marshall expended great personal energy ensuring that inter-Service feuding at the top did not dilute American efforts. Admiral King, a forceful leader with strong and often differing views, responded in kind. Because of their ability to find consensus, President FranklinD. Roosevelt had few issues of major consequence to resolve once he issued a decision and guidance.



Across the Atlantic

During World War II, General George C. Marshall, the Army Chief of Staff, had to seek strategic consensus with demanding peers such as Admiral Ernest J. King, Commander in Chief, U.S. Fleet, and Chief of Naval Operations. General Marshall expended great personal energy ensuring that inter-Service feuding at the top did not dilute American efforts. Admiral King, a forceful leader with strong and often differing views, responded in kind. Because of their ability to find consensus, President Franklin

D. Roosevelt had few issues of major consequence to resolve once he issued a decision and guidance.



LEADS BY EXAMPLE

10-23. Strategic leaders are the ultimate representatives of the organization, its cause, and purpose. As the top leaders for the Nation’s military, they also represent our country as diplomats and national representatives. Due to their elevated level of responsibilities and visibility, the Army holds strategic leaders to higher expectations and increased scrutiny. They must exude positivity and confidence. Strategic leaders use multiple outlets to convey strategic messages and set necessary conditions to advance national security interests. Their responsibilities involve spanning the boundaries among the Army and other Services, militaries, coalitions, Congress, industry, and the media.

10-24. Due to increased responsibilities and longer horizons of their decision making, timing, and attention to detail are vital. A strategic leader’s decision at a critical moment can rapidly alter the course of events or affect the execution of budgets several years into the future. Strategic leaders have to set the example for time management. Effective leaders at the strategic level not only make timely decisions but also sense at what level of detail to engage and what to delegate. Strategic leaders judiciously seek counsel from established networks and invest sufficient time to prepare for decisions. Likewise, poor focus and poor time management can have enormous cascading effects.

10-25. Strategic leaders best address complexity by embracing it. This means they expand their frame of reference to fit a situation rather than reducing a situation to fit their preconceptions. Because of their sense of duty, competence, intellectual capacity, and judgment, they tolerate ambiguity, as they will never have all the information wanted. Instead, strategic leaders carefully analyze events and confidently decide when to make a decision, realizing that they must innovate and accept some risk.

10-26. Resilience is a means for strategic leaders to handle the stress from frequent changes, ambiguity, and complexity—all characteristics of strategic- and enterprise-level operations. Improving self-awareness and self-mastery helps build and sustain resiliency. Resiliency is the product of work-life balance, effective time management, family and peer support systems, along with access to executive health programs and education about stressors.



COMMUNICATES

10-27. Words have international consequences at the strategic level. Communication at the strategic level encompasses a wide array of staffs and functional and operational component teams interacting with each other as well as external agencies. In their interaction with others, strategic leaders need a sharp sense of organizational and personal dynamics. One prominent difference between strategic leaders and leaders at other levels is the greater emphasis on symbolic communication. Strategic leaders must carefully consider the enduring nature of all their communications. Strategic leaders’ words, decisions, and actions often have consequences beyond their immediate intent.







10-28. Candor and integrity must always be hallmarks of a strategic leader to earn general trust. They must carefully use their authority to identify messages and convey them to the right target audiences. Knowing when to speak and to whom can be just as important as what is said. To achieve desired outcomes, strategic leaders commit to a few powerful and consistent messages that they repeat in different settings. They devise and follow a communications plan outlining how to address each audience. When preparing to address an audience, they determine its composition and agenda beforehand so they know how best to reach its members. They carefully assess the message effect in the categories of medium, frequency, vocabulary, and context. Ensuring the message goes to the right groups with the desired effect is essential.

10-29. Strategic leaders use dialogue to persuade individuals or groups. Dialogue takes the forms of advocacy and inquiry. Advocacy seeks to advance a position while inquiry looks to find out about another’s position or perspective. Dialogue that blends the two has value for leaders who must address issues more complex than personal experience. To advocate a view, leaders make reasoning explicit, invite others to consider the view, encourage others to provide different views, and explore how views differ. When inquiring into another’s view, leaders should voice their assumptions and seek to identify what support exists for other views. Open dialogue can overcome reluctance to consider different points of view.



DEVELOPING

10-30. Strategic leaders invest in subordinates with a long-term focus. They create the conditions for longterm success by endorsing systems and processes that develop subordinates who can continue to improve the institution. Developing the institution, its organizations, and people involves an ongoing balance of operating today and building for tomorrow and, in general, being stewards of the resources the Nation entrusts to its care.



PREPARES SELF

10-31. Strategic leaders develop throughout their career. An honest understanding of self is important to be able to draw on strengths and compensate for weaknesses. Neither General Marshall nor General Eisenhower had led troops in combat before assuming strategic leadership positions in World War II, but both were instrumental in preparing and leading the United States and its allies to victory. Eisenhower especially felt disadvantaged by his lack of experience. Both future strategic leaders compensated with professional education between the wars, gaining a strategic appreciation of the conditions and the future that was far better than those with extensive combat experience were.

10-32. Strategic leaders bring forward their mastery of broad leadership and technical skills. Strategic leaders, more so than direct and organizational leaders, draw on their developed conceptual abilities to comprehend and manage complex concerns. These challenges include national security, theater strategies, operating in the strategic context, and evolving vast organizations. The variety and scope of strategic leaders’ concerns demand greater preparation.

10-33. Self-aware Army leaders build a personal frame of reference from schooling, experience, self-study, and assessment while reflecting on current events, history, and geography. Strategic leaders create a comprehensive frame of reference that encompasses their entire organization and places it within strategic conditions. Strategic leaders are unafraid to rethink experiences to learn from them. They are comfortable with abstractions common to operational and strategic conditions. A well-developed frame of reference gives strategic leaders a thorough knowledge of organizational subsystems. Aware of relationships among systems, strategic leaders foresee the possible effects of one system upon others, which allows them to anticipate and prevent potential problems. Using their understanding of the systems within their own organizations, strategic leaders work through the complexity and uncertainty of the operational environment and translate abstract concepts into concrete actions.

10-34. Strategic leaders train staffs and organizational teams to package concise, unbiased information and build networks across organizational lines. Strategic leaders make wide-ranging and interrelated decisions so they must be able to rely on imaginative teams who comprehend the conditions, foresee outcomes of many courses of action, and identify key information requirements.

10-35. As strategic leaders build and use effective staffs, they continually seek honest, competent people capable of diverse thought. They cannot afford to have teams that blindly agree with everything they say.







Strategic leaders encourage teams to participate in open dialogue with them, discuss alternative points of view, and explore all facts, assumptions, and implications.



CREATES A POSITIVE ENVIRONMENT

10-36. Strategic leaders influence the culture of the Army. They, like all leaders, are responsible for creating a positive environment in which to work, where individuals can thrive and be productive. Strategic leaders, by personal example and critical resourcing decisions, sustain the culture and policies that encourage both the individual and the Army to learn and evolve.

10-37. Strategic leaders ensure the Army Values and the Warrior Ethos remain fundamental to the Army’s culture. They employ culture to support vision, accomplish the mission, and improve the organization. Organizational culture that endorses the Army Values should reinforce ethical climates. A healthy culture is a powerful motivational tool. Strategic leaders use culture to guide and inspire large, diverse organizations.

10-38. Strategic leaders are at the forefront of supporting lifelong learning across the entire Army—Regular Army, Reserve Components, and DA Civilians. Strategic leaders promote learning by underwriting systems for studying the force and forecasting future conditions. They resource a structure that constantly reflects on how the nation fights and what success requires by constantly assessing the culture and deliberately encouraging creativity and learning. Strategic leaders work to ensure that evolving forces have optimal capability over time. Strategic leaders commission forward-looking projects because the Army is dedicated to learning about operations in new conditions and against evolving threats.



DEVELOPS OTHERS

10-39. Strategic leaders, as all leaders, have the responsibility to actively develop direct subordinates. Strategic leaders are the top-level stewards of the Army, caring for and managing the people, physical, and financial resources entrusted to them. Strategic leaders become enablers as they underwrite the learning, efforts, projects, and ideas of rising leaders. Through developing others, strategic leaders build a team of leaders prepared to fill critical positions in the future.

10-40. More than a matter of following formats and structured sessions, mentoring by strategic leaders means giving the right people an intellectual boost so that they make the leap to successfully operating and creatively thinking at the highest levels. Leaders speak to audiences at service schools about what happens at their level and share their perspectives. Today’s subordinates will become the next generation of strategic leaders.

10-41. Global strategic conditions in constant flux have increased the importance of building agile, honest, and competent staffs and command teams. Strategic leaders mold staffs and organizational teams able to integrate concise, unbiased information and build networks across organizational lines. Strategic leaders make wide-ranging and interrelated decisions so they must be able to rely on imaginative staff and subordinate leaders who comprehend the conditions, foresee consequences of many courses of action, and identify key information.

10-42. Because they must be able to compensate for their own weaknesses, strategic leaders cannot afford to have staffs that blindly agree with everything they say. Strategic leaders encourage staffs to participate in open and candid dialogue with them, discuss alternative points of view, and explore all facts, assumptions, and implications. Such dialogue, that includes inquiry and advocacy, enables strategic leaders to assess all aspects of an issue and clarifies their vision, intent, and guidance.



STEWARDS THE PROFESSION

10-43. Strategic leaders, as senior stewards of the Army, are responsible for reinforcing trust and ensuring the ethical design, generation, support, and application of landpower. Strategic leaders have the greatest influence on Army policies, regulations, programs, and systems. They balance today’s operational requirements against tomorrow’s force structure and leadership needs. Their goal is to steward the profession by developing a core of Army leaders with relevant competencies.





ACHIEVING

10-44. Strategic leaders organize and integrate their efforts to prepare for and achieve the goals of the Army, joint forces, the Nation, and organizations with which they collaborate. Their ability to get results is a function of how well they integrate their leader competencies. The National Security Strategy, National Defense Strategy, and National Military Strategy guide strategic leaders as they develop their visions. Strategic leaders must define for their diverse organizations what success means. They monitor progress and results by drawing on personal observations, organized review and analysis, strategic management plans, and informal discussions.



STRATEGIC PLANNING AND EXECUTION

10-45. By reconciling political and economic constraints with the Army’s needs, strategic leaders navigate to move the force forward using a combination of strategy and budget processes. They spend a great deal of time obtaining and allocating resources and determining conceptual directions, especially those judged critical for future strategic positioning and others necessary to prevent readiness shortfalls. They oversee the Army’s responsibilities under Title 10 of the United States Code.

10-46.  They ask broad questions, such as—

What are the relationships among external organizations?

What are the political and social systems in which the organization and the Army must operate?

10-47. Strategic-level plans must balance competing demands across the DOD. The fundamental requirements for strategic-level planning are the same as planning at the direct and organizational levels. At all levels, leaders establish realistic priorities and communicate decisions. What adds complexity at the strategic level is the sheer number of players and resource factors that can affect the organization.

10-48. Because lives are precious and resources are limited, strategic leaders must make tough decisions about priorities. Strategic Army priorities focus on projecting landpower. When planning for tomorrow, strategic leaders consistently call on their understanding and knowledge of the budgetary process to determine which technologies will provide the capability commensurate with the cost. Visionary Army leaders of the 1970s and 1980s realized that superior night-fighting systems and greater standoff ranges would expose fewer Soldiers to danger, yet kill more of the enemy. Those leaders committed the necessary resources to developing and procuring these and other superior systems. The shifts from Cold War to regional conflicts to counterinsurgencies within decades reinforces that the conduct of war continuously changes. Strategic leaders must therefore seek current information about shifting strategic conditions to determine what force structure to prepare. Strategic leaders must consider—

Who, what, and where is the next threat?

Will we have allies or contend alone?

What are our national and military goals?

What is the successful strategic end state?

10-49. Strategic leaders oversee the relationships between their organizations as part of the nation’s total defense force and the national policy apparatus. Among their duties, strategic leaders—

Provide military counsel in national policy forums.

Interpret national policy guidelines and directions.

Plan for and maintain military capabilities required to implement national policy.

Present the organization’s resource requirements.

Develop strategies to support national objectives.

Bridge gaps between political decisions made as part of national strategy and the individuals and organizations that must carry out those decisions.

10-50. Just as direct and organizational leaders consider sister units and support agencies, strategic leaders consider and work with other Services and government agencies. Many of the Army’s four-star billets are joint or multinational. Lieutenant generals hold similar positions on the Joint Staff, with the DOD, or in combatant commands. While other strategic leaders are assigned to nominally single service organizations







(such as Army Materiel Command, Forces Command, Futures Command, and Training and Doctrine Command), they frequently work outside Army channels. Many DA Civilian strategic leaders hold positions that require a well-rounded joint perspective.

10-51. Creating a hybrid culture that bridges gaps between partners in multinational operations is often critical for success. Strategic leaders take time to learn about their partners’ cultures including political, social, and economic aspects. Cultural sensitivity and geopolitical awareness are critical tools for achieving results beyond the traditional chain of command. Strategic leaders must devise Army courses of action that reflect national policy objectives and consider the interests of other organizations and agencies.

10-52. Strategic leaders routinely address complexity, ambiguity, rapid change, and alignment of policies. They are responsible for developing well-reasoned positions and advise the Nation’s highest leaders. Strategic leaders seek to determine what is important now and what will be important in the future. Their experience, wisdom, and conceptual abilities contribute to solid insight and sound judgment across many simultaneous challenges. Strategic leaders need an acute sense of timing—knowing when to accept risk and proceed vigorously or when to proceed incrementally, testing the waters as they go. Their insight on issues is strong, and they can skillfully sort relevant from irrelevant connections.

10-53. The Army’s strategic leaders recognize that as an institution, the Army experiences a nearly constant state of change: processing and integrating new people, missions, technologies, equipment, and information. To fulfill its mission, the Army must proactively address change. Strategic leaders anticipate change while shielding their organizations from unimportant distracters. Strategic leaders know that change generally requires influence grounded in commitment rather than forced compliance. Many major change efforts fail without organization-wide support, so leaders must reinforce commitment consistently throughout the organization. While all levels of leaders lead change, strategic level leaders make the most-sweeping changes and ones that focus on the most distant time horizon. Strategic leaders must plan for and manage change by—

Identifying the force capabilities necessary to accomplish the National Defense Strategy.

Assigning strategic and operational missions, including priorities for allocating resources.

Preparing plans for using military forces.

Creating, resourcing, and sustaining organizational systems, including requisite personnel and equipment resources, force modernization programs, and essential command and control systems.

Developing and improving doctrine and the training methods supporting doctrine implementation.

Planning for the second- and third-order effects of change.

Maintaining an effective leader development program and other human resource initiatives.

10-54. While the highly volatile nature of the strategic conditions may tempt some strategic leaders to concentrate on the short term, they cannot allow the crisis of the moment to absorb them. They must remain steadfast in their responsibility to shape an organization or policies that will perform over the next ten to twenty years. Strategic leaders also understand complex cause-and-effect relationships and anticipate the second- and third-order effects of their decisions throughout the organization. Planning and foresight cannot predict or influence all future events; therefore, strategic leaders prepare intellectually for a range of threats and scenarios. Strategic leaders work carefully to influence the future with the means available through the diplomatic, informational, military, and economic instruments of national power, as well as their character, competence, and confidence.



CONSISTENTLY ASSESSES CAPABILITIES

10-55. To put strategic vision, concepts, and plans into reality, strategic leaders must employ reliable feedback systems to monitor capabilities and adherence to values and ethics. They must assess many conditions to determine the success of policies, operations, and vision. Other assessment efforts involve understanding the will and opinions of the Nation, expressed through law, policy, leaders, and the media.

10-56. Strategic leaders assess a broad range of factors to gain a complete picture of progress toward goals and mission objectives. They rely on performance indicators to signal how well systems and processes balance the imperatives of doctrine, organization, training, materiel, leadership and education, personnel, and facilities. Assessments may also include monitoring such areas as resource use, development of subordinates, efficiency, effects of stress and fatigue, morale, ethical considerations, and mission accomplishment.





Source Notes



Sources are listed by page number. Where material appears in a paragraph, it lists both the page number followed by the paragraph number(s). Quotations are identified by the first few words of the quote. Boldface indicates vignettes.

+Chapter 1: The Army Profession, Ethic, and Leaders

1-1  “…the Soldier above all…”: General Douglas MacArthur, Thayer Award acceptance speech, 1962. https://www.dvidshub.net/audio/44472/general-douglas-macarthur-thayer-award-acceptance-address.

Army Oaths: Oath of Enlistment, DD Form 4, Enlistment/Reenlistment Document Armed Forces of the United States, October 2007 and Oath of Office: DA Form 71, Oath of Office–Military Personnel, July 1999; 5 USC 3331. The oath administered to commissioned officers includes the words, “I [full name], having been appointed a [rank] in the United States Army ”

Colonel Robert B. Nett: https://history.army.mil/moh/wwII-m-s.html#NETT.

1-21   First Sergeant Conrad Schmidt: https://history.army.mil/html/moh/civwarmz.html.

Chapter 2: Character

General Jonathan M. Wainwright: https://history.army.mil/html/moh/wwII-t-z.html#WAINWRIGHT.

“The discipline which makes…”: Major General John M. Schofield, Address to the United States Corps of Cadets, 11 August 1879 in Manual for Noncommissioned Officers and Privates of Infantry of the Army of the United States (Washington, DC: War Department, 1917), 12.

Sergeant David B. Bleak: https://history.army.mil/html/moh/koreanwar.html. 2-5	Lieutenant Vernon Baker: https://history.army.mil/moh/wwII-a-f.html.

Warrant Officer Hugh C. Thompson, Jr.: https://www.loc.gov/rr/frd/Military_Law/pdf/RDAR-Vol-I.pdf.

Captain Humbert R. Versace: https://history.army.mil/html/moh/vietnam-m-z.html. 2-9	The Soldier’s Creed: https://www.army.mil/values/soldiers.html.

The Army Civilian Corps Creed: https://www.army.mil/values/corps.html.

Task Force Kingston: Roy E. Appleman, South to the Naktong, North to the Yalu (CMH Pub 20-2) (Washington, DC: Center of Military History, 1992). https://history.army.mil/html/books/020/20-2/CMH_Pub_20-2.pdf.

“Discipline is the soul…”: George Washington, “Instructions to Company Captains, 29 July 1757,” National Archives Founders Online. https://founders.archives.gov/documents/Washington/02-04-02-0223.

Discipline in the Face of the Enemy: TRADOC Pam 525-100-4, Leadership and Command on the Battlefield: Noncommissioned Officer Corps (Fort Monroe, VA: Department of the Army, 1994), 26. https://apps.dtic.mil/dtic/tr/fulltext/u2/a283327.pdf

Chapter 4: Intellect

4-2	“Judgment comes from experience…”: Omar N. Bradley, “Leadership: An Address to the U.S. Army War College, 07 October 1971,” Parameters 1(3) (1972): 8. https://ssi.armywarcollege.edu/pubs/parameters/articles/1972/bradley.pdf.

4-2	Gatlings to the Assault: https://history.army.mil/catalog/pubs/21/daposters/21-46.html.

Chapter 5: Leads

“The American soldier…”: Omar N. Bradley, “American Military Leadership,” Army Information Digest 8, no. 2 (February 1953): 5.

5-9 through 5-18. Gary Yukl, Leadership in Organizations, 8th ed. (Boston, MA: Pearson Education, 2012).

5-5	D-Day statement to soldiers, sailors, and airmen of the Allied Expeditionary Force, 6/44. https://www.archives.gov/historical-docs/todays-doc/?dod-date=606.

5-10	Breakthrough at Chipyong-ni: https://history.army.mil/catalog/pubs/21/daposters/21-47.html.







5-11	5-56 and 5-60. Jonathan Hughes and Jeff Weiss, Making Partnerships Work: A Relationship Management Handbook (Boston, MA: Vantage Partners, LLC, 2001).

5-67 thru 5-69. Ha Hoang and Frank T. Rothaermel, “How to Manage Alliances Strategically,” MIT Sloan Management Review 58 (August 23, 2016): 1-8.

“Example whether it be…”: George Washington, “From George Washington to Major General Stirling, 5 March 1780”, National Archives Founders Online. https://founders.archives.gov/documents/Washington/03-24-02-0525.

Master Sergeant Roy P. Benavidez: https://history.army.mil/html/moh/vietnam-a-l.html#BENAVIDEZ.

Chapter 6: Develops

6-1	“The commander must assure…”: FM 100-5, Operations (Washington DC: Department of the Army, 1976).

Chapter 7: Achieves

7-1	“The truly great leader…”: George C. Marshall, “Graduation of Officer Candidates Class,” Fort Benning, Georgia, 27 September 1941.

Chapter 8: Leadership in Practice

8-1	“But once war…”: Douglas MacArthur, “Address of General of the Army Douglas MacArthur,” Congressional Record 97 (1951) p 4123, (Text from Congressional Record Permanent Digital Collection). https://www.govinfo.gov/app/collection/crecb/_crecb/Volume%20097%20(1951).

Third Battalion, 358th Infantry Regiment: General Orders 25 (Washington DC: War Department, 1945).

Remagen  Bridgehead:  https://history.army.mil/catalog/pubs/21/daposters/21-32.html.

Chapter 9: Organizational Leadership

“You have to lead men…”: George C. Marshall, “Compulsory Military Training and Service,” Testimony to the U.S. Senate Committee on Military Affairs, 76th Congress, 3rd session, 12 July 1940.

9-11. Jeroen Stouten, Denise M. Rousseau, and David De Cremer, “Successful Organizational Change: Integrating the Management Practice and Scholarly Literatures,” Academy of Management Annals 12 (9 July 2018): 752-788.

Chapter 10: Strategic Leadership

10-1	“If we desire…”: George Washington, “From George Washington to the United States Senate and House of Representatives, 3 December 1793,” National Archives Founders Online. https://founders.archives.gov/documents/Washington/05-14-02-0306.





Glossary



The glossary lists acronyms and terms with Army or joint definitions. Terms for which ADP 6-22 is the proponent are marked with an asterisk (*). The proponent publication for other terms is listed in parentheses after the definition.







AAR ADP AR DA DOD DODI

FM GPS JP LT NCO SGT SSG U.S. WO1

after action review

Army doctrine publication Army regulation Department of the Army Department of Defense

Department of Defense instruction field manual

Global Positioning System joint publication lieutenant noncommissioned officer sergeant

staff sergeant United States warrant officer 1







*Army leader

Anyone who by virtue of assumed role or assigned responsibility inspires and influences people by providing purpose, direction, and motivation to accomplish the mission and improve the organization.

+*Army ethic

The set of enduring moral principles, values, beliefs, and laws that guide the Army profession and create the culture of trust essential to Army professionals in the conduct of missions, performance of duty, and all aspects of life.

+*Army profession

A trusted vocation of Soldiers and Army civilians whose collective expertise is the ethical design, generation, support, and application of landpower; serving under civilian authority; and entrusted to defend the Constitution and the rights and interests of the American people.

command

The authority that a commander in the armed forces lawfully exercises over subordinates by virtue of rank or assignment. (JP 1)

command and control

The exercise of authority and direction by a properly designated commander over assigned and attached forces in the accomplishment of mission. (JP 1)







*counterproductive leadership

The demonstration of leader behaviors that violate one or more of the Army's core leader competencies or Army Values, preventing a climate conducive to mission accomplishment.

*leadership

The activity of influencing people by providing purpose, direction, and motivation to accomplish the mission and improve the organization.

mentorship

The voluntary developmental relationship that exists between a person of greater experience and a person of lesser experience that is characterized by mutual trust and respect. (AR 600-100)

mission command

(Army) The Army's approach to command and control that empowers subordinate decision making and decentralized execution appropriate to the situation. (ADP 6-0)





References



All websites were accessed on 12 August 2019.

REQUIRED PUBLICATIONS

These documents must be available to the intended users of this publication.

DOD Dictionary of Military and Associated Terms. July 2019. Available at https://www.jcs.mil/Doctrine/.

ADP 1-02. Terms and Military Symbols. 14 August 2018.



RELATED PUBLICATIONS

These documents contain relevant supplemental information.



JOINT AND DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE PUBLICATIONS

Most DOD issuances are available online: https://www.esd.whs.mil/dd/. Most joint publications are available online: https://www.jcs.mil/Doctrine/Joint-Doctine-Pubs/.

DODI 1430.16. Growing Civilian Leaders. 19 November 2009. Available at https://www.esd.whs.mil/Portals/54/Documents/DD/issuances/dodi/143016p.pdf.

JP 1. Doctrine for the Armed Forces of the United States. 25 March 2013.



ARMY PUBLICATIONS

Most Army doctrinal publications are available online at https://armypubs.army.mil/. ADP 6-0. Mission Command: Command and Control of Army Forces. 31 July 2019. AR 350-1. Army Training and Leader Development. 10 December 2017.

AR 600-20. Army Command Policy. 6 November 2014.

AR 600-100. Army Profession and Leadership Policy. 5 April 2017. ATP 5-19. Risk Management. 14 April 2014.

ATP 6-22.1. The Counseling Process. 1 July 2014.

ATP 6-22.5. A Leader’s Guide to Soldier Health and Fitness. 10 February 2016. ATP 6-22.6. Army Team Building. 30 October 2015.

FM 3-13. Information Operations. 6 December 2016.

FM 6-22. Leader Development. 30 June 2015.

FM 6-27. The Commander’s Handbook on the Law of Land Warfare. 7 August 2019. FM 7-22. Army Physical Readiness Training. 26 October 2012.

GTA 22-06-001. Ethical Climate Assessment Survey. 1 October 1997.



+OTHER PUBLICATIONS

Appleman, Roy E. South to the Naktong, North to the Yalu (CMH Pub 20-2). Washington, DC: Center of Military History, 1992.

Army Civilian Corps Creed. Available at https://www.army.mil/values/corps.html. Army Values. Available at https://www.army.mil/values/.

Bradley, Omar N. “American Military Leadership,” Army Information Digest 8, no. 2, February 1953.







Bradley, Omar N. “Leadership: An Address to the U.S. Army War College, 07 October 1971.” Parameters 1(3), 1972. https://ssi.armywarcollege.edu/pubs/parameters/articles/1972/bradley.pdf.

Department of the Army. FM 100-5, Operations. Washington DC: Department of the Army, 1976. General Orders 25. Washington DC: War Department, 1945.

Hoang, Ha and Frank T. Rothaermel. “How to Manage Alliances Strategically.” MIT Sloan Management Review 58 (August 23, 2016): 1-8.

Hughes, Jonathan and Jeff Weiss. Making Partnerships Work: A Relationship Management Handbook.

Boston, MA: Vantage Partners, LLC, 2001.

MacArthur, Douglas. “Address of General of the Army Douglas MacArthur.” Congressional Record 97 (1951). Text from Congressional Record Permanent Digital Collection, https://www.govinfo.gov/app/collection/crecb/_crecb/Volume%20097%20(1951).

MacArthur, Douglas. Thayer Award acceptance speech, 1962. https://www.dvidshub.net/audio/44472/general-douglas-macarthur-thayer-award-acceptance-address.

Manual for Noncommissioned Officers and Privates of Infantry of the Army of the United States.

Washington, DC: War Department, 1917.

Marshall, George C. “Graduation of Officer Candidates Class,” Fort Benning, Georgia, 27 September 1941.

Marshall, George C. Testimony to the U.S. Senate Committee on Military Affairs. “Compulsory Military Training and Service.” 76th Congress, 3rd session, 12 July 1940, Hearings on S 4164, 372-385.

Stouten, Jeroen, Denise M. Rousseau, and David De Cremer. “Successful Organizational Change: Integrating the Management Practice and Scholarly Literatures.” Academy of Management Annals 12 (9 July 2018): 752-788.

The Constitution of the United States. Available at https://www.archives.gov/founding-docs/constitution.

The Soldier’s Creed. Available at https://www.army.mil/values/soldiers.html.

Title 10, USC. Available at http://uscode.house.gov/browse/prelim@title10&edition=prelim. Uniform Code of Military Justice. Available at https://jsc.defense.gov.

Washington, George. “From George Washington to Major General Stirling, 5 March 1780”, National Archives Founders Online, https://founders.archives.gov/documents/Washington/03-24-02-0525.

Washington, George. “From George Washington to the United States Senate and House of Representatives, 3 December 1793,” National Archives Founders Online. https://founders.archives.gov/documents/Washington/05-14-02-0306.

Washington, George. “Instructions to Company Captains, 29 July 1757,” National Archives Founders Online. https://founders.archives.gov/documents/Washington/02-04-02-0223.

Yukl, Gary. Leadership in Organizations. 8th ed. Boston, MA: Pearson Education, Inc., 2012.



WEBSITES

Comprehensive Soldier and Family Fitness Program: https://armyfit.army.mil. The National Archives. Available at https://www.archives.gov/.

United States Army Center of Military History. Available at https://history.army.mil/index.html.



PRESCRIBED FORMS

This section contains no entries.



References



REFERENCED FORMS

Unless otherwise indicated, most Department of the Army forms are available online at https://armypubs.army.mil/ . Most Department of Defense forms are available at https://www.esd.whs.mil/Directives/forms/.

DA Form 71. Oath of Office - Military Personnel.

DA Form 2028. Recommended Changes to Publications and Blank Forms.

DD Form 4. Enlistment/Reenlistment Document Armed Forces of the United States.



















































This page intentionally left blank.





Index



Entries are by paragraph number unless specified.







A–B

achieving (gets results), 7-1–7-14, table 7-1

active listening, 5-69–5-70

adaptability, 6-14, 8-7, 8-8–8-12

changes, 8-37

ambiguity, 10-25–10-26

Army Civilian Corps Creed, page 2-9

Army Civilians, 1-117–1-120

Army Ethic, 1-44–1-52, figure 1-2

Army profession, 1-53–1-69 Army Values, figure 1-2 defined, 1-44

framework, 1-48, table 1-1

Army leadership requirements model, 1-82–1-88, figure 1-4

Army Profession, 1-3–1-43,

figure 1-1

characteristics, 1-10–1-43

defined, 1-8

Army Values, 2-4–2-13

duty, 2-7

honor, 2-10

integrity, 2-11

loyalty, 2-6

personal courage, 2-12–2-13

respect, 2-8

selfless service, 2-9

attributes, 1-86

Army Values, 2-4–2-13

confidence, 3-10

discipline, 2-29–2-30

empathy, 2-23–2-25

expertise, 4-17

fitness, 3-4–3-9

humility, 2-31–2-33

innovation, 4-9–4-10

interpersonal tact, 4-11

mental agility, 4-4–4-6 military and professional

bearing, 3-3

resilience, 3-11

sound judgment, 4-4–4-8 Warrior Ethos/service ethos,

2-26–2-28

balancing mission and welfare, 5-37–5-42

building trust and cohesion, 6-31–6-34

builds trust, 5-43–5-46, table 5-2 outside lines of authority,

5-51–5-53

C

character, 2-1–2-3, table 2-1

Army Values, 2-4–2-13

discipline, 2-29–2-30

empathy, 2-23–2-25

ethical orders, 2-20–2-22

ethical reasoning, 2-17–2-19

Service Ethos, 2-26

values and beliefs, 2-14–2-16 Warrior Ethos, 2-26–2-28

coaching, 6-53–6-54

commitment, 5-8

communicates, 5-68–5-78, 9-12–

9-16, 10-27–10-29, table 5-5

competencies, 1-87–1-88, figure

1-4

builds trust, 5-43–5-46, table 5-2

communicates, 5-68–5-78,

9-12–9-16, 10-27–10-29,

table 5-5 creates a positive

environment/fosters esprit de corps, 6-20–6-41, 9-18–

9-19, 10-36–10-38, table 6-4

develops others, 6-42–6-71,

9-23–9-33, 10-39–10-42,

table 6-3

extends influence beyond the chain of command, 5-47–

5-60, 9-6–9-8, 10-17–10-22,

table 5-3

gets results, 7-2–7-14,

table 7-1

leads by example, 5-61–5-67, 9-9–9-11, 10-23–10-26,

table 5-4

leads others, 5-2–5-42, 9-4–

9-5, 10-12–10-16, table 5-1

prepares self, 6-7–6-19, 9-20–

9-22, 10-31–10-35, table 6-1

stewards the profession, 6-72–6-74, table 6-5

compliance, 5-7

composure, 4-13–4-16

confidence, 3-10

counseling, 6-52 counterproductive leadership. See

leadership.

create shared understanding, 5-71–5-78

creates a positive environment/fosters esprit de corps, 6-20–6-41, 9-18–9-19,

10-36–10-38, table 6-4

creative thinking, 4-5, 5-9

critical thinking, 4-5–4-6 cultural and geopolitical

knowledge, 4-23–4-26

D–E–F–G–H

demonstrate care for people, 6-36–6-37

demonstrate competence, 5-67

develops others, 6-42–6-71, 9-23–

9-33, 10-39–10-42, table 6-3

direct level leadership. See

leadership. discipline, 2-29–2-30

displaying character, 5-61–5-67

diversity, recognizing, 4-12 dynamics of leadership. See

leadership. duty, 2-7

empathy, 2-23–2-25

encouraging initiative, 6-35

esprit de corps, 1-38–1-43, 6-38–

6-41

expertise, 4-17

extends influence beyond the chain of command, 5-47–5-60, 9-6–9-8, 10-17–10-22, table 5-3

fitness, 3-4–3-9

formal leadership. See leadership. gets results, 7-2–7-14, table 7-1









honor, 3-11–3-12

honorable serive, 1-17–1-23

humility, 2-31–2-33

I–J–K

influence, application of, 5-19–5-21

apprising, 5-16

collaboration, 5-14

exchange, 5-12

inspirational appeals, 5-17

legitimating, 5-11

participation, 5-18

personal appeals, 5-13

pressure, 5-10

rational persuasion, 5-15 understanding sphere, means

and limits, 5-54–5-55

informal leadership. See

leadership. innovation, 4-9–4-10

integrity, 2-11

intellect, foundations, 4-1–4-3,

table 4-1

expertise, 4-17

innovation, 4-9–4-10

interpersonal tact, 4-11

mental agility, 4-4–4-6

sound judgment, 4-4–4-8

interpersonal tact, 4-11

joint knowledge, 4-22

L

leader, attributes of, 1-86, table 2-1, table 3-1, table 4-1

competencies of, 1-87–1-88,

table 5-1, table 5-2, table

5-3, table 5-4, table 5-5,

table 6-1, table 6-2, table

6-4, table 6-5, table 7-1

responsibilities, 2-7, 2-13–

2-14, 2-19, 5-32, 5-38, 5-42,

5-65–5-66, 6-35, 6-36, 6-45,

6-60, 6-63–6-64, 7-7, 8-3,

8-18, 8-35, 8-39, 8-49–8-50,

9-17, 9-30–9-31, 10-4,

10-39, 10-54

role models, 1-96, 1-107,

1-111, 5-1, 9-21

leadership, and command authority, 1-95–1-97

and management, 8-6



counterproductive leadership, 8-45–8-50

defined, 1-74

direct level, 1-124–1-127 dynamics of leadership, 1-89–

1-106

formal, 1-94–1-97

informal, 1-98–1-99

organizational level, 1-128–

1-129, 9-1–9-45

strategic level, 1-130–1-132,

10-1–10-56

leadership and command authority. See leadership.

leads by example, 5-61–5-67,

9-9–9-11, 10-23–10-26, table

5-4

leads others, 5-2–5-42, 9-4–9-5,

10-12–10-16, table 5-1

loyalty, 2-6

M–N–O

management, 8-6

mental agility, 4-4–4-6

mentoring, 6-55–6-57

military and professional bearing, 3-3

military expertise, 1-24–1-31

mission command, 1-78

negotiating, 5-56–5-60

noncommissioned officers, 1-113–

1-116

officers, 1-108–1-112

operational development, 6-58–

6-60

operational environment, challenges of, 8-15–8-35

organizational level leadership.

See leadership. operational stress, 8-38–8-44

P–Q–R

personal courage, 2-11–2-13 positive environment, creates,

6-20–6-28

assessing, 6-29–6-30

prepares self, 6-7–6-19, 9-20–

9-22, 10-31–10-35, table 6-1

developing self-awareness, 6-14–6-19



expanding knowledge, 6-12–

6-13

presence, foundations, 3-1–3-2,

table 3-1

confidence, 3-10

fitness, 3-4–3-9

military and professional bearing, 3-3

resilience, 3-11

providing purpose, direction, and motivation, 5-25–5-32

resilience, 3-11

resistance, 5-22–5-24

resolving conflicts, 5-56

respect, 2-8

S–T–U

self-awareness, 6-14–6-19

self-development, 1-25–1-26, 6-8–

6-10, 6-43, 6-60, 9-23

selfless service, 2-9

Service Ethos, 2-26 Soldier’s Creed, page 2-9 sound judgment, 4-7–4-8

stability, 1-117, 3-6, 4-13

standards, upholding, 5-33–5-36 stewards the profession, 6-72–

6-74, table 6-5

stewardship, 1-32–1-37 strategic leadership. See

leadership.

stress, change, 8-36–8-37

operational, 8-38–8-44

tactical knowledge, 4-18–4-19

teams, developing, 6-61–6-62

stages of, 6-63–6-71

technical knowledge, 4-20–4-21

trust, 1-11–1-16

V–W–X–Y–Z

values and beliefs, 2-14–2-16 Warrior Ethos, 2-26–2-28



ADP 6-22

31 July 2019



























By Order of the Secretary of the Army:







MARK A. MILLEY

General, United States Army Chief of Staff









Official:





Administrative Assistant

to the Secretary of the Army

1922706





DISTRIBUTION:

Active Army, Army National Guard, and United States Army Reserve: To be distributed in

accordance with the initial distrubution number (IDN) 110180, requirements for ADP 6-22.

















































































































PIN: 103006-000

